TALES
OF
THE GOOD WOMAN
.
BY
A DOUBTFUL GENTLEMAN.
THE YANKEE ROU.
4
I have more than I shall spendmark sir!
I would have this nephew of mine converse with gentlemen;
I'll not pinch him in his allowance;
The University had almost spoil'd him.
With what, sir?
With modesty; a thing you know
Not here in fashionbut that's almost cur'd.
Shirley
.
CHAPTER I.
THE UNCLE.
Young Calvin Sopus began life with every
possible
advantage for rising in the world, for he was
born at the bottom of the wheel. He had no
fortune, and there was therefore every motive
to exert himself; he had no family, and was
therefore not afraid of disgracing it by following
any honest calling. I am not jesting, gentle
reader
,
when I call these advantages. When thou hast
seen as much of the world as I have, and
witnessed
the natural tendency of wealth and honours to
sink, and of lowliness and poverty to rise, when
left to their natural, unrestricted operation, thou
wilt not hesitate to say with me, that to be placed
in a situation where active exertion is necessary
and honest occupation not beneath us, is to be
born under a lucky star. Our heroor rather
our hero's uncle, had still another great natural
advantage, if any more were necessary. He was
blessed with a numerous race of brothers and
sisters
,
who in good time made it necessary for the
old ones to turn out of the hive to make way for
the young ones. At the age of ten or eleven, or
somewhere thereabout, he was placed with a
neighbouring farmer, where he worked late and
earlyfed hardslept hardand had rather a
hard time of it, as the well to do in the world
say of those who are not so well fed, well clothed,
and well lodged as themselves. They are not
aware, poor souls! that labour which blesses
others, blesses the labourer too; and that his very
privations are hallowed as blessings, by the zest
which wholesome occupation gives, to his
amusements
,
his rest, and his food. Do these foolish
people who pamper themselves into a delusion
of happiness, by pitying the labouring classes,
believe themselves selected from the great mass
of mankind for exclusive enjoyments? Do they
presume to think that Providence while bestowing
upon them riches without labour or desert, hath
entailed on all the rest of mankind the necessity
of labour as a curse? That it hath condemned a
vast majority of the human race to misery in this
life, and a little meager minority to happiness
without any peculiar merit of their own, because
the one is obliged to labour, the other able to live
in idleness? This cannot be. All that ambition
wins, or avarice covets, can neither give or take
away happiness. These are but straws and
feathers
for children to tire themselves with running
after. They are the bones that Providence throws
away, and which set the mighty mastiffs of the
earth snarling and fighting evermore.
When Tamerlane the Great, who was lame of
a leg, had conquered, taken prisoner, and
overturned
the throne of Bajazet the Great, Emperor
of the Turks, who was blind of an eye, and the
latter was brought before him, he burst into a fit
of laughter. Bajazet reproached him with jesting
at his misfortunes. No, replied Tamerlane,
I was laughing to think what little value Allah
must place upon power, wealth, and dominion,
when he has taken an empire from a man with one
eye to give to another with one leg.
But what has Calvin Sopus to do with Khans,
Emperors, and Empires, quoth the critical
reader
.
Be quiet, dear sir, I beseech thee; pray let
me tell my story in my own way if you please.
You don't know but I mean to make Calvin an
Emperor before I have done with him. Stranger
things than that have happened in our timeat
least in fashionable novels.
Calvin remained with the farmer, working like
one of his horses, every day and all day long,
except
Sundays, when he went to meeting in a new
linsey woolsey suit of blue and grey mixture. Few
and far between were the incidents that marked his
life during the period between his debut and the age
of sixteen years. One was the purchase of a beaver
hat, which consumed the savings of years; the other
his conversion to Methodism by a ghost which he
saw on his return from a camp-meeting. He was
passing a dark lane with a thick wood on either
side, through which the little beams of moonlight
darted here and there, when he saw something
standing close to the fence. It was as white as
a sheet, and there never was such a thing known
as a black ghost. Had it been black, it would
have been the Devil; but being white, it could be
nothing but a ghost. The old farmer's wife threw
up her eyes and took down her Hymn Book; the
old farmer asked him why he did not speak to it.
Speak to it! quoth Calvin, I had'nt breath
to do any thing but run away.
So Calvin set it down that it was a ghost, and
as ghosts never appear except for good reasons,
which they always take care to keep to themselves,
he took it for granted that something was going to
happen. The very next night there was a bright
aurora borealis, which set all the old women
prophecying
war, pestilence, and famine. Just such
a thing appeared, exactly in the same place, just
before the Revolutionary War. In addition to
this, somebody saw a ball of fire, flashing before
4*
his window, and then there came a great clap of
thunder, and then the windows rattled just as if
there had been a great earthquake, just such a one
as happened before the old French war in Canada.
If the reader has ever livedhas ever had the
happiness
I would say, for if my memory don't deceive
me, I was once happy thereif he has ever had
the happiness of living in the countryhe must
have learned from his own experience, that the
goddess Rumour was born and brought up in a
country village. The people of crowded cities
are nothing to the idle gossips of a village, for
keeping up a rumour. Neither will he, I think,
have failed to observe that there is much more of
superstitious credulity in the retired shades of life
than in the crowd; not because the people are
more ignorant, but that there is something in the
quiet of the countrythe loneliness of the
pathways
the
whisperings of the woods, the
murmuring
of the waters, the very hum of the insects,
added to the repose, the gravitythe almost
sadness
which nature sometimes wearsfor even her
smiles are melancholythere is something in all
this, which disposes the mind to cower under the
imaginationto conjure up visions of possibilities
it nover cherished beforeto start at shadows
quail at a soundto believe and tremble. I
myself
have felt all this a thousand timesalthough
I confess, old as I am, my reveries were of
another
class when I was young. I never entered a
solitude or buried myself in the wicked twilight of
the woods, without directly conjuring up the bright
vision of some reigning fair one, the distant
unapproachable
object of my dreams and reveries, in
whose presence I had never dared to do any thing
but look just like a fool. But alone by myself in
a wood, not Demosthenes was more eloquent,
when haranguing the brawling waves with his
mouth full of pebbles. I wish I could remember,
that I might repeat some of my declarations, for
the benefit of the dumb dandies of the day, whose
silence, as I am credibly informed, is much
complained
of by the young ladies.
Be this as it may, Calvin waxed very serious after
the sight of the ghostthe mysterious light in the
norththe ball of firethe clap of thunder, and
the rattling of the windows. The spectre of
death now began to hover before him, in his
solitary
walks to and from the fieldshis mind was
gradually imbued with gloomy, superstitious ideas
he became thin, pale, and sadand his labours
often stood still while he was pondering on his
approaching
fatefor it was not long ere he
convinced
himself he was ill and going to die. He
continued to attend the meetings which were from
time to time held in the neighbourhood, and was
at length
struck down
, as the phrase isthat is,
he sunk under his weakness of body and fearful
depression of mind, and lay for a while howling
on the floor, in a state half physically, half morally
distracted. He revived after a time, and sunk into
horrors inexpressible; day nor night, nor labour
nor repose, nor prayer nor repentance, nor purposed
amendment, afforded the poor youth relief or respite.
He imagined himself wrestling with Satan, who
was shaking him over the bottomless pitand
but my object is not his history, but that of his
nephew. The good farmer sent for a doctor, a
shrewd, observing, experienced old humourist, as
many country doctors are, who felt his pulse,
asked
some questions, consulted the head of his
loaded
whip, and called Calvin a great blockhead.
The fellow has got the pulse of a horse, the
nerves of a lion, and the heart of a weasel. He
is as well as I am, and will live at least a hundred
years after you and I are gone. So saying he
gave Calvin a smart cut with his whip across the
shins, told him to get to work as hard as he could,
and mounting his horse trotted away to his next
patient. Calvin was so delighted to hear that he
was not like to die soon, notwithstanding the
ghost, the light in the north, and the other omens,
that he took the doctor's advice, fell to work
harder than ever, and was soon strong enough to
bid defiance to his old enemy the ghost. He is
not the only example of this sort which has fallen
under my notice. He continued, however, to
frequent
Methodist meetings, till he came to town
and grew rich, when he bought a pew in a
genteeler
church, there being a gentility in religion
as well as in every thing else. But I must not
take up too much of the reader's attention with
Calvin, and thereby make him the hero of my
story, although in so doing I might plead the
example
of Homer, whose real hero is certainly
Hector; or of Milton, who has, unwittingly
without
doubt, concentrated his genius upon a
personage
who shall be nameless.
About the time that Calvin attained the age of
eighteen, the good farmer with whom he lived,
smitten by the far off and cheap beauties of the
west, sold his house and every thing belonging
thereto, and packed himself away to Ohio, where
he bought half a township, and in process of time
became a patroon. Calvin had a great deal of
industry and very little enterprize. He did not
like to go so far from home; so he determined to
go to the city and seek his fortune. He arrived
there with the product of all his hard earnings
and savings, which was just enough to purchase
a horse and cart, with which he commenced Jehu.
Of his progress from a cartman to a grocer, from
a grocer to a shipping merchant, and thence to a
bold trader to China and the Northwest Coast, we
shall enter into no details. It is sufficient to say,
that by the time he grew too old to enjoy riches,
he was as rich as a broker. Nothing indeed is
more easy than to grow rich. It is only to trust
nobodyto befriend no oneto get every thing,
and save all we getto stint ourselves and every
body belonging to usto be the friend of no man,
and have no man for our friendto heap interest
on interest, cent upon centto be mean,
miserable
,
and despised, for some twenty or thirty
years, and riches will come as sure as disease and
disappointment.
Calvin was now almost sixty years old, and a
bachelor. He had been so busy making money,
that he could not spare time to look out for a wife.
Now it was too late, and his first great
disappointment
,
after getting his money, was not knowing
what to do with it. There are no people more
anxious for some one to give their money to after
death, than those who give nothing away while
living. He cast about among his relatives, of
whom he had not hitherto taken the least notice,
although there were divers good people in the
Bowery and Pump-street, who boasted of being
related to the rich China merchant, Calvin Sopus,
Esquire, and much good did it do them. At length,
he discovered among the sugar boxes, molasses
hogsheads, and flies of a little corner grocery,
up town
, a nephew, the son of his eldest sister,
who had married an honest man of the name of
Sheffield, whose mother's name had been Stafford.
Agreeably to the fashion of the times, the eldest
son was called Stafford Sheffield, and a very pretty
name it was, and a very pretty lad was he.
Nothing
could equal his happiness, when the old man
took him home, and announced that if he behaved
himself like a man, he would make a man of him.
Rich old men, who have risen from a low state,
generally despise gentlemen with all their might,
yet are always desirous that their sons and heirs
should be gentlemen. I never knew a rich
cobbler
or tailor, who was anxious that his son should
follow his trade. There were two good reasons
why Calvin should be a humourist. He was rich
and a bachelor. Now only give an old man plenty
of elbow room, and plenty of money, and ten to
one, he will branch out into rare eccentricities, the
greater in all probability, from their having been
circumscribed in early life by poverty. There
never was such a galley slave as poor Stafford
Sheffield, from the moment he was transplanted
from the shades of Pump-street to the sunshine of
Hudson Square. He envied the cook in the
kitchen, and the chimney sweepers in the street,
for they were all free compared with him. There
was not a moment of his life when he could do as
he liked, and for some years he sustained a species
of tyranny, which hath no name and no parallel in
this world.
The old man had satisfied himself that the best,
nay, the only effectual way of teaching young
people
self-denial, which in his opinion, and there he
was right, was the safeguard of all the virtues, was
never to permit them to do as they liked.
Accordingly
his practice was to ask the young man, if
he would like to do this, or have that, or go thither;
and if he replied Yes, to deny him without
ceremony
.
In this way, as he one day boasted to a
neighbour, who was complaining of the conduct
of his sonin this way he nipped his inclinations
in the bud, and taught him the virtue of self-denial.
It happened that our hero overheard this
disclosure
,
and from that time he never wanted for any
thing. Boy, would Calvin say should you like
to go to the play to night N-n-o, would he
answer, drawling and yawning, as if overcome with
listelessness. Why then, you shall go, you rascal,
cries Calvin. What a clever youth is my
nephew
,
would he add when he was gone, he
cares nothing for frolic or amusement. Ah! this
comes of my system of teaching self-denial. And
he grew to love him so well, for having done so
much honour to his system of self-denial, that
Stafford had never afterwards any occasion to
practice self-denial while the old man lived.
From the period in which Stafford attained the
promise of manhood, attentions such as he had
never received before, flowed in upon his uncle.
The old man was continually invited out to
dinners
and parties, and there was hardly a day in
which he did not receive some little present. In
particular, a widow lady, who had nine pretty little
accomplished daughters, who understood the art
of spending according to the most fashionable
canons of the day, almost stuffed him to death
with jellies and blanc-mange. The dmon of
vanity actually awakened in the heart of the old
man, and he sometimes thought to himself, the
widow certainly had an eye upon him. He was
mistaken, it was on his nephew. Whether it was
gratitude for the jellies bestowed on his thrice
honoured uncle, or the beauty of Miss Angelina's
foot, that won him, I know notbut certain it is,
that before our hero was twenty, he was
irrevocably
engaged to the young lady.
Luckily for young heirs, old men cannot live
for ever. One day the enamoured widow sent
Calvin
a present of a pine-apple, of which he ate as he
was wont to do of every thing that cost him nothing.
The weather was very hotandwhy should I
dwell on the heart-rending scenein two short
days Stafford was the disconsolate heir ofnobody
could tell how much. But the widow, who had
caused her son, who was an attorney and moreover
a commissioner for taking affidavits, to make
particular
examination, privately assured Miss
Angelina
,
that it was not far from half a million.
Whereupon the young lady put on her hat, and
shawl, and feathers, and flounces, and flags, and
streamers, sticks, whalebones, combs, pearls,
chains, squares, rounds, three corners, busks,
bodices
,
scarfs, borders, fans, fardingales, puffs, cuffs,
ruffs, muffs, puzzles, fuzzles, frizzles, frizlets,
bandlets
,
fillets, crosslets, bracelets armlets, amulets
pendulets, with divers other nameless
embellishments
,
and went and ran up a bill of two hundred
dollars at the milliners. We shall have the
wedding
before the mourning is over. What's the use
of standing on ceremony with the memory of an
old hunks like Sopus, quoth the widow. But the
widow reckoned without her host.
5
CHAPTER II.
OUR HERO GOES ABROAD TO FINISH HIS EDUCATION.
There was one part of Calvin's will that pleased
Stafford amazingly. I give and bequeath the
whole of my estate, real and personal, to my
nephew Stafford Sheffield. There was another
part that made him laugh outrightAnd
considering
that he was of age the day before
yesterday
and having the fullest confidence in those
lessons of self-denial I have taught him, I hereby
make him my sole executor. There was another
part that caused him to make wry faces
Provided
that he assume the name and arms of Sopus.
Plague take his name, and his arms too, quoth
StaffordNobody ever heard of either of them
before. Stafford Sheffield Sopus! Gods what an
anti-climax. I must see whether it is worth my
while to make such a sacrifice. Accordingly he
took to examining the items and there he
encountered
such stocks, such mortgages, such real
estates
,
that his heart forthwith relented; and he
announced to Miss Angelina that he was in future
to be Mr. Sopus. Sopus! screamed shebut
discretion and love stopped what farther she would
have said. That unfortunate young lady,
however
,
underwent a severe struggle between the
name of Mrs. Sopus and the half a million.
Affection
at length carried the day, and she decided
in favour of the half a million.
But it is astonishing what different views of
things people take at different times. It is like
looking through a Claude Lorraine glass, where
sunshine and shade, and twilight succeed each
other by turns. A young gentleman in
expectancy
,
thinks and sees very differently from a young
gentleman in possession. Besides, Stafford
away with the vulgar name of Sopus, which we
will not allow our hero to assume until sanctioned
by the legislative authorityBesides, our hero had
no conception of the real wealth of his uncle,
neither was he actually certain of inheriting it
until it fell into his mouth. Had it been fifty, or
even a hundred thousand, he might have brought
himself to bury himself, his talents, and his money,
in the oblivion of this new world. But half a
million! It was impossible for a young man with
half a million, to set himself down quietly at
home, marry and amen! I must first see the
world, that's settled, quoth he.
Accordingly one beautiful moonlight evening
he paid Angelina a visit, and the prudent mother
very considerately left the young people together.
Lovers can't resist the moon, thought she.
He'll certainly fix the day this night. So
thought the young ladybut ladies old and young
are often disappointed. Our hero beganMy
beloved Angelina, suffer me to call you mine, now
that I am abouthere the young lady thought
it was certainly comingnow that I am about
leaving you for a time, a year perhapsan age to
those who love like me.
Leave me! exclaimed she, in great surprise.
Yes, my own Angelina, I am going to make
myself worthy of you and of the happiness to
which I aspire. I am going to see the world and
finish my education, which I am sorry to say has
been greatly neglected.
You know best, answered the gentle
Angelina
,
but you had better talk to mamma, and she
was rising to ring the bell.
O no, don't, for heaven's sake! cried friend
Sopus, I can't bear to have the mysteries of our
love developed. I will write to your mother from
the Hook. Adieu! my best belovedthink of
me, write to me, and never forget me. I go to
return more worthy of thy love. So saying, he
darted out of the room in an agony of grief.
What shall I dowhat shall I do, cried
Angelina
,
as her mother entered the room.
You'd better make friends with the young
broker again, answered the discreet mother.
But perhaps, cried the daughter, perhaps
he'll fulfil his vows after he has finished his
learning
.
Pooh, girl, you talk like a simpleton.
If I were a widow, I dare say I should know
better, answered Angelina in a sulky whisper.
Our hero was sorry, very sorry, that he was
under
the necessity of going abroad and finishing his
education; but his sorrow diminished with the
distance from home. As he lost sight of the
Highlands of Neversink, the figure of the gentle
Angelina become dim. When he got to the
Banks of Newfoundland, and caught such a plenty
of cod-fish, it became indistinct, and by the time
he got to the English coast, it had almost
entirely
disappeared. He came to England with his
pockets full of money, and I advise every body not
to go there without it. They will neither get good
eating nor good manners. He went to a fox chase,
and wonderful to relate, came back pefectly cured of
his love. Accordingly the next morning he
despatched
a letter to Angelina, informing her that he had
been at a fox chase, and that the superior transports of
that noble amusement had satisfactorily convinced
him there was something in the world he loved
better than his adored Angelina. This being the
case, as a man of honour, he was bound to release
her from her engagement, which he now did,
wishing
she was only a man, that she might unite
with him in the pleasures of fox hunting. Three
weeks after the receipt of this letter, Angelina
married the broker.
5*
CHAPTER III.
PROGRESS OF OUR HERO'S EDUCATION.
There was but one drawback upon our hero's
happiness, on his arrival in England, and that was
his name, which he cursed ten times a day. I
wish I had thought of it in time, and I would have
applied to have Sopus put at the beginning
instead
of the end of my name, and then I could
have sunk the old tea merchant. Now it is too
late. But never mindany name is genteel that is
taken for an estate. But for all this he sunk the
Sopus, every where but in his banker's books, and
affected the name of Sheffield.
A mana young manwith little experience
and plenty of money, soon finishes his education
abroad. It generally costs him more money than
time. But time is money, quoth poor Richard
and spending money to save time is therefore
your true philosophy. Sopus had no more
philosophy
than a wild-goosebut nature often
instinctively
hits the true path of wisdom without a
guide. It was so with our hero. In about two years,
he got through the better half of half a million.
He spent money in equipageshe spent it in
horse racesat Brooke'sat taverns, and in worse
places than either of these. He fancied that his
half a million, was equal to a yearly income of
half a million, and therefore entered the lists of
folly with those who could afford to spend as much
in one year, as he could all his life. No wonder
he got on so fast with his education.
A party was going to Paris, having become
somewhat tired of the English modes of spending
money. There is nothing so tiresome, so sating,
so absolutely sickening and monotonous, as a life
of pleasure. While it incapacitates us for useful
or rational pursuits, it supplies their absence by
listlessness and vacuity. Our hero was tired of
England
,
notwithstanding he had actually acquired
some pretensions to the character of a Rou, which
of all others is the one most coveted by young men
of spirit, and most adored by young, aye, and old
ladies of ton in England. He had had an affair
had taken his degree at Doctors Commons, and
had only paid five thousand pounds for destroying
the connubial felicity of a most amiable man,
on the score of having proved that there was
no connubial felicity to destroy. Nothing was
wanting to the consummation of his fame but a
duel. But alas! that was impossible. The
injured
party was a clergyman. So our hero was
obliged to content himself with the honours of
gallantry, foregoing those of courage.
Other exploits had contributed to raise his
reputation
.
He had acted at a private theatre
made a speech at a meeting of the society for
something or otherfigured at a masquerade, and
been introduced to the king. If this is not worth
the half of half a million, I should like to know
what is?
On his way to Dover, our hero looked several
times out at the window of the post-chaise, but
soon fell asleep, and waked only to eat his meals.
I came to study men and mannersit is not
necessary
for my education, that I should study
landscapes and old Gothic trumperylet painters
and poets look to that. So he slept like a
genuine
tourist, from London to Dover; with the
interregnums
aforesaid.
In the steam-boat, he was politely accosted by a
plain, yet dignified old gentleman, who observed
that the boat was neither so elegant nor so swift
as some of those he had seen in America. Can't
say, indeed, said our hero, superciliously. I
beg pardon, said the old gentleman, I am an
American, and thought I recognized you as a
countryman
.
Friend Sopus was wroth: What! not
rubbed off the yankee yet? quoth he. Am I
right? asked the old gentleman. Whyyes,
said the other, I was born in New-Yorkbut
really, as I mean to spend the rest of my life
he ought to have said his moneyabroad, I have
given up my country. I am no longer an
American
.
Permit me to thank you, in the name of my
countrymen, said the old gentleman, making him
a low bow, and turning on his heel.
The companions of our hero burst into a loud
laugh.
What does the man mean? cried he.
He means that your countrymen are much
obliged to you.
If I thought so, I would
Say nothing more about the matter, quoth
his friend.
On arriving in Paris, Sopus called on the
American
minister, in whose person he recognized the
old gentleman before whom he had abjured his
country. Sopus made his visit as short as possible.
CHAPTER IV.
OUR HERO FINISHES HIS EDUCATION AT PARIS.
Having still plenty of money, our hero found no
difficulty in finding ways and means of
spending
it. Riches make themselves wings every
where, but no where do they fly away more
pleasantly than in Paris. He got acquainted
with the dancers at the Opera Francois, and
they furnished one wing. He got acquainted with
the beau monde, and they furnished another.
Finally, he got acquainted with some of the
gambling
houses, and they added two more. An
American gentleman never suspects foul play in
gambling with gentlemen, for he has no
experience
of that sort at home. But there are such
things abroad, even among titled personages. A
baron and a count attached themselves to him
particularly
,
and what was not a little remarkable,
never played without winning his money, although
they never won before in their lives, and were
especially mortified that this rare turn of fortune
should be at the expense of their particular friend.
Our hero, while administering at the grocery in
Pump-street, had whiled away the tedious
intervals
of leisure, by learning to play the fiddle a
little. Transplanted to the genial regions of the
Square, he took a master, and, as every man is
good for something, he discovered an aptitude for
music, and became a capital amateur. For the
last twenty years music has got the better of all
the arts and sciences in Europe. A Prima Donna
reigns more despotically, and gives herself ten
times more airs than a Semiramis; a fashionable
composer, outranks a first rate poet or philosopher;
and a man that can sing one of Rossini's songs,
never wants a supper. Our hero got acquainted
with Rossini, the vainest blockhead of the age, and
gained his confidence to such a degree, that he told
him in private, he had received immense offers
through the British Ambassador, who had been
specially instructed by his government. He
thought, however, he should decline them, lest it
might occasion a war between the two countries.
And what will the poor Dutchess desay?
quoth Rossini, taking a pinch of snuff out of a gold
box set with diamonds, and bearing the picture of
an emperor, which had been given him for
composing
Di tanti palpiti
, an air he had stolen
from the Tyrolese, and spoiled a little.
Sopus was now at the pinnacle. He was
introduced
to Mademoiselle Sontag, who sung him a
song which cost him five hundred guineas, in
suppers
and tickets for her benefit. He played the
fiddle for her, and she declared every where in
the first circles, that he played like a king.
Now every thing done in the manner of kings, is
perfect in Paris, except among the Liberals.
Accordingly
,
the Liberals abused, and the Ultras
praised; all Paris was divided into factions, and
Rossini become jealous lest our hero's fiddle should
cut out his piano. A musical war raged for some
time, and produced great discords in the beau
monde.
All this while our hero's money, which after all
is a sine qua non in the fashionable world, was
melting, or rather flying away rapidly. How
could it do otherwise when it had so many wings?
It is astonishing how little difference there is
between
a great deal and a little money. Every
thing depends on the owner. If he is a prudent
man, with moderate desires, he has always a plenty
of money; but if, like our hero, he has been
properly
initiated into the virtue of self-denial, let
him have boundless wealth, and he will always be
wanting. It is not the money, but the man, makes
the real difference between a competency and
wealth. All other is ideal.
The ultras were delighted with our hero's fiddle,
because he played like a king; and especially
because
he was an amateur, and it was charming to
get so expensive an article as music for nothing.
Among every people except barbarians and
semi-barbarians
,
it is the custom to devote all our
attention
to married ladies, leaving the young unmarried
ones to get married as soon as possible. The
unenlightened
semi-barbarians of this republic rail
at this as indicating corruption of manners. They
should have heard the sentiments of our hero,
derived from a first rate philosopher, on this
subject
.
He was accustomed to assert that this
fashion
of following married women was founded
in the strictest reason and propriety. In reason,
because a man could not pay particular attention
to a single lady without exciting disreputable
suspicions that he intended to marry her. In
propriety
,
because every body knew a man could not
well marry a woman who already had a husband,
and therefore nobody could suspect him of such
an intention. It deceived no one and therefore
there was no harm in it. The custom he
maintained
,
was moreover founded, in the highest
possible
respect for the sex, since it furnished the
best evidence of the virtue of the married ladies,
who certainly would not permit such attentions,
unless they felt themselves above all danger.
Finally
,
it was his opinion that the custom was
invaluable
to the interests of the world at large,
because
it encouraged marriages, as the only means
of gaining those attentions which are so
indispensable
to a fashionable lady.
But what do the husbands say to all this?
asked some one.
Husbands? why what business is it to them?
replied Sopus.
What a fine thing is travelling, if a man only
knows how to make good use of his opportunities
and how much he may improve his
countrymen
,
and more especially his countrywomen when
he comes home!
Friend Sopus finished his education as a rou,
and his estate about the same time. The count
and the baron never had such a run of luck
before
,
and fortune now seemed to make them ample
amends for all her former frowns. But a man
can't sleep forever, and all at once it occurred to
our hero that this unceasing run of the count and
baron was somewhat singular. He determined to
watch them, but he might as well have let it
alone; for they would not have completely finished
him in a month or two perhaps, if they had not
perceived with the quick instinct of guilt, that he
began to be a little suspicious of his friends.
6
Taking advantage of one of those tides on which
the affairs of men float to success or ruin, when
our hero was flushed with wine, and with a billet
from a dutchess who was a grandmotherergoa
perfect Ninon, they assailed him with the oft
practised
and oft detected arts of a gambler, and
completed
his ruin in a single night, at a single sitting.
They left him, as poor as old Sopus when he
began
the world with his horse and cart.
Our hero knew enough of the world, to know
that the less the world knows of a man's wants,
the better is he likely to be treated. He
therefore
said nothing about his being a ruined man.
But murder will out, and so will poverty, either at
the elbows or somewhere else. There is a
pestilent
servility commonly attendant upon it, that
never fails to betray it to the eyes of experience.
I never see a person that has treated me as a
common
acquaintance, or perhaps neglected me
entirely
for years, grow all at once very attentive,
in calling and leaving cards, but I begin to
suspect
the rogue is going down hilland, alas! for
human naturemy suspicions are generally
realized
in the end. From being impudent, or
rather
from possessing that open self-possession, and
happy confidence, which attends a man conscious
of wealth, and sure of a welcome reception, our
hero dwindled all at once into a mighty modest
gentleman, and sneaked into a drawing room as
quietly as a cat. Hereupon the bon ton began
to smell a rat. Nothing but poverty, thought the
wiser ones, can bring a fashionable rou to this
pass. The suspicion was verified not long after, in
his making a demonstration upon the purse of one
of his best friendsa man who delighted in his
music beyond measure so long as it cost him
nothing
.
But though he loved music, he loved his
money still better, and came off triumphantly,
with an apology and a quick step.
Our hero became melancholy and thoughtful.
Nay, he moralized, and railed at the ingratitude
and bad taste of the Parisians, who would give
every thing but money for a song. When a man
is unhappy abroad, ten to one, but he begins to
think of home, sweet home. I heard three
chimney
sweeps singing that charming song in the snow
the other day; so the sentiment must be
universal
.
Our hero first thoughtthen sighedthen
pined for home. Finally, he came to the resolution
of once more visiting his dear native country, and
marrying Angelinafor he had not heard of the
inconstancy of that faithless woman. I will
teach them, quoth he, to estimate properly the
value of a fiddlerthe delights of the opera, and the
opera dancersI will refine, enlighten, and
civilize
my semi-barbarous countrymen, who don't
know the exquisite propriety of courting the
married
,
and neglecting the single ladies, except the
latter are rich; and my more than semi-barbarous
countrywomen, who are as skittish as wild colts, a
sure sign of ill breeding. I will teach the young
gentlemen the proper value of whiskersthe
young ladies the importance of rougethe
married
women to flirt, and the married men to shut
their eyes. In short, I will be the Solon of the
fashionable world. The ladies will have me at
their partiesthe citizens will give me dinners
the single ladies will set their caps at me, and their
mammas will encourage them, so long as they
remain
ignorant of the mortality of old Sopus' money
bagsand that I shall take care they shall not
soon know. I'll marry an heiressI'll gallant the
married ladiesI'llBut where is the money
to clear you out of Paris, and pay your passage
across the seaswhispered that ill natured rascal,
matter of fact.
He cast about among his dear friends. He
went to the count and the baron, and stated his
case frankly. The count and the baron had only
won a couple of hundred thousands, and they
generously lent him ten thousand francs. You
may depend on my remitting you the money on
my arrival. My dear friend, say no morethe
money is yours. What a couple of generous
fellows are the count and the baron, quoth
Sopus
.
And having finished his education, he
embarked
for the new world.
CHAPTER V.
OUR HERO RETURNS TO HIS NATIVE CITY.
Rumour had wafted the fame of Sopus to the
uttermost ends of the city, even into the farthest
parts of Pump-street. It was reported by divers
supercargoes and sea captains, who had been to
London and Paris, that he moved in the highest
circlesthat he had lost a thousand guineas to the
Duke of York, on a racedined with the Duke
of Sussexhad his health drank at a sheep
shearing
,
at Holkhamand danced a minuet at
Almacks
with a dutchess, of three tails. These were
his English glories. At Paris he was in the first
circles toosupped with the Sontagwas
admitted
behind the scenes at the grand operaand
played duetts with the Grandissimo Rossini. The
very paving stones of the happy city, pricked up
their ears, when our hero first set foot upon them;
the fashionable world received him with open
arms; the young ladies looked up to him as a
glorious conquestthe young gentlemen studied
him as a model; the mothers took every
opportunity
of telling him how much he was admired by
their daughters; and the rich brokers hailed him
as an accession of specie, or a rise in bank stock.
6*
But they did not know he was only worth five
thousand franks in the world. What a
wonderful
improvement, cried Mrs Cridler, who had
never seen him before in her lifeWhat an
airO, there is nothing like travelling, cried Mrs.
CrawbuckWhat a head, a perfect Appleo,
cried Mrs. SmirkAnd Heavens! what a pair
of whiskers! cried Mrs. Rosencrantzat a small
party given in honour of our hero's arrival.
I wonder if they are natural, cried a young
lady of great inexperience, being just from the
Springs, after six weeks absence from town.
O certainly, answered Heartwell, a young
fellow of whom the reader will hear more anon,
certainly, it is a revival of an old fashion, with a
little alteration. Then the swallows built in old
men's beards, now they prefer young onesthat's
all, madam.
La! cried the inexperienced young lady,
you don't say so? a question not to be
answered
;
so Heartwell strolled away in search of farther
food for his satire. He was one of those men who
can say what they please. What a glorious
privilege
!
It is better than being an English bishop!
Sopusunhappy name to pollute our high bred
pagesSopus, after he had been in town about a
fortnight, thought he would go and see Miss
Angelina
.
It was rather an impudent thing, but
nothing
for a man who had finished his education
abroad. He knocked at the door of the widow,
and asked for the young lady. She was married
and had six children! Base woman!
exclaimed
our hero to himself, I'll go and reproach her
for her falsehood. It is true I resigned her when I
went abroad, but how could she tell whether I
would not have claimed her when I came home.
But these women have no patience. He went
according to the direction given him, and found
the house where his mistress resided, large and
splendid. The broker had got rich, heaven knows
how, it is not my business. Faith, said Sopus,
the lady is not without excuse. He rung, and
was admitted. The lady of the house came
forward
without knowing to whom, as we don't
announce
names here. She was as fat and as ugly
asthere is no comparison that will do her
justice
.
Sopus was struck into a cold shiver at the
precipice he had escaped, and finding the lady did
not immediately recollect him, made a low bow,
saying he had unfortunately mistaken the house,
and retreated with vast precipitation. I forgive
her, said he, for not waiting for me; and
Angelina
told every body of the strange man with
great whiskers, that had called to see her by
mistake
.
Our hero notwithstanding the numerous
invitations
he received, and the life of pleasure he led,
felt himself frequently at a loss for excitement.
Excitement! that is as necessary to people that
have nothing to do as air is to animated nature.
It is in search of excitement, that men plunge
into
vices, and women into follies if not crimes.
Excitement is the will o' the wisp, that leads to a
thousand paths of misery and repentance; that
like jealousy increases by what it feeds on, and
finally from gentle impulses, proceeds to excesses
that mar the ends of our existence, and end in
irretrievable misery and disgrace. When I hear
young ladies talk as they do about wanting
excitement
,
said Heartwell one day to me, I figure to
myself a being sated with all the rational delights
of the world, wasted by indolenceweakened by
dissipationpampering her imagination with
dangerous
delusions, and sighing for fleeting
pleasures
either beyond her reach or if within it, fatal
in the enjoyment. So said Heartwell, but he
was sometimes a most intolerable proser.
When men lose their taste for innocent
amusements
and rational pleasures, if they are not
restrained
either by conscience, or by want of means
and opportunity, they begin to seek those that are
neither one nor the other. A life of pleasure is
therefore, too often a life of progressive
deterioration
.
He who is tired of the company of pure
and innocent females, sinks too often down to the
society of those who are not so. He to whom the
gentle smiles of young unsuspecting preference,
the speaking eye full of innocent yet expressive
meanings, has become incapable of making his
heart throb, and his imagination dance, will most
likely seek these excitements in tumultuous revelry,
or lascivious debaucheries. He, in short, who has
properly completed his education abroad, cannot
possibly live without the excitement of something a
little piquant in morals, a little spice of foreign
seasoning
,
in short he will require the excitement of
something either unattainable, or attainable only
at the price of some little delicious fashionable
wickedness such as is quite compatible with the
character of a gentleman. It was so with our
heroto him fruit was of no value unless it was
forbidden fruit. He would not have picked up a
pippin on the highway, but he was ready to risk
his neck in climbing after a crab apple. He pined
for two things especially. A single lady with
plenty of money for a wife; a married one with
plenty of beauty for a friend. To these objects
he was resolved to devote himself. In the mean
time, he made acquaintance with several
fashionable
young men of fortune about town, whom he
tried all he could to enlighten in the ways of the
old world. Among the rest he became acquainted
with Heartwell, a youth of about seven-and-twenty,
tall, handsome, well born, well brought up, and
well educated. Heartwell had been abroad too,
but he brought home something besides vices and
follies. He brought home a diminished
admiration
of Europe, and an increased admiration of
his own country. Simple, yet dignified high bred
manners, a simple taste in dress, a fine, open, manly
heart, and not whiskers enough for a humming
bird to build his nest in. He was in the main,
good natured and tolerant of foibles, but withal
this, there was a vein of sarcastic humour about
him, that some people who dreaded it, called
ill-nature
.
CHAPTER VI.
ROUISM AND THE FINE ARTS.
Our hero had brought home with him a thorough
contempt for his own country. Ignorant himself
of literature, and the first rudiments of the fine arts,
still he fancied that having been abroad, he must of
necessity be highly accomplished both in one and
the other. He had never read any thing but the
lowest periodicals in foreign literature: such as
Blackwood's Magazine, and La Belle Assemblee,
and from these had learned all the self-sufficient
arrogance for which they are so peculiarly
distinguished
.
Without knowing what his
countrymen
had done, or being able to judge of what they
were capable of doing, he adopted the slang of
those who knew as little as himself. He
pronounced
them destitute of genius, devoid of taste,
and ignorant of all the refinements of civilization.
It is a common foible with my countrymen abroad,
basely to surrender their country to the scoffs of
witlings, and to imagine they exempt themselves
from the general condemnation, by joining in the
sneer or the laugh.
Our country affords but few resources for idle
men. They are not yet sufficiently numerous and
rich to form a separate caste, and afford
themselves
the resources of a perpetual succession of
amusements. Sopus was soon at a loss what to
do with himself, for he could not be always
playing
the fiddle, or devoting himself to the married
ladies. He sometimes found them actually busy;
sometimes not fit to be seen; and sometimes,
though of course very rarely, he found them out.
What, however, most annoyed him, was their
condign
ignorance of fashionable life abroad, in
supposing
that his visits were either to their husbands
or their daughters. One of them in particular,
came nigh to causing his utter annihilation. He
had paid her most obsequious homage at all places
where he happened to meet her, and from the
smiles and simperings with which it was received,
had already began to cherish hopes that his person
and accomplishments would prove irresistible.
One delicious morning in the month of June,
when the purity of the air, and the luxurious
blandness of the weather reminded him of Italy,
he called upon the lady, at an hour when he knew
the husband was absent. He found her in the
graceful undress of a matron, sitting on a rich
ottoman of pale yellow silk. The curtains of the
windows were of a pink colour, and as the sun
shone upon them, threw a rich tint, and delicious
glow upon the face, the arms, and the neck of the
beautiful wife. Sopus mistook it for a blush, and
at that moment determined to make his
declaration
.
The lady had been mending a silk stocking.
He took it up, and it afforded him a theme for
some very pretty little sly hints and innuendoes,
which a truly modest woman never understands.
Our hero's experience had made him estimate all
women by the same standard. I must speak plainer,
thought he, and allow her at least the honour of
a summons before she surrenders.
He dropped on his knee, and exclaimed
Madam, I am the most miserable of men!
I am sorry for it, Mr. Sopus, replied the lady,
taking up a stitch.
You pity me then, angel of a woman?
If you are miserable, I certainly do.
And pity is akin to love.
So they say, replied the lady, quietly.
But will you not permit me to loveto hope
to be happy?
Ask my daughter.
Zounds! thought Sopus, what a barbarous
country, where the mothers ask the consent of
the daughters, instead of the daughters the
mothers
.
Your daughter, madam?
Yes; I never mean to give my daughter away
without her own consent. I'll send her to you,
and the good matron took the silk stocking, and
quietly walked out of the room.
Friend Sopus was in a dilemma. The daughter
was a fine, intelligent, well-bred girl, much
admired
by Heartwell; but her father was a hale,
hearty, middle aged man, and though rich, might
not die in half a century. These fellows, quoth
our hero, nine times in ten, outlive their heirs
but mum. The young lady entered, curtsied, I
mean bowed, and sat down on the sofa, with as
little emotion as if the room had been empty.
These American women have no more sensibility
and warmth than a cucumber, quoth our hero.
At length the young lady broke silence.
My mother mentioned you had something
particular to communicate, Mr. Sopus, said
she, while a little shade of a smile passed over
her face, and settled in the corner of her eye,
as she pronounced his name. Ah! that cursed
name, thought he, I shall never prosper under it;
and now the fortune is gone, I wish the name
were gone with it.
Madam, said he, and though he had finished
his education abroad, he actually felt a little
awkward
,
do you mean to go to the fancy ball
to-night
?
The young lady laughed. I believe I shall.
Well thenhemhamay I have the
superlative
7
pleasure of dancing the first cotillion with
you?
Certainly, Mr. Sopus, and again that wicked
laugh lurked in the corner of her eye.
Sopus made a profound bow, and so did the
lady, not being able to curtesy, on account of the
Cantelosand thus they parted.
What a barbarous country! thought our hero,
where a married woman don't know whether you
are making love to herself or her daughter.
Well, Julia, said the mother, are you
engaged
?
To dance the first cotillion, said Julia; and
she threw herself on the sofa, and laughed till she
got a great pain in her side.
Coming out of the house, he encountered
Heartwell
,
who was passing up the street.
So, said he, you've been paying your
morning
devoirs to Miss Wingate, a fine girl.
Delightful, answered the other, and fell to
praising her to the skies.
Heartwell paused, and looked a little serious;
but suddenly resuming his wonted free and
spirited
manner, he proposed to take Sopus to the
Academy of Arts, to see a collection of original
paintings, by the most celebrated masters of the
Italian and Flemish schools, exhibiting there.
An Academy of Arts! quoth Sopus, Pooh,
what can you have worth seeing there? But
come, any thing to kill time.
Ah! cried he, as they entered the exhibition
room, and saw the very worst collection ever
imposed
upon the good people of the city, labelled
with the names of Michael Angelo, Raphael,
Domenichino
,
Salvator and the Carracci. Ah!
really now, this is something like; I declare this
really does honour to the country. It reminds me
of the gallery at Florence. Why the names are
the very same. Whereupon he out with his glass
after the manner of travelled men, and fixing
himself
opposite to an immeasurable daub, full of
green lions and brown trees, labelled Sal. Rosa,
began to be quite enthusiastic. What
expression
in the trees! What grace in the very rocks!
What dignity in the lions! Any body could tell
they were the kings of the beasts! There is
nobody
after all equal to Sally Rosa, for persuasive
grace of attitude, softness of expression, and
felicity
of
groping
, as he was pleased to call itI
knew her in Florence. She was a most elegant
woman.
Heartwell stuffed the whole catalogue into his
mouth, and walked away at a quick step. He
however returned in a few moments.
You are right, said he, Miss Sally was
particularly
remarkable for all these characteristics.
I see you are a connoiseur.
A piece of a one, answered he, pulling up
his stock, and adjusting his striped gingham
collar
.
But my dear Heartwell, never again call
a foreign lady Miss or Mistress. It is Madame or
Signora Sally Rosa.
I shall bear it in mind, said the other.
After spending some time in pointing out the
various excellencies of this rare collection of
originals
,
by the great Italian and Flemish masters,
in which Sopus displayed equal taste and
accuracy
,
he was carried into the apartment where the
statuary and busts are deposited.
What in the name of all that is monstrous and
vulgar, have we got here? cried he, stopping
opposite the Laocoon.
'Tis the famous Laocoon, said Heartwell.
LaLaocoon, said Sopus, who is it by?
The name of the artist is somewhat doubtful.
It is supposed to be a work of great antiquity.
Yes any body can see it must have been done
in the infancy of the arts. The artist did well to
keep his name secret. But who is this tall,
long-spliced
,
sprawling fellow, standing on one leg?
That is the Apollo Belvidere. You must have
seen it before.
O, ayeI think I do recollect something of a
wooden statue, stuck up at the Belvidere House,
where my uncle's club used to meet. I suppose
they call it the Apollo Belvidere on that account.
Can you tell me who carved it?
No, I regret to say that I have forgot it, replied
Heartwell, again having recourse to the system of
gagging.
No matter, said the other; It is not worth
remembering. Let us go back, I want to take
another look at the Sallyor as these vulgarians
call her, Sal.
Coming out of the Academy through the park,
Heartwell said something about the City Hall,
which set Sopus retailing the cant he had learned
from the foreign periodicals.
I've seen a handsomer stable than that, in
England, said he. Do you remember Lord
Darlington's stables?
No, said Heartwell, I confess I did not pay
any particular attention to stables.
No! said the other in astonishment. Were
you never at Tattersall's?
Never.
Why what the dl did you travel for?
To see the world, replied Heartwell.
And where could you see it better than at
Tattersall's
?
Why, as far as grooms, jockies, black legs,
and sporting heroes go to the formation of a world.
I don't know a better place. But I had no
ambition
to figure in such society.
No! answered the other, with a look of
wonder
.
But did you ever see Carlton House?
I did, and thought it a disgrace to the nation
and its king.
7*
What, when it was lighted up with gas
lamps?
Even when it was lighted up with gas lamps.
But what think you of Windsor Castle. Is
not that a palace worthy of a king?
Certainly; but that is a building of another
age, and even the bad taste of the present has
not been able to spoil it altogether. Indeed I
may say of England, and of all Europe in fact,
that so far as my experience goes, there is no
building
erected within the last two hundred years,
that can claim the rank of a model. All the most
perfect specimens of architecture, are of a date
anterior to the settlement of this country, and our
people are no more to be reproached for a bad
taste in architecture, than those nations which
have not any more than ourselves, produced
master
pieces within that period. The cathedrals
which comprise all the treasures of architecture in
England, and nearly all of later origin in
Europe
,
are without exception comparatively ancient.
They belong to other times; they are the proper
boast of our ancestors, and as we are equally the
descendants of the different nations of Europe,
with the present race of Europeans, we have as
fair a right to plume ourselves upon the triumphs
of former ages It is so with painting, sculpture
and poetry. The highest honours in all these,
belong
to ages, anterior to our existence as a
separate
nation. The modern Greeks might as well
boast of their Homer, as the modern English of
their Shakspeare and Milton, who were as much
superior to their Byrons and their Moores, as
Homer
is to a modern Greek rhymer. The truth is,
and I challenge any man of taste to deny it,
that the two Banks in Philadelphia, the Little
Phnix of New-York, and the Capitol at
Washington
,
are in their way, more perfect specimens,
approaching nearer to the most perfect remains
of Greece, than any buildings erected in England
or on the continent of Europe within the same
period.
Heartwell, who all this time had been looking
at the City Hall, turned to see what effect his
harangue
had produced upon the rou, and found
him busily employed in jerking pebbles at a tree,
a little way off. I'll bet you ten, I hit it three
times out of five, quoth he.
CHAPTER VII.
THE ADVENTURES OF THE ROU.
Our hero soon after his return from abroad, had
made some inquiries about his relatives in the
Bowery and Pump-street; but he did not find
their society worthy cultivating. They had little
money, and plenty of heirs; so he cut their
acquaintance
.
It was in one of these pious
pilgrimages
to the land of his forefathers, that he
caught sight of a very pretty woman, who was
standing in the doorway of a neat, two story brick
house, with a brass knocker of most intolerable
lustre. There was an air of sprightly vivacity
about her, and something of a coquettish cast of
the eye, that attracted his attention. He looked
at her, and she looked at him; he smiled, and so
did she. Our hero was going to walk up the
steps, when she ran in and shut the door in his
face. He however saw her looking out at the
window at him as he passed down the street. On
making inquiry, he found the lady was the wife of
a rich butcher; that she was reckoned a very gay
lady, and delighted in walking up and down
Broadway. Sopus was a handsome man, at least
in his own opinion. He had a short neck, spindle
legs, and one shoulder was a little higher than the
other. But a high, stiff cravat, wide pantaloons,
and a little of the tailor's handy work, disguised
these trifling defects. It was a blessed thing the
invention of loose trowsers for a ball dress.
Before
that, a man could only disguise his legs in an
undress; now it is no matter whether he has any
legs at all. But his whiskers were what he prided
himself upon most especially.
The lady with the mischievous laughing eye, ran
strangely in the head of our hero. The next day, the
next, and the next, he promenaded Pump-street, and
never failed to find her at the window, where, it
was his firm opinion, she stationed herself on
purpose
to see him. He determined to exhibit a
touch of the rou. He pondered on the best way
of making his approaches, whether by letter or in
person, and decided upon the former,
remembering
how the worthy Mrs. Wingate had mistaken
his declaration on a former occasion.
Accordingly
he wrote her a letter, of which I regret
there is no copy extant, the butcher's lady having
used it to curl her hair, after showing it to her
husband. The slayer of oxen was at first
exceedingly
wroth, and talked about using his cleaver;
but being rather a good natured man for a butcher,
he passed it off with a laugh, and agreed that
they would have a little sport with our rou.
The letter was accordingly answered in a style
sufficiently encouraging, and was replied to by
another, in which our hero ardently solicited an
interview. After a proper delay, an answer was
received, saying that if he would walk out to
Corlaer's Hook, at about one in the morning, and
stand under a certain tree, she would meet him
without fail, as her husband was going into the
country to buy cattle. Our hero thought this
rather
a curious place for the month of December,
but considering that a faint heart never won a fair
lady, he determined not to fail. Accordingly,
when the appointed time arrived, Sopus put on
two flannel waistcoats, two pair of drawers, two
pair of stockings, and a pair of India rubber shoes
and departed from his lodgings about twelve
o'clock. It was a bitter cold night, as well as
dark and gloomy; no lights twinkled from the
shops in Chatham Row, save here and there the
gorgeous emanations from an apothecary's
window
.
The gas was out, and the good people
snug in bed. Encumbered as he was with clothes,
his progress was rather slow, and the distant
church clock struck one just as he arrived at the
great elm tree, which whilome waved its broad
branches in Cannon' garden.
Gradually the night became dark as pitch, and
a profound silence reigned far and near,
interrupted
only by the barking of curs, those pestilent
disturbers
of the night, who seem to envy the
slumbers
of their betters, and do all they can to mar
them. The keen north-easter, cut its way into
his very marrow, and made his teeth chatter, and
his knees knock against each other. He shrunk
close to the lee side of the tree, and devoutly
wished himself under six blankets at home. After
waiting about half an hour, during which he was
gradually turning to stone, he heard distant
footsteps
of horses approaching, and the sound of
carriage wheels. Thank fortune! thought he,
she is coming in a carriage. The carriage
approached
,
and either from accident, the darkness,
or some other cause, halted directly opposite to
where he stood. Sopus started forward, and was
proceeding to open the door, when he was
arrested
by a violent scream from within. Thieves!
robbers! murder! cried a shrill female voice.
Hush!its meits me, whispered Sopus.
Thieves! robbers! murder! shouted the voice
louder than ever, while the coachman, being I
suppose actually congealed with frost and fear,
never thought of lashing his horses forward. A
watchman at a distance, waked out of a deep
sleep, and knocked three times with his cudgel on
the curb stone. Our hero knew the meaning of
that awful sound from sad experience, and at
length perceiving there must be some mistake in
the business, gathered himself together, and ran
away as fast as his multiplicity of clothes would
permit. The watchmen came up, and finding
him gone, followed the sound of his retreating
footsteps over the frozen pavement, and coming
up with our hero knocked him down, ordering him
at the same time to stand still. Luckily, he was
so well fortified with clothing, that the blow did
him little harm. Our hero was taken from hence to
the watch-house, and from thence to the police,
where he was examined, and behaved like a man
of the strictest honour. He determined not to
betray his mistress, and accordingly his story was
so lame, and ill put together, that the justice was
on the point of committing him, previous to which
he ordered a search of his person. Finding no
weapons of offence, and seeing how he was
dressed
,
his worship sagely concluded that no man in
his senses would go out to rob on the highway
without weapons, and in such a multiplicity of
garments; he ordered his discharge, and contented
himself with a caution against stopping coaches
after midnight. The next day a facetious
reporter
to a newspaper, published the whole
matter
,
with the usual exaggerations; but being a
discreet man, he did not mention names. He
only gave the initials, and described our hero so
accurately that every body knew who was meant.
He underwent the usual ordeal of quizzing; but
kept his secret like a true man, only giving certain
shrewd hints which nobody could misunderstand.
The next day he received a note, left by the
butcher's boy as he stopt at his lodgings to deliver
some beef, in which the lady deeply lamented the
disappointment she had been under the necessity
of inflicting upon him. Her husband had been
taken ill, and was now confined to his bed. Now
therefore was the opportunity for them to meet
nearer at home. The note then proceeded to state
that, precisely at nine in the evening, she would
be in the summer house at the back of her
garden
,
where she would expect him. She then
proceeded
to give particular directions about
climbing
the wall, opening the door, and finding his
way in the dark. The writer concluded, by
exacting
the pledge of his honour that he would
behave
discreetly and like a gentleman. Our hero
that evening dressed himself in his best; curled
his hair, perfumed his whiskers, and sprinkled his
handkerchief with otto of roses. At the
appointed
hour he stood at the garden wallluckily there
were no stars to tell tales, and the babbling moon
was shining on some other stealing lover, in some
other hemisphere.
The hour struck nine. Our hero climbed the
wall, descended safely, and proceeded towards
the summer house, the door of which being ajar,
he cautiously entered. It was dark as pitch. He
advanced a few steps when his foot slipt and he
fell sprawling on the floor, which seemed wet and
slippery. Where are you my beloved,
whispered
he as he rose. Here, replied a voice in
tones sweeter than the zephyr. Sopus imagined
he saw the shadowy figure of his mistress
approaching
,
and precipitated himself towards it
with all the ardour of high wrought expectation.
He did not clasp a shadow. At that blissful
moment
,
a hundred lights seemed to blaze
spontaneously
on all sides, and the astonished rou,
discovered
to his utter dismay that he was embracing
the dead bodynot of his mistress, but of an
illustrious
porker, which had that very day gained
a premium for being the fattest in the market.
Ten butcher's boys with the butcher at their head,
were now standing about him with candles in their
hands, and the butcher's dog held fast to the skirts
of his coat. Sopus recoiled with horror from
8
the embraces of the amorous swine, and had a
genuine rou ever been ashamed of himself, our
hero had been the man.
After enjoying his disastrous plight for some
time, the butcher called off his dog, and addressed
our hero as follows: Young man, I had intended
to make these lads give thee a hearty flogging,
but you cut such a pretty figure, and have been
so well punished already, that I will let you off
this time. But take care how you write any more
lettersmy wife has shown me all as she received
them, and she herself planned this scheme. It is
lucky she did, for had I found it out myself, I
would have broken every bone in your body. Go
now about your business.
Our hero went home disconsolate, and when he
saw himself in his mirror, came near to running
stark mad. He had been inveigled into a
slaughter
house, the floor of which was purposely
flooded with the blood of bulls and sheep. His
whole figure was bloodyhis hands reeking with
gore, and his face having come in contact with
the snout of the prize piggy, was most gloriously
incardined. He threw off his clothes and went to
bed in despair. The next morning the chamber
maid fell into fits at the sight of his clothes, and
it is clear that if Captain Morgan had been
missing at that time, Sopus would certainly have
been taken up for a free mason.
CHAPTER VIII.
THE FANCY BALL AT THE CITY ASSEMBLY ROOM.
The butcher and his wife, not belonging as yet
to good society, not having removed to a
fashionable
part of the town, the story of the Pump-street
amour, did not come to the ears of the beau
monde. The laugh was confined to the inglorious
regions of the Bowery, and Sopus soon forgot his
bloody disasters. He continued, as before, a star
in the milky-way of fashion, and though his five
thousand francs had long since melted into thin
air, he did not want money for his necessary
occasions
.
A man who has finished his education
abroad, in the proper schools, knows how to
economize
,
as well as to spend. Our hero hired
lodgings in a cheap little cross street, where he
boiled his own kettle of a morning, spunged for
an invitation to dinner, and failing of that,
resorted
to a cheap ordinary, and took his tea with the
ladies. To save his friends trouble, he had his
cards left at a fashionable hotel, by arrangement
with the bar keeper, where he was never at home
by any accident. As to keeping himself in
spending
money, a man who had lost a couple of
hundred
thousands to such clever fellows as the count
and the baron, could hardly fail of winning, now
and then, at cards and dice. He had paid enough
in all conscience for his experience. I do not say
that he played foully; but he had studied chances,
runs of luck, runs of the cards, and above all, he
had studied character and faces, till he had reduced
it almost to a certainty that he could, in the end,
make something out of other people's inexperience.
By choosing his company, and playing his cards
well, he accordingly managed to secure to
himself
an honourable independence from day to day.
In the mean time the whole town was talking
about the fancy ball to be given at the Assembly
Room, and the young ladies studying costumes,
till one or two of them actually lost their wits in
the perplexity of choosing a character. It was
reported that one lady changed her mind
twenty-four
times in one day, but the number was
probably
exaggerated.
For my part, said Miss Macfaddle to Miss
Maccubbin, I mean to go as a milkmaid.
Charming! cried Miss Maccubbin, your
skin is as white as milk, and you'll look beautiful.
But what do
you
mean to go in? asked Miss
Macfaddle
Why, I am balancing between a Mary queen
of Scots, and a Virgin of the Sun. Mamma is for
the queen, but I prefer the virgin, if papa will only
give me a real gold sun; I'm determined not to
be put off with a gilt one. O, here comes Miss
Fitzpoisson, to talk us to death of what she can't
and what she can afford. She always looks like a
dowdy, in that everlasting pink gauze. But, poor
thing, I suppose she can't afford any better.
Miss Fitzpoisson now entered with Heartwell,
and the conversation received a fresh impulse.
Pray how are you going, Miss Fitzpoisson?
asked Miss Macfaddle.
Why, at first, I thought of going as a Spanish
lady, but my mamma thought the hat and feathers
would cost too much. Then I thought of going
as a sultana, but papa insisted on my appearing
in the character of a Christian woman. Then I
thought of wearing my grandmother's wedding
dress, but brother George, told me there was no
occasion to make myself look uglier than I was.
Then I thought of a Gipsy, but brother Tom said
I looked too much like a Gipsy already. Then
I thought of a Swiss girl, but brother Frank told
me the less of my ancles I showed the better.
And then, and then, I determined not to go at all.
Bravo, thought Heartwell, a member of congress
could not have made a better speech about
nothing
,
or come to a more logical conclusion.
But have you heard, said Miss Fitzpoisson
What? what? asked the ladies all at once.
Why, they say Mrs. widow Elevenstone is going
as Zephyr, and her everlasting beau, Mr. Crickback,
as Cupid. It will be capital, for you know she is
8*
so fat she can hardly walk, and he so lean he can
scarcely stand.
They had better personate Pharaoh's dream,
said Heartwell. She seven years of plenty, he
seven years of famine.
Lord, said Miss Macfaddle, how you talk.
How could they dress like ears of corn.
Why in green silk, and satin hair, and a sheaf
of corn under each arm.
Well, I declare, that would be very pretty,
said Miss Maccubbin, but what character do you
mean to go in?
O, I mean to go as Mount tna.
Mount tna! exclaimed the ladies all at
once, how will you manage about the smoke?
You shall see.
I can tell you something better than that,
cried Miss Macfaddle, little Mr. Shorter is going
as puss in boots. He has got a catskin robe and
whiskers, and is learning to purr.
Well, I declare, said Miss Maccubbin, it
will be quite allegorical.
Categorical, you mean, said Heartwell.
I don't mean any such thing, said the lady,
pouting.
But who is to play my Lord Marquis of
Carabas
?
O, young Middlings; you know his father was
a miller.
Does he mean to play the drowning scene?
The lady gave Heartwell a great blow with her
glove, and the party separated to go and talk of
the fancy ball elsewhere.
CHAPTER IX.
MORE OF THE GRAND FANCY BALL.
Our hero studied six days and seven nights, for
an idea of a dress to open the ball with Julia
Wingate, and at length fixed upon that of a
Spanish cavalier, which he calculated on
borrowing
from a theatrical friend.
And now the day had come, and the night was
approaching which was for ever to be remembered
in the annals of the queen of the west, as the night
of the great fancy ball at the City Assembly Room.
Not the feast of the Centaurs, nor the hunting of
the Calydonian boar, the two great frolics of
antiquity
,
were ever half so renowned as we intend
this ball shall be, in future mirrors of fashion.
None but the ignoble vulgar slept that night or
the night before. Young gentlemen packed up
their whiskers, and came all the way from
Philadelphia
,
Baltimore, and Boston; and several young
ladies had their heels frost bitten in travelling
from the uttermost ends of the earth in prunelle
shoes. Bandboxes, the size of bathing tubs, were
seen parading through the streets with little
milliners
under them; the young gentlemen of the
fancy stores had scarcely time to put their hair in
papers, and poor Monsieur Manuel died a few days
after, of the vast exertions he made in reducing
the rebellious curls of young ladies in a state of
nature, to obedience.
It being impossible to convey to the unhappy
reader who was not present at the ball, any idea
of its collective splendours, I shall follow the
example
of Homer, and attempt it through the
agency of particular characters and incidents. If
I cannot describe the accumulative horrors of the
fight, I shall relate what damsels conquered, and
what dandies fell on this melancholy occasion.
First, Forcible Feeble, though cased in the
invulnerable
armour of indifference, was cured of
an obstinate fit of silence, by the magic influence
of a wedding dress of his grandmother. Next,
Peter Popinjay, who had long declared his
determination
not to commit matrimony for love or
money, yielded to the charms of a little Tyrolese,
in short petticoats. There too, fell Nimrod Sparrow,
whose heart had never throbbed before, save at the
sight of a covey of partridges, a horse that could trot
sixteen miles an hour, or a dog at a dead point.
On this occasion, Cupid bent his bow made of the
arching eyebrow of Miss Looqueer, stringing it with
a hair of her silken eye lashes, and shot a ray from
her sparkling eye, that melted the stony heart of
the mighty hunter, and three weeks after turned
him into a hunter of ladies. There, too, was
Colonel
Jiggleton, a gallant son of Mars, translated
into a votary of Venus, by the bad French of a
little Parisian milliner; and there, though last not
least, was the Honourable Garrulous Guzzleton,
who spoke more speeches, and ate more canvass
backs than any single member of the lower house,
west of the Blue Ridge, struck dumb by the
incessant
chatter of a beautiful lady, dressed as the
Goddess of Silence, with finger on her lip. But I
will proceed no farther with this bill of mortality,
lest it should make the reader melancholy.
Heartwell had taken with him to the ball, a
young Italian count, whom he had known in Italy.
Count G was somewhat literary, a great
admirer
of the ladies, and zealously musical. He
was a man well read in books, and having seen all
that was worth seeing in the old, had come to the
new world, in search of something new. The
count requested Heartwell to play the Diable
Boiteaux
for that night, and take him under his
special
protection. Accordingly they strolled about
without joining in the dances, conversing and
criticising as the case might be.
Who is that lady? asked the count, I mean
that rather pretty lady, eating a sandwich with
such approbation?
That? O that's a Mrs. Smith.
And the one on her left, who is making the
most of her time by discussing an ice cream, while
the opposite couple is going through the figure?
That is another Mrs. Smith.
And the tall, fine looking woman on the left
of the other, eating a jelly? Upon my word, the
ladies cannot be accused of wasting their time!
O, that's another of the Mrs. Smiths.
Why, good heavens! how many wives has
that Mr. Smith?
They are the wives of different Mr. Smiths.
Yonder is another.
Good, cried the count, taking snuff, I
believe
in my soul, your people have all one name,
like the parrots.
The attention of the count was next attracted
by a young lady of a singularly delicate person,
and an air of fashion about her quite taking.
Come, Monsieur Diable, do your duty, and tell
me who she is, and what she is thinking about?
That young lady, said Heartwell, belongs
to an old and somewhat decayed family, which is
still proud of what it once was. But for all that,
she will marry the son of her grandfather's
cobbler
,
who is very rich. The young man wants
blood, the young lady money; both parties will be
suited. She has just settled the matter in her
own mind.
Here the soul of Heartwell flashed into his eyes,
on seeing our old friend Sopus, who dressed in a
superb Spanish suit, he had borrowed from his
theatrical friend, was dancing with Julia
Wingate
with all his might, and to give him his due,
exceedingly well. The young lady seemed
delighted
with her partner, and performed her part
with infinite grace and vivacity, listening between
whiles to the compliments of our rou, with great
appearance of condescension. The truth is, she
was a little piqued at the neglect of Heartwell,
who had been in the room at least twenty minutes,
without speaking to her. Now when young ladies
are piqued, ten to one, they do exactly what they
ought not to do. Julia flirted with Sopus, whom
she despised, only to mortify the man she
adadmired
and respected beyond all others.
Heartwell
saw all this, and though he believed in his
heart that Julia must in her heart despise the rou,
yet he grew at once violently jealous. Such is
man when he is in love, and his vanity and
affections
are unnaturally overheated. The count
twitched his elbow, You play Monsieur de
Diable
badly. Who is that lady with her mouthful,
talking to the gentleman in blue whiskers?
That? O that is Mrs. Copper Smith, who
does the honours of the city to all strangers of
distinction
,
very much to the credit of good society.
Heartwell was every moment getting more ill
natured
,
as he looked at Sopus and Julia.
Her husband, continued he, is a plain,
honest
old man, such as no sensible person would dare
to laugh at, except when he is playing the fish out
of water, at a fancy ball, or giving a dinner to a
foreign minister. He received a liberal
education
,
that is at the expense of other people, and
got rich by getting and saving. If you go to
make a bargain with him, he will cavil for the
ninth part of a hair, and then if you are a great
man, he'll give you a dinner that costs a hundred
pounds. In short, though he gets his money like
a negro, he spends it like a gentleman. The
family, continued Heartwell, looking like a
savage
at Sopus, the family put themselves
forward
on all occasions; call on all strangers of
note; impose themselves as the best company of
the city; stuff them with good eating, and tire
them to death with caricatures of fashionable
frivolity
.
The consequence is that the really well
bred people, who might feel inclined to be civil
to strangers, shrink from them while beset by
these obtrusive vulgarians, and thus strangers go
away with an impression that there is no more
refined and intelligent society in the city.
Only a little spice of liberty and equality,
said the count.
I understand you, replied the other, but
there is no equality in manners; political privileges
have nothing to do with drawing rooms. The end
of social intercourse is pleasure and improvement.
Now there can be neither one nor the other, where
one half of a company is composed of ignorant
vulgar, the other of refined and well educated
persons
.
The first will feel too ill at ease to
improve
;
the other will only become more vain by
comparison.
Heavens! cried the count, what a
mouthful
,
as the pretty Mrs. Copper Smith discussed
a huge pickled oyster. But now I think of it,
I am sure I've seen the lady eat before. I have
it. They invited me last summer to what they
called a French breakfast in the country, and
nearly killed me with a fricassee of Guinea hens.
Heartwell laughed a very little at this; for just
then Julia gave Sopus a tap with her fan. It was
in fact a most equivocal laugh.
But you say true, continued the count, such
people are highly useful and respectable in their
proper sphere; but when they thrust themselves
forward in fashionable society, and when they do
they are almost always the most noisy and
obtrusive
,
they throw ridicule on the whole city. You
should serve them as we do in Italy. Treat them
with such profound respect, and insuperable
gravity
,
that they feel uncomfortable, and never come
again. But come, show me now a specimen of
what you call really well bred.
Look round, said Heartwell, make use of
your free masonry.
The count looked round, and at length fixed on
a young lady apparently quite plainly dressed,
and who was quietly conversing with her brother.
She does honour to your sagacity. Observe
9
her. She is one of the best bred, accomplished
young women about town. Neither spoiled nor
likely to be. She is rich in her own right; she
dances with a delightful and chastened grace;
sings in the first style of expression; possesses a
mind highly cultivated; reads better than any
body I ever heard; is endowed with the best
principles
,
tastes, and habits; and yet nobody knows
all this except her immediate family circle.
But how? how comes it she is not surrounded
by a hundred admirers?
She is modest and retiring, answered
Heartwell
,
with a bitter sneer; for Julia was still
flirting
with that puppy, Sopus.
Upon my word, said the other, you do the
young gentlemen of your city great honour. I
should suppose they would at least have found out
the money.
They are apt to have an instinct for that,
observed Heartwell.
A lady now swept along dressed in a load of
discordant and atrocious finery, the vulgar
characteristic
of the day, and was accosted by
Heartwell
with
My dear Mrs. Smith. Another Mrs. Smith!
ejaculated the count, with uplifted hands.
My dear Mrs. Smith, what a beautiful dress
you have got!
Do you think so, answered she, her very
feathers
quivering with delight. Do you know
there are but two such in the world, this and
another
the Dutchess de B wore at court last
Christmas. It cost me
Hush! said Heartwell, solemnly.
Why, what is the matter? asked the
alarmed
lady.
Your bishwhat do you call it, is hind part
before, whispered he.
Ah! screamed Mrs. Smith, and ran into the
attiring room to examine into the matter.
What did you frighten the lady for? asked
the count.
O, I did'nt want to hear the history of that
intolerable dress. I have heard it forty times, at
least; and yet never the true one, for I'll swear
'tis an old dress the Dutchess de B gave to one
of her maids of honour; who gave it to one of her
waiting maids, who sold it to a little milliner who
was making up a cargo of second-hand finery for
our market.
In strolling about the room, Heartwell chanced
upon a young married lady, who had been brought
up in the country, whom he found in tears, by the
side of her husband. She was dressed as
Euphrosyne
.
My dear Mrs. Gocarty, said Heartwell, I
hope you've heard no bad news from the country?
What is the matter?
I want to go home to
ma
, cried the lady,
again bursting into a torrent of tears.
There was no comforting a lady who came to a
fancy ball to weep, and so they passed on.
Your ladies must be very fond of home,
observed
the Italian.
Very, answered Heartwell, just at the moment
Julia gave her hand to Sopus for a third dance.
Veryone half of their time is spent at home
in dressing, the other in showing off abroad.
What more can be reasonably required, said
the other.
La! cried Miss Macfaddle to Miss Maccubbin,
If here is'nt Fanny Fitzpoisson, dressed after all
as fine as a fiddlehemI wonder where the
money is to come from.
A very considerate person, said the count,
who had overheard her, what is the name of this
lady who looks so far into futurity?
One is called Miss Maccubbin, the other Miss
Macfaddle, and she of the blue satin and feathers,
Miss Fitzpoisson.
What horrid names! cried the count, How
can you expect any thing like genteel society with
such names? If you could only add lord and
lady, or honourable, it would be something. But
Miss Macfaddle, and Mrs. Jenks, and Mrs. Hobbs,
ah! it wont do. You must ennoble these
people
or you will never arrive at high life, depend
upon it. Now what do you think my title which
at once elevates me into
ton
, comes from?
From a bridge, I should imagine.
You are right; there is a very ancient and
good for nothing bridge, in the Dutchy of Tuscany,
which whoever owns is called Count of , and
II am Count of the Mouldering Bridge, at your
service. But in truth, resumed he of the
mouldering
bridge, it is inconceivable how much
depends
upon this. I have lately read a number of
English novels, in the shape of tours, travels,
recollections
,
memoirs, adventures, &c., all
professing
to give a picture of high life, as if high life
was not every where and at all times nothing more
than the association of well bred, well educated
people, such as are to be found in all civilized
countries. Be assured my friend, for I solemnly
swear to itthat these books have no more of high
life in them, than the Newgate Chronicle. Yet
you honest republicans, who so hate aristocracy,
relish these Grub-street delineations, and believe
them all genuine, merely because the actors
and actresses are dubbed with titles by the
authors. My lord and my lady may be as vulgar
as they please, and though you ought to know
better, you adore their high breeding. But, and
a droll idea seemed to come across himBut,
suppose now we at one blow make all these Mrs.
Smiths, and Mrs Jenks, and Misses Macfaddles
and Fitzpoissons high ton? Hey!
As how, asked Heartwell.
9*
By ennobling every soul of them at a single
dash, as the wise king of Spain did a whole
province
where they were cutting each others throats
about nobility.
With all my heart, said the other, you may
consider me as the fountain of honour on this
occasion
.
Come, here now is the Right Honourable
the Countess of Communipaw
O, no, no! that wont do even for an English
picture of high life. I can't admit such names
into the rank of nobility.
Well then, the Right Honourable the Countess
of Mount Garret.
Ah! that will do. Mount is high ton. What
of her ladyship?
She is too good and respectable to be here,
where she neither feels easy, nor is treated with
the respect she merits. The countess is lately
ennobled into the ranks of the fashionable world,
and the good folks who happened to precede her
a few years, or even months, without half her
pretensions
,
think themselves quite genteel in
laughing
at her.
True, said the count, one of the last lessons
vulgarity learns, is that there is nothing so vulgar
as laughing at people. I know of no genuine
good breeding and refinement, which does not
essentially consist in a tender regard for the
feelings
of another, at least while that other is
present
.
But who have we here?
This? O this is his grace Duke Humphrey, so
called from his never eating dinner, or at least
none of his friends could ever swear to such a
phenomenon. I remember once calling on him
in the country, after five hundred hospitable
invitations
.
And what do you think? he left his
wife to entertain me, while he went into another
room to eat his dinner; and when he had done,
came and kept me company while she took her
turn. Just as I had my foot in the stirrup, he
begged me to stay and dine; but I saw he had
already dined, for the filthy creature had been in
such a hurry he forgot to wipe his mouth.
The count shook his head
No, no; he wont do even for a duke. I can't
admit him to the privileged order. What are his
merits?
He is worth two or three millions.
Two or three millions! Duke? he shall be a
king; he can buy a crown for half the money, or
build fifty bridges. I say he shall be a king.
With all my heart. King Cole let it be then,
for I see he has forgot to wash his hands.
Here comes his queen I suppose, said the
count, for I see she too is coloured, but not
exactly
after the fashion of his majesty.
A lady now approached whose cheeks outvied
the rose.
Is'nt she beautiful? asked Heartwell.
Though I have been at Florence and Rome, I
am no great connoiseur in paintings, said the
count.
Paintings! why her colour is as natural as that
of the rose. No, no, count; whatever other
follies
and foibles our women may commit;
whatever
arts they may use to be admired, they are not
yet, thank heaven, so lost to decency as to treat
their faces as we do an old brick wall, or a
weather
beaten out house; white wash, or stain it
with red ochre.
It may be so, said the other, coolly helping
himself to a pinch of snuff. I dare say it is not
universal. I don't think I have seen more than a
dozen or so, this evening.
If I thought so I'd forswear matrimony, said
Heartwell.
You might do a worse thing. But look now;
pointing to Julia Wingate, who had danced, and
flirted, and pouted herself into a most enchanting
bloom, you don't pretend to say that young lady
is not painted? The count had a little sly
malice
in this.
Heartwell, though he was angry with Julia,
could not bear this imputation. He defended her
with such heat that the count was convinced.
I think I saw her blush just now at something
her handsome partner said.
Heartwell was angrier than ever at this, and
had a great mind to admit that Julia painted.
But why so hard upon face painting?
continued
he, ladies, aye, and gentlemen too,
wear false hair, false teeth, false eyes, eyebrows,
shapes and dimensions, and practice other
innocent
deceptions. For my part, I can pardon every
thing false in a woman except the heart.
Yes; but count answer me seriously, and upon
your honour, would you like to kiss a lady, I mean
your great grandmother or great aunt, whose face
was painted with red and white paint? oil,
verdigris
,
sugar of lead, faugh! I'd as soon salute a
painter's pallet.
Why upon my honour, though not seriously,
said the other, laughing, I would not give a
pinch of snuff to kiss either my great
grandmother
or great aunt, painted or not painted; but for
that Miss Wingate I think you call her, faith, I'd
venture even at the risk of a little daubing.
Here Heartwell bristled like a wild boar. But
seriously I will allow that there is something gross
and revolting in the deception of face painting,
because it is not only a deception, but a filthy
deception
.
It indicates an overweening, insatiate
desire for admiration, disreputable to a virtuous
woman, and that more especially in a country
where custom has not sanctioned the practice. It
is one thing to follow a bad fashion; it is another
to set it; and I confess, inured to it as I have
been, I would never consent to unite my fate, or
mix my being with a woman who had accustomed
herself to the practice of cheating the world. I
should fear she would end in cheating me.
I will not swear that Heartwell heard all this
long speech of the count. He was looking most
of the time at Julia, who was waltzing with friend
Sopus.
There, there's another precious importation,
cried he, with most edifying indignation, I hate
waltzing almost as much as face painting.
O thou last of the Goths! exclaimed the
count, Mr. Southey is mistaken certainly in
giving that title to Don Roderick. Is it not a
delightful
,
graceful, titillating, topsy turvy, top
heavy, luxurious dance, and classical too; it puts
one in mind of the Rape of Proserpine. That
fellow
there, has the whiskers of Pluto, and looks as
if he would not be a whit too good to carry that
pretty lady to perdition itself.
Heartwell boiled with rage and jealousy, but
made no reply.
Allons! said the other, proceed with your
catalogue of nobility. Who is that good lady
with the projecting teeth. Heartwell roused
himself.
O, that? you must go and do her homage, for
she is your liege lady. That is the Dutchess of
Tuscany. Go and kneel and kiss her hand, like
a loyal subject. What, you have grown too much
of a republican, hey!
Truly my knees are become a little stubborn,
said the other, but let me see if she is worthy of
my homage. What is she good for?
Good for, marry? why she is the most
economical
,
at the same time the most expensive lady
in town. She buys the richest furniture that can
be procured, and quiets her conscience by never
using it. The looking glasses are all veiled; the
carpets protected by green baizes, and the chairs
have all cover-sluts on; there is no doubt they
will last for ever, bating accidents of flood and
fire.
A respectable old lady, with nothing
distinguished
in dress, except a fine diamond cross, now
passed the two gentlemen.
That, said Heartwell, is a lady of one of the
oldest families in the city. She can trace back,
if not to William the Conqueror, at least to
Ragman's
Roll, for her great, great grandmother
picked
up many a rag in her day. However, she
figured at the court of his majesty's little governor
before the war, and once passed for the belle of a
birth night ball. The old lady is talking at this
present moment, about having once nearly been
run over by a coach belonging to the son of her
father's barber. It is a story she has told without
mercy every day of her life, to every body that
had time to listen, and without doubt it has
contributed
materially to her health and happiness,
for the last twenty years. If you'd like to hear it,
I'll introduce you.
O no, by no meansI'll take your word for
it, said the other. But who come here arm in
arm?
This is the Right Honourable Miss Lilly Lovell,
who is the greatest philanthropist in the city. She
has a heart for all mankind except married men
and confirmed old bachelors. Her companion is
the Honourable Billy ullalove, a prosing coxcomb
who is eternally talking sentiment, and raving
about some fashionable beauty, although his heart
is nothing but a piece of dry sponge. He is a
general adorer.
This puts me in mind of Goethe's famous
novel, Wilhelm Meister, where the hero falls in
love with every woman in the book except Dame
Margery and the good Frau Melina; and where
the ladies equally complaisant all fall in love with
him, with the exceptions aforesaid.
By the way what think you of Goethe, said
Heartwell, they call him one of the only three
men of genius the world has produced.
They might as well say there never were but
three men in the world with noses, because they
happened to have longer noses than other people.
But the truth is there is a great tickling match
going on between Goethe and the English critics.
Goethe is striving how much he can exalt
Shakspeare
,
and they in turn are repaying him with
hyperbolical praises.
Then you don't think much of him?
I think a great deal of himbut there have
been such men in Italy as Dante, Tasso, and a few
others. Until Goethe produces something to
equal them, I shall demur to their being shut out
from this trio of exclusives. One thing is certain;
Lord Byron, who has been equally overrated, has
stolenI mean borrowed without leavehis
address
to Greece, commencing with `Know ye the
land,' from Goethe. It is a slavish parody of what
after all is hardly worth parodying.
Will you have any more of the court
calendar
?
No; you have given me quite as much of high
life as the English fashionable novels. But stay;
who is that lady yonder in the grand costume?
That is Mrs. Gold Smith, so called from her
always
wearing a gold chain that cost as she tells every
body, a hundred guineas. Look my lord it comes.
The lady now approached.
Who are
you
madam? asked he.
Lord, Mr. Heartwell don't you see! I am
Queen Ann Bullen of Scotland. How do you
like me?
Madam, said the other, nobody can help
liking you, but your costume is not correct. Your
ruff is not high enough in the neck.
Lord Mr. Heartwell, replied the lady, glancing
at her snowy neck, et cetera,would you have
me look like a witch?
Why not, madam, when you bewitch so many
10
to-night, cried Heartwell, gallantly bowing. The
lady again glanced at the waste of snow that lay
before her, with an air of perfect
approbation
.
But would you believe it, continued she,
my sister here and I, have both forgot who she
is. It is quite provoking, when I made her repeat
it so often first before we came.
The young lady's loss of memory is particularly
distressing, said Heartwell, gravely.
O Hel, dear,cried the young lady clapping
her hands, that is it,that is it,I knew it was
memorandum or memory.
The count whispered in Heartwell's ear
Do the young republican ladies swear?
What do you mean? said the other.
Why the goddess of Memory certainly slipt
out an oath just now.
O, said Heartwell, laughing, her sister's
name is Heliodora, and Hel is only an innocent
abbreviation.
What gentleman is that with you? said
queen Ann Bullen of Scotland.
Count G.
You don't say so! Ask him to come and sup
with us after the ball, and away she tript towards
a lady whom she addressed with My dear, do tell
me if your kitchen chimney smokes; mine is so
bad there is no such thing as living in it.
Is supper almost ready? said the count, I
begin to be tired of seeing people dressed in
characters
they neglect to personate. 'Tis a bore, as
the English say, when they don't know what else
to say.
Certainly, almost as great a bore as some of
your masquerades, where I have seen a
personification
of tna belching fire, and a serpent thirty
feet long, hissing like a flock of matronly geese,
when their goslings are insulted. There will be
no supper to night, I have just heard from good
Queen Ann Bullen, who is capital authority.
No, alas! what will the innumerable Mrs.
Smiths say to that? Why they have not demolished
above fifty pickled oysters, a dozen jellies, and a
score of ice creams apiece. I pity them.
O, by the way, her majesty desired me to ask
you to supper to-night. Will you go?
No, no; no more of your fricasseed Guinea
hens. But see, she beckons with her royal hand.
Faith, it is a beautiful hand and arm. Good night,
my lord Duke Humphrey.
Good night, my lord Count of the Mouldering
Bridge.
One moment more, cried the count. Who
is the lady in pink, yonder.
The most atrocious man-slayer in town.
I thought so, for I observe not one of the
young men leave her without sideling up to the
nearest looking glass, adjusting their cravats, and
contemplating themselves with particular
complacency
.
A little this way as thou lovest me,
continued
he, drawing Heartwell towards a cotillion
party. Look at that genius. I think I can
conscientiously
make oath, that gentleman in the
immovable
chin, is one of the John Bulls as they call
themselves, who have lately overrun Italy, and
sacked Rome like another Alaric and his Goths.
Instead, however, of subsisting by plunder as did
that valiant hero, they gain a comfortable
livelihood
by writing books of romance under the
disguise
of travels; and abusing us Italians for being
so immoral as not to talk English.
He certainly is an Englishman, said
Heartwell
,
no mortal man of any other nation or age,
could get through a cotillion without sense or
motion
.
He dances like the stump of one of Orpheus'
trees.
Or rather like one of his rocks; he certainly
belongs to the primeval family.
He would make a capital corner stone for the
wall of Thebes. And see, what a grace he has
for a partner!
Yes, said Heartwell, I have observed that
if a man happens to be gloriously deficient in any
one thing, he generally manages with admirable
adroitness, to make it as conspicuous as possible,
by placing himself in direct contrast with some
one who particularly excels. There! there! did
you see that resurrection of a dead caper. I could
almost swear he got one of his feet at least from
the floor. It is now that I see the reason why
Queen Elizabeth made Sir Christopher Hatton her
Lord Chancellor, for his excellence in gestic lore,
since a true born, and true bred Englishman, who
can conquer the natural incapacity of his nation
for dancing, must be equal to any thing. I don't
wonder half so much at Sir Isaac Newton as I do
at Sir Christopher, who I look upon as the greatest
genius England ever produced.
CHAPTER X.
LOVE'S PERPLEXITIES.
The only persons not pleased with the fancy
ball, were Julia Wingate, who was out of humour
with herself; Heartwell, who was out of humour
with Julia; and Mrs. Smith, number nine, who
was disappointed at there being no supper. All
the rest were particularly pleased, and none more
so than our hero, who went to bed perfectly
satisfied
that Julia Wingate was in love with him to
distraction. He did not like her half as well as
her mother, but his affairs were rather at a low
ebb; Julia would certainly be a fortune one day
or other, and being an only daughter, he could
10*
live in the house with the old people till the father
chose to give them an establishment of their own.
So he determined to marry Julia Wingate.
Having
come to this comfortable resolution, he fell
asleep, and did not awake till twelve the next day.
Julia lay awake a long while that night, but
she was not thinking of our hero. She was trying
with all her might to be angry with Heartwell, for
not speaking to her the whole evening. A
certain
instinct whispered to her, that this was owing
entirely to her flirting with Sopus; but then her
flirting with Sopus was as entirely owing to
Heartwell's
neglect; so after all it was his fault and not
hers. But then again, what business had he to be
angry at her flirtations, if he was not a little in
love with her; and if he was in love, then he
wanted a proper respect for her in believing for a
moment that she could prefer such a man as Sopus
to himself. At all events, until he declared
himself
,
he had no right to take offence at her
conduct
,
and therefore to be angry was a great piece
of impertinence, for which he deserved
punishment
.
Accordingly Julia resolved to be angry
with Heartwell, and flirt with Sopus until the
former made a downright declaration, or
demonstrated
his affection by growing very pale and
melancholy
.
Having come to this determination, she
lay awake restless and feverish the rest of the night.
Heartwell was a man of spirit, and such a man
makes a most refractory lover, until he is fairly
broke in. I advise the young ladies to beware of
a young man of spirit and sense, for such generally
make the most wayward, troublesome, peevish
innamoratos
in the world. Even love cannot
degrade
them into slaves before marriage, nor
matrimony
convert them into tyrants afterwards. I
therefore again seriously advise young ladies of
discretion, either to select a fool for a husband, or
make a fool of him as soon as possible.
Heartwell
went home to his lodgings, where he sat two
hours, making marks in the ashes with a poker. His
thoughts crossed their tracks, as they say in the
western country, a hundred times, and as often did
he change his determination. To choose such a
puppy as Sopus to play off against him; if he had
only been a fine, first rate fellow, full of sense,
spirit, and honour, whywhyconfound it, he
would have been satisfied. Here he told a great
lie, for if Julia had selected such a one he would
have been ten times more jealous than ever. But
the greatest hypocrite in the world deceives himself
oftener than he does others. His first resolution
was to take a trip to Boston or Philadelphia. But
he disliked travelling, particularly in winter.
Besides
,
this would be leaving the field entirely to his
rival. Then he determined to stay in town
without
going near her for a fortnight. But this was
liable to the same objection; it was giving Sopus
the advantage. Then he resolved to give her up
entirely, visiting her occasionally merely to show
his indifference. But in a little time, after
making
a few more marks in the ashes, his heart
relented from this harsh decree. It was the first
time she had ever served him so, and after showing
a proper sense of the indignity, he thought upon
the whole he would forgive her, in a week or so.
He made a few more marks, and figured the name
of Julia in large capitals in the ashes. Julia!
what a sweet name, and what a sweet girl. Such
a foot! It was all over with Heartwell. He
determined
to see her in the morning, and pardon
her on the spot. After which he went to bed and
had a very ill natured dream. He dreamed he
told a young lady who appeared in the costume of
Folly, that it was hardly necessary to put on a
disguise to play the character in perfection.
The next morning he called to see Julia as early
as fashion would permit, and was denied. I
suppose she is fatigued with last night's
dissipation
,
thought Heartwell, and walked slowly down
Broadway. Happening to turn his head, he saw
our hero ringing at the door. Heartwell had not
the least curiosity in the world, yet he could not
help peeping, now and then, over his shoulder.
Sopus was admitted without hesitation, and what
was worse than all, he must have seen Heartwell
denied, for he gave him a most provoking,
unbearable
nod, as he entered the house. By
heavens! said Heartwell to himself, that's too
bad. If I put up with this, may I dwindle into a
led captain. He took a long walk on the Battery
and met there an old acquaintance, who never
passed any body without crying out fine day, in
a voice like a north-wester. Very, replied
Heartwell. Not
very
either, said the other,
its fine walking overhead, but bad under foot.
Very, quoth Heartwell.
Rather sloppy.
Rather.
Very open winter.
Heartwell kept his mouth shut.
Good morning, Mr. Heartwell.
Good evening, Mr. White.
The man's name was Black.
What the deuce is the matter with Heartwell.
I believe the Devil is in him, thought Mr. Black.
He was not much out in his calculation. An
angry lover is as near being possessed by the
evil one, as was the herd of swine.
Sopus was received by Julia with a smiling
welcome, which many a man before him, has
mistaken
for something more. The truth is Julia was
delighted with having turned Heartwell from the
door, and delighted with our hero as the
instrument
of revenging herself on the man she really
preferred to all others. This is the way with
women
.
They don't mind how many innocent hearts
they break, if they can only revenge themselves
upon the man of their own heart. But they should
be forgiven for this, because they sometimes
wreck their own happiness, and break their own
hearts, in pursuit of the same object.
Our hero was exalted with his reception, and
several times came as near making a declaration,
as a man could do, and escape. I will open
myself
to her mother, thought he. No, hang it,
that wont do. The old lady mistook my
declaration
of love to her, for one to her daughter; who
knows but she may make another blunder, and
take this one to herself? After spending about
two hours, and tiring poor Julia almost to death,
he departed, just as Heartwell who was going up
Broadway, by accident was looking directly at the
door. Sopus nodded to him again, and crossed
over the street to join him. Which way are you
going? said Heartwell. Up the street, said
the other. I am going down, cried Heartwell,
turning short about, and retracing his steps down
Broadway. A cut, quoth Sopus, but I'll
cut
him out for this.
CHAPTER XI.
MORE OF LOVE'S PERPLEXITIES.
Heartwell was engaged to a party that evening,
where he was sure of meeting Julia. He wrote
an apology and threw it into the fire. About a
quarter of an hour after he wrote another, and
lighted his candle with it. About ten minutes
after, he wrote a third, which he sealed with a
wafer instead of perfumed wax. It would not do,
and he tore it to pieces in a great passion. At
length, mustering his wrongs in battle array, the
flirtation at the ball; the denial of himself and
the admission of Sopus; his infernal long visit; his
confounded familiar nod; and his intolerable air of
success; he pronounced himself an injured,
insulted
man, and sent off his apology. Before the
servant
had got a hundred yards, he regretted this
precipitation; but his fate was sealed, and by
perfumed wax. It was too late.
Julia said to herself as she was dressing for the
party, I wonder if
he
will be there. Young
ladies never mention the name of a certain person,
except in their sleep. As she rode to the party,
she revolved in her mind how she should behave
towards Heartwell. Should she be dignified or
familiar; pettish or amiable; natural or artificial;
mystical or all simplicity. At last she settled
it in her mind, that as Heartwell was not quite
sufficiently punished, she would play off Sopus
against him for that night only, and then
forgive
Heartwell. Heartwell was not there, but
no doubt he would come; accordingly Julia
smiled and flirted with our hero, every now and
then eyeing the door as it opened. She looked
over a port folio with our hero, and their heads
almost touched. She suffered him to snatch a
nosegay, intending this to be the last stab she
would inflict on poor Heartwell. But yet he came
not; and as it grew later and later, Julia said to
herself,
He
will not come to-night. From that
moment she treated Sopus with a pettishness
which he could not fathom, although he had
finished
his education abroad. She insisted upon
having back her nosegay; and when he offered to
hand her to the carriage, absolutely forced
herself
upon the Right Honourable Billy Fullalove,
who thereupon fell ten times more deeply in love
with the whole sex, than ever he was before. A
woman, quoth Sopus, in the bitterness of his
wrath, a woman is like a riddle and no riddle.
She. Here he was elbowed out of the house
by an inundation of fashionable people, who
seem in as grea a hurry to get home as they are
to go abroad. As Julia rode home she resolved
more resolutely than ever not to forgive
Heartwell
for not coming to the party, to afford her the
satisfaction of making him miserable.
All this while the disconsolate Heartwell sat by
the evening fire, looking intently at it, till his eyes
smarted. He figured to himself the fair Julia,
gliding through the intricacies of the crowd,
hanging
on the arm of that infernal Sopus, laughing,
chatting, and flirting with the intolerable puppy.
Had she only given me a decent rival, and he
deceived himself just as he did the night before.
Now, thought he, she is dancing with Sopus.
But how well she dances; how gracefully elegant,
how much like a lady; and then her foot, her dear,
pretty little, lady like foot, playing at bo-peep with
Sopus' infernal French pumps. Dn Sopus!
But the little foot mollified Heartwell exceedingly,
and he was very near forgiving Julia, when he
again conjured up Julia's beautiful little satin
shoes, as it were, exchanging civilities with the
infernal French pumps of Sopus. This idea got
the better of the other, and again he relapsed into
wrath unappeasable.
Ah, Julia! if you only knew What?
cried a voice close at his elbow. My dear
Lord Count of the Mouldering Bridge, whence
came you? and how did you get in so quietly?
Quietly! I almost knocked down the street
door, and fell over three chairs and a table in
finding
my way to you. What is the reason you were
not at Mrs. Saddleback's party to-night? I came
to see if you were ill.
I'm tired of parties, sick of fancy balls, and
And meditate retiring from the world, to play
hermit, and moralize on the inconstancy of
woman
.
Hey, my Lord Duke Humphrey?
Is it a supper and ball? asked Heartwell, who
being exceedingly anxious on a certain point,
began
as far off as possible. Is it a ball and
supper
?
11
To be sure, fat Bennett half asleep, and the
fricasseed Guinea hen as hot as tna.
Was it a large party?
As usual. Your good folks here seem to
think the more the merrier, and crowd us together
like the scales of a fish.
Any new faces?
Some few; nothing worth a song.
Any old ones?
Why yes; by the bye, there was that fine girl,
Miss, Miss Cowgate; no, Hellgate; no, Newgate;
no, what a plagueI'll swear there is a gate in it.
Wingate? said Heartwell, his voice sinking
into a whisper, and his heart beating louder than
his tongue.
Aye, Wingate; that's the name. Upon my
soul, Heartwell, she is a fine girl. But 'tis a pity
she is going to throw herself away on that half
bred rou, Sopefat, or Soapsudswhat's his
confounded
name?
Sopus? answered Heartwell, in a voice still
weaker than before, and a heart sunk away nobody
knows where. Is it all settled?
Is it all settled, cried the gay count,
mimicing
him. Yes, it is all settled as they say. She
was very particular with him to-night, and either
is fond of the blockhead, or wanted to make
somebody
she was fond of jealous, I don't know which.
But come, return with me, we shall be in time for
the Guinea hen, and you may laugh a little at
Soapsuds, who walks on air, and snuffs gas. Will
you go?
I'll be  if I do, cried Heartwell, in a
great passion.
O well, don't take fire. Good night. I shall
go back and make interest to be asked to the
wedding, and away went the count as merry as
an old fashioned May morning in the month of
June.
Poor Heartwell! he was getting worse and
worse every moment. As the hours crept slowly
and wearily on, he continued present in fancy
at the ball, and saw Julia and Sopus flirting
together
.
He saw them exchanging looks, and
talking with their eyeshe saw him hand her into
supper, sit by her side, crowded so close they
almost grew togetherhe saw them touch their
glasses, nay their very handshe saw him help
her to the fricasseed Guinea henand oh! horror,
he saw her eat of it with an appetite most horrible!
He could see no more; but he swore that night
he would act the part of a friend to the family,
and apprise the mother that Sopus was a
spendthrift
,
a rou, a ruined man, and a great
blockhead
.
It is nothing to me, now, said he, but
'tis a pity so fine a girl should be thrown away.
The next morning he again knocked at the
door of Julia Wingate. He asked for the mother
and was admitted. The good lady with whom
Heartwell was a great favourite, asked him where
he had been so long, and was going to ring for
Julia, but he stopt her.
Madam, said he, Madam, I have no business
with Miss WingateI mean, I come as an old
friend of the familyyou know my grandfather
and yours were once in business togetherI come
as an old friendmy mother and you were very
intimateas an old friend of the family, of whose
hospitality I have so often partaken, in whose
society
I have enjoyed so many happy, happy hours
to talk to you about Miss Wingatethat is to
saytotowarnthat is to sayto caution
to ask you madamif ifhahahemhum
and Heartwell ran high and dry ashore.
You ask so many questions that I hardly
know how to answer them; but if you will put
one at a time I will promise to satisfy you if I only
comprehend, said the lady, smiling.
Why then madamI would askthat is
to sayI would inquire as a very old friend of
the familywhetherwhetherwhetherMiss
Wingate means to honour Mr. Sopus with her
hand; because if she doesas an olda very
old friend of the family I feel bound
Julia, interrupted Mrs. Wingate, Julia, will
you answer for yourself, and tell this very old
gentleman
whether you are going to marry Mr.
Sopus
?
and the old lady glided out just as the young
one glided into the room. They both looked at
first like two great fools; after a little while Julia
could not for the soul of her help smiling;
Heartwell
smiled too, and asked her as soon as he could
find breath to utter it, Whether she really meant
to marry Mr. Sopus, because if she did, his duty
as an old frienda very old friend
Pray how old are you Mr. Heartwell, asked
Julia, laughing.
No man was ever afraid of a woman laughing.
Heartwell answered warmly
Old enough to admire your beautycherish
your virtuesand wise enough to know that the
possession will make me happy beyond all
happiness
.
Julia I adore you.
The young lady's face neck and bosom was of
the hue of fire. She said not a word, for ladies
should say nothing when looks can so well answer
the purpose. There was a tear in her eye as she
at length said, What a fool I have been!
And so have I; I thought you were going to
marry Mr. Sopus. Why did you pay him such
attentions?
Why did you neglect me so?
I thought my attentions had become
disagreeable
.
And I thought you hated me.
Oh! Julia!
Oh! Heartwell! replied Julia, as sheI'll
not swear but she permitted him to fold his arms
about her slender waist, and kiss her warm lips.
Nay, it is my firm belief that she did. But I trust
11*
I am too discreet a person to disclose matters which
are always communicated to us writers under the
seal of secrecy, but which, with shame and sorrow
I speak it, they take the first opportunity of
blabbing
to the whole world.
O, Heartwell! exclaimed Julia, in a glow.
Dearest Julia, when
Mr. Sopus, cried a servant.
The Devil take Mr. Sopus, thought
Heartwell
.
Julia did not swear, but she wished him in
Guinea, as Heartwell hastily took his leave, not
as well pleased as he should have been.
Our hero was received by Julia with
monosyllables
;
entertained with monosyllables; and
dismissed
with the shortest monosyllable in the
English
language. O! how Julia hated him for
having made Heartwell miserable. Having the
field all to himself, Sopus determined to sieze the
opportunity.
Adorable Miss Wingate, will you be mine?
NO! said Julia, and quitted the room with
the step of a queen.
Sopus was at a loss for a comparison that would
do justice to the occasion. A woman, quoth
he, is like
Your glove, sir, said a servant, who had
followed
him. You dropt it in the parlour.
Faith, I wish she was like my glove, quoth
Sopus, drawing it on. But I'll insult Heartwell
the first good opportunity. He never found a
good opportunity.
CHAPTER XII.
LESSONS FOR GROWN UP LADIES.
During the remainder of the season, our hero
principally occupied himself with cultivating the
acquaintance of married ladies, and young men
of little experience and plenty of spending
money
.
The former he tried to teach fashionable
morals, and the latter fashionable manners; that
is, he endeavoured to persuade the young men to
make love, and the married ladies to encourage
them. But he found great, nay, insuperable
difficulties
in overcoming the modesty of the young
gentlemen, and the old fashioned notions of the
matrons. These yankees, quoth our hero, are
as hard to tame as tigers.
He resorted on one occasion to argument with
a lady who cherished the most absurd notions of
conjugal felicity, and all that sort of thing, as
the English say.
My dear madam, said he one day to Mrs.
Judge Bridlegoose, a married woman of fashion
abroad, has no more to do with her husband than
you have here with the husbands of other
women
.
She makes use of nothing belonging to
him except his name and his money. The first is
useful on certain occasions, the latter
indispensable
.
Why what in the name of sense, cried Mrs.
Judge Bridlegoose, do the people marry for?
To do as they please.
I never did as I pleased since I was married,
thought Mrs. Judge; the thing is not so
unreasonable
after all.
Women are thought nothing of abroad until
they are married, continued Sopus.
And when they are married? asked the lady.
O, every body thinks and talks of them too.
They are like foxes let out of a bag to be hunted.
But I should not like to be hunted.
No, my dear madam! why what did you
marry for?
To get a husband.
Our hero laughed; it was impossible to help it.
And what is a husband good for, except to lend
you his name, and give you his money?
Good for? whywhy the lady was a little
puzzled. Why one wants a man about the
house to take care of one, and to go to market.
My dear madam, you put me in mind of a lady
of this town, who took her husband with her to
Paris. `My dear,' said her friend, who knew of
how little use a husband was in Paris`my dear,
what possessed you to bring
him
with you?'
`I wanted some body to hold the basin for me
when I was sea sick,' said the other.
Mrs. Judge Bridlegoose laughed, and was very
near being satisfied that husbands were like
fireplaces
,
very useful, but very unbecoming.
However
,
our hero, though he partly satisfied her
understanding
,
could not get the better of education and
habit, the best preservatives of virtue.
But though he failed here, he succeeded in
another
important branch of civilization. He taught
several young men to play at cards and dice, who
by some strange miracle were ignorant of them
before, and gained a comfortable livelihood by it.
How much better than teaching French, Italian,
and Spanish; or debasing the character of a rou
by some useful occupation. In the month of May,
Julia and Heartwell were married. There is but
one more misery I wish him, quoth Sopus, may
old Wingate live a hundred years and his wife
fifty.
CHAPTER XIII.
THE DISHING OF A ROU.
The summer now came on, bringing in its train
a thousand blessings: relieving the poor from the
pinching cold of winter, and exchanging chilling
frosts and howling blasts, for two of the best gifts
of heaven, sunshine and sweet south winds. The
town thinned apace, and every thing in the shape
of a human being, I mean all the fashionable
brokers
,
speculators, and people that make money
genteelly, were either gone or going to the
Springs, the mountains, the shore, or the grand
tour. Our hero had a run of luck, that is, he had
been well paid of late for finishing the education
of certain young gentlemen of fashion. He
determined
on a trip to the Springs, for he had heard
it was an excellent place for flirting and getting
an appetite. But he had a secret and a stronger
motive.
For some time past he had been in the habit of
dining with an acquaintance at a fashionable
Broadway House, frequented by travellers coming
from the south to spend the summer. Here he
met with a Mr. and Mrs. Sarsfield, who had come
I believe from the western part of Virginia, and
stopped a few weeks in the city, on their way to
Saratoga. Mr. Sarsfield was a tall, upright figure,
rather of a brown complexion, although his hair
and eyes were of a light colour. He wore a white
hat with a broad brim; a blue frock, not of the
first cut, or finesh materials, and his hair was tied
behind with a black ribbon. He had no more
whiskers than the palm of my hand, and was
otherwise
exceedingly defective in fashionable
indispensables
.
Yet with all this, a better taste and a
keener eye, than that of our hero, would have
distinctly
recognized the air, the manner, and above
all, the look of a well bred, well educated
gentleman
.
There are none who make such fatal
blunders
,
as those who judge a man by the standard of
his dress. Sopus determined to give the tall
gentleman
with the long queue, a touch of his foreign
education. I've caught a quiz, thought he. It
turned out he had caught a Tartar.
The tall gentleman, with the long queue and no
whiskers, had a charming wife, much younger than
himself, and to say the truth, much handsomer.
Her complexion, though she was born under a
southern sun, was extremely fair; her eyes of a
most equivocal colour, whether black, hazle, or
grey, I could never make out to my satisfaction;
teeth white and even; lips, cheeks, &c. of
nature's
best handy work; and a figure too short
for a long praise, and too tall for a short one, it
was the very thing. Her hair was brown and
dazzling
,
and though I hardly expect to be credited
by my fashionable readers, it curled naturally, a
thousand times more gracefully than either
Monsieur
Manuel or Monsieur Sebastian could make
it, with all their matchless gramary. She was
as lively as a singing bird in his native forest; as
unsuspecting as Eve, when she first met the first
man; and as innocent, as when she first listened
to the song of the serpent. A prize! thought
our rou; and forthwith he laid out upon the
beautiful matron all the stock of his foreign
importations
.
The lady had never met with a creature of his
species before. She laughed at him, and with
him; she danced with him at several parties; she
walked with him on the Battery by moonlight, and
took his arm with as innocent a frankness as she
would that of her grandfather. The tall
gentleman
with the long queue, had seen a little more of
the world than his wife. He had actually been
Charg at a foreign court, and spent a winter in
Paris. But he never spoke of it except it was
necessary
.
He had his eye upon our hero, having
seen enough of the world to fathom his intentions;
but he knew his wife, and the only feeling he had
on the subject, was of insulted honour, rather than
suspicion or jealousy. The very idea that there is
a being breathing on the face of the earth, who
dares to dream of, much more to meditate,
seducing
the wife of our bosom, is intolerable to a man
of spirit and honour.
Our hero took passage in the steam boat with
the beautiful Virginia wife and her tall husband.
He played the rou in the very first style; handed
the lady up stairs and down stairs; was at her
elbow from morning till night, and took up so
much of her attention that two or three times she
actually forgot her husband. Is that pretty lady
your wife? asked an old lady, very significantly.
Heaven forbid! quoth Sopus. In this way he
travelled with them to the Springs, kindly taking
upon himself all the trouble of entertaining and
waiting upon the fair matron. All this while Mr.
Sarsfield said nothing; for there is no task from
which a proud man more shrinks, than that of
indicating
,
either in word or act, that he disapproves
another man's attentions to his wife. He knows
that if matters are going wrong, it will only make
them worse; and he scorns to become the Argus
of what a woman ought herself to guard. Besides,
he saw as clearly that his wife was innocent, as
that the rou was intent on making her otherwise.
He held his tongue; but it was the silence of the
brewing tempest.
At the Springs, one of the principal occupations
of people is to watch one another, and the
principal
amusement to detail the result. Sopus
continued
his attentions without the
inexperienced
wife being in the remotest degree the wiser
12
for his significant looks, and speaking sighs. But
other people saw clearer. There was an old lady
in spectacles who had spent a month or six weeks
at the Springs, every summer since the discovery
of America. Of course she knew a little of the
world. One day she said to Mrs. Sarsfield,
What does that young man want that he is always
following you about? I don't know, replied the
other. I do, said the old lady. Soon after,
Sopus met Mrs. Sarsfield alone in the music room,
and kissed her hand, in full view of the husband,
who was standing unseen. M Sarsfield felt an
almost irresistible impulse to kick Mr. Sopus on the
spot. But checking himself, he sent his wife up
stairs to get ready for a ride, and shutting the door
of the music room, addressed our hero as follows,
in a mild firm voice.
Mr. Sopus, your attentions to my wife are
becoming
disagreeable to me.
So long as they are not disagreeable to the
lady, I presume there is no harm done, replied
our hero, with a laugh, for he thought he had to de
with a clod-hopper of the first pretensions.
Sarsfield's eyes flashed fire; but he restrained
himself.
Mr. Sopus, you must be aware that this is not
a place where any thing like particular and
constant
attention can be paid to a married woman,
without giving occasion to ill-natured remarks and
suspicions, real or pretended. Mrs. Sarsfield is not
aware of this; I therefore speak to you rather than
her. I again take the freedom to observe, that
your attentions to Mrs. Sarsfield are disagreeable
to me.
And I, said Sopus, pertly, again observe
that so long as they are not disagreeable to the
lady, I shall continue my attentions.
Heaven and earth! what a shower of blows was
just on the point of wetting the shoulders of our
hero. But Mr. Sarsfield as I observed before, was
a man of the world, and knew that were he to
take any measure of this kind, it would set ten
thousand tongues running like mill clappers.
He accordingly restrained himself once more; and
that very afternoon went with Mrs. Sarsfield over
to Ballston. The very next morning Mr. Sopus
was at Ballston renewing his devoirs. Sarsfield
was out of all patience, and swore he would have
satisfaction for this insolent perseverance. He
took occasion upon pretence of some little
impertinence
of our hero which had no reference to the
more weighty cause of complaint, to pass upon
him a direct and palpable insult, such as no man
pretending to the character of a gentleman, could
overlook without being dishonoured. There are
some men who possess that amiable philosophy,
which putteth up with insult, not in the spirit of
forgiveness, but from a natural insensibility to such
trifles. Our hero was of this sect of philosophers,
and accordingly suffered the insult of Mr. Sarsfield
to pass unnoticed. The company instead of
admiring
this singular magnanimity, hereupon began
to look askance, and to shun the society of the
accomplished Mr Sopus, who soon saw himself
in the enviable situation of a man alone in a crowd.
One day at dinner, he asked a gentleman to take
wine with him. The gentleman politely answered,
I never drink wine, and a moment after, drank
a glass with Mr. Sarsfield.
Our hero saw that he must either call out the
tall man with the long queue, and peril his life, or
die to the fashionable world. He neither had an
office, nor a commission in the militia, and could
therefore plead no privilege. Accordingly he
resolved
on challenging Mr. Sarsfield, being pretty
confident that a man without whiskers, and who
wore a long queue tied with a black ribbon, could
never be a man of courage. Under this consoling
conviction he sent Mr. Sarsfield a challenge, which
greatly to his surprise and mortification, was
promptly accepted. They went over into
Vermont
,
that being the nearest debatable land.
You don't mean to harm this calf? asked Mr.
Sarsfield's second.
Not much; I shall only give him a lesson he
will be the better for all his life.
The distance was paced, the preliminaries settled,
and the word about being given, when just at the
critical moment, the pistol of the gallant roue went
offit was a hair triggerand inflicted a sore
wound in the lower part of his leg. He fell; and
his antagonist learning that our hero was satisfied
fired his pistol in the air, at the same time
politely
expressing his regrets at the accident. I
shall be at your service at any time, said he, and
thus ended this affair of honour.
Sopus was carried to a neighbouring village,
and deposited in a hotel, where he remained nearly
three months, and became not only very tired, but
ran up a bill which he had not the means of
paying
.
He had plenty of leisure to moralize, and
accordingly came to the conclusion that the
American
husbands were a set of vulgar
semi-barbarians
.
He tried to seduce the landlord into a little
gambling, both as a means of passing his time, and
providing for the payment of his bill. But mine
host was a man of nice scruples. He speculated
in lottery tickets, but he was principled against all
sorts of gambling.
His long stay at this place, and his long bill,
fairly emptied his pockets, and left him in debt
besides. He quitted the hotel a lame duck in both
senses. He was lame of a leg, and out at the
elbows. When he got to the city he forgot to
send the scrupulous landlord his money as he had
pledged himself to do. Mine host, impatient at
the delay, had him arrested and put in prison, to
the horror of good society, and the consternation
of divers fashionable young rous, who felt a sort
of instinctive dislike to such vulgar places as goals.
12*
Poor Sopus, not being in business, had not the
enviable
privilege of taking the benefit of the
bankrupt
law three or four times, without being at all
the worse for it, either in reputation or estate.
An old uncle, a grocer in Pump-street, whose
acquaintance our hero had cut from the moment
he was transplanted to the Square, hearing of his
situation came to see him, and such was the
wonderful
virtue of the specific administered by the
hand of honest adversity, that Sopus actually
forgave
the old man for being a grocer, and living
in Pump-street.
You shall go home, and live with me, said the
good man.
On one condition, replied our hero.
What is that?
That you get the name of the street changed,
and promise not to degrade me into your shop
boy.
The old grocer promised, and subsequently
made such pathetic representations to the
corporation
of that day, that they changed the name of
Pump to that of Cistern-street, which it bears even
at the present time. Sopus was in hopes that this
genteel appellation would tempt all the beau
monde of Broadway, to let their houses for taverns
and ordinaries, and come and live in
Cistern-street
.
And so it will probably be in good time.
Our hero was now lame of a leg, like the Great
Tamerlane, and lived with a retail grocer up in
the Bowery. Had it only been a wholesale
grocery
,
he might have been permitted to subscribe
to the City Assembly. But the retail business
was the bar sinister: and our hero fell from the
height of fashionable renown, to be trodden under
foot like the worms that hang from the elm trees
in Broadway, now vaulting to and fro in gallant
trim, and anon grovelling in the dust ingloriously.
At present, instead of aspiring to instruct
fashionable
matrons in the cabalistics of foreign manners,
and the young gentlemen in the canons of
European
perfectability, he contents himself with
talking
a little equivocally to the ladies who preside
over the apple stalls, and cookey shops in
Cheapside
and Chatham Square, where he is still
venerated
as a rou razeed.
I met him the other day, hobbling along, with
little remains of his ancient glories, except his
whiskers, and inquired how he came to be in such
a condition.
I am a sufferer in the cause of `Public
Improvement'
and `Domestic Policy.'
What! you could not civilize us after all?
No; I would as soon attempt to civilize the
Indians, replied
The Roue
.
THE DRUNKARD.
He that is drunken may his mother kill,
Big with his sister. He hath lost the reins;
Is outlaw'd of himself. All kind of ill
Does with his liquor slide into his veins:
The Drunkard forfeits man, and doth divest
All worldly right, save what he claims as beast.
George Herbert
.
I have determined to employ the last miserable
remnant of a life now about closing in infamy and
shame, in bequeathing to the world an example,
which I trust, may make some amends for the
miseries I have heaped on every being with whom
I have been nearly and dearly connected in this
life. It is the only atonement I can offer to my
fellow creatures, whose very nature I have
disgraced
by my crimes; to my Maker before whom I
must shortly appear in the nakedness of beastly
depravity.
I was born in one of the States south of the
Potomac, and am the only son of an opulent
family, claiming some little distinction from two
or three generations of gentility. I will not
mention
its name; I have disgraced it enough, God
knows, already. We lived in the country, in a
populous neighbourhood, and here I remained at
home, receiving from my parents, as well as my
sisters who were all older than myself, those
mistaken
indulgences, which so often have a fatal
influence over the destinies of only sons. I
learned
to think myself always in the right, because
in all disputes or conflicts with my sisters, they
were obliged to yield; fancied myself a man at
fourteen, because I was allowed to have my own
way; and a prodigy of genius, because I was
altogether unaware of the extent of my ignorance.
I do not recollect that at this time I felt any
propensity
to the vice, which has been fatal to myself
and all those whom the ties of existence had
gathered around me. I only know that I was
allowed to mix occasionally, and indeed as often
as I pleased, with those of the country people,
whose examples, if they operated on me at all,
could only do me harm. I went to all the frolics
in the neighbourhood, good, bad, and indifferent,
where the country lads to many things which
though not perhaps unbecoming in persons of
their class and habits, cannot be indulged in by
persons of mine, for any length of time, without
more or less injury to that delicacy of feeling,
those proprieties of manner, and those nice,
sensitive
principles, which constitute the distinctions
of a gentleman Young men destined to move
in that sphere of life which places them above the
necessity of employment, cannot be too careful of
their company and amusements, since by
associating
with vulgar idlers, they almost invariably
approximate
to their level, adopt their manners,
acquire
a taste for their amusements, and only sink
the lower, from the height of their descent. One
of the lowest, the meanest, and most depraved of
mankind, is the man of education, refinement, and
accomplishments, transmuted into a low and
dissipated
blackguard. The impulse which carries
him over the barriers of habit, education, and
example
,
which impels him to overleap the gulf
between
him and vulgar vice, cannot, without a
miracle, stop short of perdition.
I was a little soiled in the white ermine of
the soul, before I left home to finish my education
at college, at the age of sixteen. I was a tall
premature boy, for whom nature, as I verily
believe
,
had done her part; for in comparing my
perceptions, and the power of expressing them,
with those of my fellow students, I found myself
by no means deficient. The college was situated
in the centre of a great city; and great cities, as
many people believe, are the most dangerous
places in the world for young men. It may be so;
they have proved so to me. But I doubt the first
seeds of my undoing were sown in the country.
My family, connexions, and fortune, placed me in
a situation to choose my place in society; a choice
which has puzzled many a young man, and a
wrong decision ruined many more. I was puzzled
to death At one time I had thoughts of
becoming
a ladies' man and a dandy. Would to heaven
I had! for it is better to be nothing than what I
am. Having accidentally got credit for a college
exercise, I narrowly missed becoming a scholar.
I shall never cease to regret not having done so;
for a man that lives among books, for the most part
keeps innocent, if not improving company. His
pursuits are quiet and guiltless; his pleasures arise
from intellectual sources; his excitements are too
gentle to allure him into the commission of crimes
for their gratification; his object is fame, and his
reward if successful, immortality.
But I was diverted from this pursuit, by hearing
a very sensible, successful, unenlightened old
gentleman, of whose daughter I was a sort of
admirer
,
lay it down as a maxim, that knowledge was
an idle drone, and that every scribbler ended in
being a beggar, and dying in a garret or jail. He
could never be brought to believe in the miracle
of three or four thousand guineas being given for a
story book, or comprehend the phenomenon of an
author becoming rich by his works. While I was
thus vacillating between bad and good, I one day
met with a country fellow, a sort of half and half
squire, with whom I had occasionally associated
before I left home. He informed me that he had
brought to town some capital game cocks, to fight
a grand main on Christmas eve, which was fast
13
approaching, and pressed me to go with him so
earnestly, that at length I consented, as it was not
against the college statutes, which only prohibited
going to the theatre. I was partly prompted
by curiosity, and partly by the smack of an old
relish for such sports acquired in the country.
When the time came, I dressed myself as little
like a gentleman as possible, not to disgrace the
company and the occasion, and went with my
patron
to the place of blood. It was in a dungeon
far under ground, at the extremity of a long, dark
alley, running out from a street of infamous fame,
and infamous name. On approaching it, nothing
could be heard but the distant, half smothered
crowing of cocks, defying each other from their
bags, mingled with a confused hum, which
deepened
as we approached. At length we came to
a half decayed door, at which my companion gave
three distinct and well defined taps, at intervals of
about ten or fifteen seconds. The door slowly
opened, and we passed along a paved pathway
about twenty or thirty yards, till we came to a
flight of steps which we descended, and my guide
again gave three taps, in the same manner, and
with the same intervals as before. After a little
delay, accompanied by a total cessation of the
hum we had heard on approaching, the door was
unlocked and unbolted with great deliberation,
and we emerged from total darkness into an
extensive
apartment, illuminated with a hundred lights,
diffusing the brilliancy of a ball room.
My companion was welcomed in the most
cordial
style, and with a choice selection of most
affectionate curses, by a number of equivocal
figures, that looked as if they might have once been
gentlemen. His arrival was the signal for the
commencement
of bloody and mortal strife. Bets began
to be offered and accepted; the trimmers, the
gaffers
,
the weighers, the pitters, and the judge, all
commenced the exercise of their high functions, and
all was high and busy preparation. The gallant
combatants, like heroes about to enter the lists, in
presence and in honour of some beloved lady,
smoothed their rich, varied plumes, crected their
beautiful necks, flashed menace from their fiery
eyes, and crowed the shrill defiance. They
seemed
to know and to glory in their destiny, and the
moment they caught sight of each other, was the
signal for a struggle to escape from the hands of
the pitter, and begin the battle. A strange and
singular instinct this, which prompts the animal
to attack only his own species, and live in peace
with all others!
While the preliminaries were going on, I had
leisure to look around me. I had got into a
curious
circle. Here was a tall, raw-boned
Dutchman
from Staaten Island, dressed in homespun,
and altogether so rusty in appearance, that I took
him for a subaltern, who was some way or other
employed about the place in a menial
capacity-Great
,
therefore, was my surprise to hear him
offer a bet of five hundred dollars, to a portly,
well looking person, whose dress and deportment
proclaimed the man of breeding, and whose open
countenance gave pretty sure indication that he
was destined to be the dupe of the sages of this
Pandemonium. I could not help being moved
with a kind feeling, the moment I caught his good
natured eye, and fool as I was, almost determined
to go and caution him against his associates. But
I soon found that he was no novice in the sport,
and learned from the familiar manner in which the
lowest of the sporting crew addressed him, that he
was domesticated here, and had in some measure
sunk to the level of his company. I grew
intimate
with him in the course of my devotions at
this infernal shrine, and found that with this
strange attachment to this strange amusement, he
was a man of excellent principles, kind feelings,
and tender affections. It is as strange as it is
true. In process of time, as might be expected,
he was ruined by his good friends of the den. A
fat butcher, with eyes like a ferret; a little oily
tobacconist, they called Balty; and the sharp
faced, raw-boned Staaten Islander, shared most of
his spoils. What indeed surprised me, was to see
the sums risked by fellows who seemed scarcely
worth a suit of decent clothes. I believe,
however
,
the truth was, they only risked when the odds
were greatly in their favour. I know not how it
is, but there are certain favoured beings of a baser
stamp, with whom a gentleman stands no chance
in betting, and who seem to know by intuition
which fowl is to conquer, and which horse to win.
The master spirit of this Pandemonium,
however
,
was a merry old gentleman, in the vigour of
a green autumn, whose spirits animated the whole
circle, and made the keenest betters laugh, even
sometimes when they lost. He too bore about
him distinctive marks of once at least having been
used to better company, and higher amusements,
and his example, together with that of the good
natured looking gentleman I mentioned before,
went a great way in reconciling me to a place, for
which I at first felt no little abhorrence. It is my
design to exhibit in all their disgusting features,
and colouring, the scenes in which I became an
actor; the gradations by which, step by step, I
reached the goal of ruin, disgrace, and remorse.
I mean to give them in all the strength of
colouring
of which I am capable; to present, in short,
a picture which shall create unmingled disgust, in
the mind of every reader, who is not sunk as low
as I have fallen. It is not my design to write a
pleasing or interesting tale. It is necessary to
my purpose, that I make myself and my story a
beacon and a warning.
By degrees I came to relish the company and
amusements of a cock-pit; to enjoy the furious
13*
conflicts and dying agonies of the gallant birds;
the jests of the old gentleman upon their expiring
struggles; the blood, the feathers; the curses of
the losers, and the exultation of the winners. I
became a bold better, and grew confidentially
intimate with the ferret eyed butcher, the
rawboned
Staaten Islander, and little smooth faced
Balty. They became my fast friends, and took
every opportunity of cautioning me against the
arts of each other. I fancied myself at last a
knowing one, after being enlisted under the
special
mentorship of honest Balty, who always told
me what cock to bet on, and as I long afterwards
learned, always bet on his antagonist. I lost my
money; I lost my rest; my character among my
equals; my station in society; above all, I lost
for ever all those delicious feelings, those
innocent
sources of pleasure, those aspiring hopes and
anticipations, and that heaven born ambition,
which animates youth to reach at things above,
instead
of stooping to things below them.
What would my poor father and mother have
said and thought, had they seen me emerging at
the dawn of day, from this obscure den, covered
with feathers; haggard with want of rest, or red
in the face with the liquor I had swallowed in the
course of the night? But, thank heaven! they
never saw me. They died without even
suspecting
my swift deterioration, or anticipating the
disgrace
I was to bring upon their name. It may be
supposed that these courses incapacitated me for
my college exercises. I began to descend, and at
every examination approached nearer and nearer
to the tail of my class. The better sort of lads
drew off from my society; the professors
cautioned
,
lectured, and threatened in vain; they could
not touch the feelings of one who thought more
of the approbation of his friend Balty, than of a
diploma. From the foot of the second, I was
degraded
into the lowest class, from which I was at
length expelled, for reiterated instances of
negligence
and impertinence.
It is impossible for me to say that this disgrace
did not make me feel for a time. I was now
approaching
towards manhood, and there is I believe,
a period in the life of the most dissipated young
men, in which they may be said to be balancing
almost equally between regeneration and perdition.
It is then that it would seem to depend on chance
or fate, over which they have no apparent control,
whether they are to retrieve their lost ground, and
rise to the level to which nature and education
seem to entitle them, or sink never to rise again.
I have often thought, that had it fallen to my lot
at this time, to meet with somebody I loved and
respected, who would have taken me by the hand
and reasoned with me kindly, I might possibly
have been a far different man, from what I
afterwards
became. Perhaps I only seek to palliate
my crimes, and soothe my harrassed, guilty soul,
by this miserable subterfuge. Away with it then.
I was a rational being intrusted by my Maker with
the direction of my own conductmy destiny was
in my own hands, and I alone am accountable for
my fate. No kind friend interposed; no one came
to hold out a hand, and arrest me in the swift
descent
.
Instead of such an one, came my friend
Balty, who carried me to a grand main, where as
usual I betted by his directions, and as usual lost
almost every bet. But still Balty had the
reputation
of an honest good creature, and another friend
of mine, an experienced gaffer and pitter, swore
upon his soul, that Balty was the most unlucky
man in the world, for though no man could
compare
with him in judgment, yet somehow or other
he was always wrong.
Thus, I continued in my downhill course. But
still I did not go so fast as might have been
expected
.
I sometimes had the power to arrest my
careerto stop shortyea, even sometimes to
climb a little way up the hill again. But he who
climbs a little way, and slides back again, sinks
only the lower for his exertion. The mental effort
if finally unsuccessful, ends too often in a
complete
moral insensibility. Why is it that the
temptations
to vice are at our feet every step we take,
sensible to the eyes, the ears, the palate, and the
touch, while the allurements to virtue are so often
distant, if not invisible? Whybut the answer
is at hand, and easy. It is that there may be some
merit in being good; for were the incitements to
one or the other equally palpable and powerful in
their appeals to the senses, there would be no
merit in being good. It is the difficulty, which
causes virtue to be crowned with everlasting
rewards
.
Notwithstanding the life I led, I was not
altogether
debased. It is not all at once that the
soul is stripped of its regalia. It is by little and
little, that it is cast away; although to the world,
it appears perhaps, that the wretched delinquent
has made but one step to the consummation of his
follies and crimes. I still preserved the exterior,
and the manners of a gentleman, and in the day
time at least, associated with men and women far
better than myself. My habits had not so far
changed me from what I was, that either my
relatives
or friends, had turned their backs upon me.
I still cherished a liking for books, at times; read
sometimes the whole of a rainy day; visited young
ladies occasionally, and was reckoned by their
mammas not altogether unworthy of an invitation
to a tea party. Above all, I had not actually
committed
any overt act, such as is, or ought to be
followed by the loss of
caste
. I had, it is true, a
habit of taking brandy and water, at times; but I
felt no want of it as a stimulant, and the habit
was by no means confirmed. In short, when I
came of age, and took possession of a handsome
estate, I might still, if I would, have taken the
place in society, for which my fortune and
connexions
seemed to have destined me. But my
evil genius, or rather my evil habits and passions
were at length to have their final and complete
triumph.
An idle young man, with no decided taste for
some innocent or praiseworthy pursuit, with a
fortune
at his command, and in a large city which
bristles with temptations, is placed in a situation
of great peril. He has not only his own wayward
heart to battle with, but he is almost invariably
assailed by the seductions of others. There is
a certain class of men in great cities, who manage
to keep just within the pale of decent society,
notwithstanding
their habits, and modes of living,
render them unworthy of the association. They
generally are the dry and worthless branches of
some respectable family, left with a patrimony
just sufficient to raise them above the absolute
necessity of useful employment, yet not enough to
support their extravagances for any length of
time. They flutter gaily for a summer, like the
grasshoppers, and like them find themselves
destitute
when the autumn of life approaches. They
begin by losing their money from inexperience,
and end by preying upon the inexperience of
others. They dress well, preserve a respectable
exterior, and study the refinements of manners, to
enable them the better to practice their
deceptions
.
Of all men in the world the sharper has
most occasion for good manners. They are
generally
unmarried, for wives and children are mere
incumbrances to men who must seek their prey,
now at a fashionable hotel, and anon at a
fashionable
watering place.
These men are always on the lookout for young
heirs, with more money than wit or experience.
They found me, and what was worse they found
me prepared for their purposes. I joined, nothing
loth, a club of these veteran whist players, which
met almost every night, the principal members of
which from long habit and experience, I verily
believe, had reduced it to a matter of certainty,
that in the course of an evening, or rather a night,
they could win my money. They did not pack
the cards, or shuffle unfairly, nor exchange winks
with their partners, nor tread on each other's
toes under the table; but they took advantage of
those mysterious, unaccountable runs of ill luck,
which so often beset a player; taunted my losses,
undervalued my skill, stimulated me with drink to
double my bets in the hopes of making up my
losses; and in short, by those various arts so well
known to experienced
gentlemen
players, contrived
in the course of one single year, to strip me of all
my ready money.
I then mortgaged my lands, preferring this
method
,
by the advice of one of the most experienced
members of the club. It is better than selling,
said he, for it gives you the appearance of being
rich, when you are not worth a groat. I have
known men possess in this way, aye, and enjoy all
the advantages of hundreds and thousands, who
did not in reality own an acre. So I mortgaged
my estate from time to time, and from time to
time lost my money. In fine, I became poor, and
one hot summer's day, it came into my mind to visit
my sisters, who lived on a part of my father's estate
in the country, in peace and innocence; doting
on me as an only brother, the hope of the family,
and totally unsuspicious of the career I was
running
.
At this time, even at this time, if I knew
myself, I still had about me the raw materials of a
gentleman. I had never descended to any of the
arts and finesses of a gambler; I had never
forfeited
my word with an equal, or my engagements
with an inferior; I had not as yet thrown my
gauntlet
at the foot of the world and declared myself
independent
of the grand inquest of society; and
though my habits were decidedly bad, they were
not confirmed beyond the reach of vigorous and
manly effort. I was neither depraved nor debased
past all recovery, and notwithstanding my
occasionally
keen and bitter stings of conscience, I
was not yet driven to drinking as a refuge from
their pangs.
In this state I paid a visit to my sisters, who
received me with an affectionate joy that went to
my heart of hearts. They admired me beyond
any other human being, and they loved me still
more. The sight of my early home, the kind
flatteries of my sisters, and the sacred influence of
quiet repose, of woods, waters, and meadows,
birds, echoes, and all the full, combined harmony
of nature, for a while awakened in my heart the
rural feeling so nearly allied to virtue. I began
by degrees to relish a stroll with my sisters along
the little stream that skirted their grounds; to
enjoy
the moonlight, and the wandering glories
overhead
;
and tried to take a pleasure in looking on,
or partaking in the merry hay-makings of the
season
.
What surprised me most of all, was the
phenomenon
of being able to sleep soundly at night,
without sitting up three fourths of it; a thing I had
not been able to do in town for more than three
years past.
It is possible, had it pleased heaven to permit
me to remain here undisturbed during the
remainder
of the season, that I might have become a new
man. But empty, unsatisfactory, and wearisome,
as is the eternal repetition of the stimulants to
dissipation
,
they are gifted with an accursed
fascination
.
Even if they did not, as they most assuredly
do, carry with them their own appropriate stings,
their victim is bitterly punished in the incapacity
ever to enjoy those gentle pleasures; those
innocent
domestic endearments, and that sweet
undulating
calm, which all united, constitute a
contented
and happy being. I confess I was sometimes
partially benumbed for want of some little flow
14
of excitement merely to set my sails flapping.
Whether I should eventually have conquered the
habits of dissipation, in the habits of ease and
retirement
,
I shall never know. About a month
after leaving the city, I received a letter from my
particular friend, one of the principal members of
the club, to whom, I owed a couple of thousands,
which he always assured me I might take my own
time to pay, dunning me for money in the most
genteel manner possible. Necessitya run of
luck, &c. &c. &c.
I had not a tenth of the sum in the world, and to
my shame be it told, it was the absolute
impossibility
of living any longer in town, that had
driven me to visit my sisters in the country. My
estate was already mortgaged for its full value, and
this being a debt of honour, must be paid. From
the moment of receiving this letter, the country
lost its charms for me. Cool shades, quiet glens,
green meadows, murmuring streams, warbling
birds, chirping insects, and all the blessed looking,
happy objects of nature, assort but ill with an
unquiet
,
dissatisfied spirit. Noise, bustle, and a
perpetual succession of confused and various
objects
,
accord much better with the mood of a man
at war with himself. My sisters soon noticed my
depression, and with the querulous solicitude of
female affection, wearied and worried me with
enquiries
.
At first I was fretful, and continually
brought tears into their mild blue eyes, by repulsing
them, sometimes rudely, sometimes superciliously,
always with an impatience their affection little
merited. At length, one day, the fiend who is
ever on the watch for the moment in which man
may best be tempted to his ruinone day, when I
had just received another dunning letter from my
friend, an idea came across me that at first made
me shudder, as if a dagger of ice had been run
through me. I was the sole executor of my
father's estate, and the property of my sisters, had
been left entirely under my control, since they
became
of age.
I mean to lay bare the inmost recesses of my
polluted heartto deny nothingdisguise nothing
extenuate nothing. But I hope to be credited,
wretch as I am, this once, when I say that the first
idea of appropriating a part of the property thus
left with such confiding affection entirely in my
power, came across me, I drove it away with all
the indignation it deserved. But it came back
again and again, always accompanied with new
motives, and new palliatives, till by degrees it
became
familiar Your mortgaged estates, it
said, or seemed to sayare rising in value, and
you will be able to repay this small sum, long
before
it is known that you have used it. Your
sisters
have no occasion for the money, and as they
probably will never marry, you will be their heir at
last. At other times, it seemed to say as it
grew every day bolderEven suppose you never
pay the moneythere is nothing more common
than for brothers to borrow, mismanage, or waste
their sisters' inheritanceyou will have enough to
keep you in countenance, if the worst come to the
worst. Why should I detail step by step, inch by
inch, hairs-breadth by hairs-breadth, the progress I
made towards this infamous determination? I
was driven to it at last, by a third letter threatening
me with being denounced at the club, unless I
promptly paid the debt to my friend. To escape
the disgrace of an indiscretion, I committed a
crime. The shame of meeting a set of men who
had no claim upon my affection or gratitude, for a
moment blinded me to the guilt of defrauding those
who had both. Had I asked my sisters for the
sum, they would have thrown that, and all they
possessed
into my lap. But the pride that stooped to
defraud them, shrunk from the degradation of
asking
for what it could steal. Such too often is man,
and such was I.
I bade my sisters farewell. They hung around,
and kissed me, with tears of pure and innocent
love, for their hearts seemed all concentrated upon
me. They asked me to come again soon, and
made me promise I would. I did not dare to look
them in the face, nor could I respond to their tears
and embraces, for the purpose I was upon, made
their endearments intolerable. We have never
met since. They have sought me in my misery
and degradation; they have proffered me all that
my villany had left them; they have sought me
out in infamy; and entreated to share my cell.
But I never could bear to meet their forgiveness,
and fled from them, as from the wrath of heaven.
From the moment I robbed my sisters, and only
from that moment, I felt myself degraded past all
recovery, lost beyond redemption. I had suffered
myself as it were, wilfully to be deceived into the
commission of a crime, mean and despicable
beyond
all other meanness; but the moment it was
past beyond the reach of recall, the sophistry glared
me in the face, and I saw my degradation at full
length. I did not stop here, for who can say that
he can stop, when he has placed himself one single
step, on the slippery, down hill path of infamy.
Anxious, feverishly anxious to replace the past
robbery
,
I risked morelost moreand robbed my
sisters of more to pay the debt of honour. I did
not loseI have never lost, nor shall I everthe
capacity to feel the keenest remorse for my evil
actions. Had I been able to steel my heart to the
pangs of conscience, and to bear up, as some do,
against the sense of hopeless degradation, I had
not been what I am, nor, strange as may appear
the paradox, should I have been half so bad, had I
at first been a great deal worse.
Wherever I went, I bore about me this
intolerable
feeling of irretrievable disgrace, and to
escape
from it, I plunged deeper into the gulf. I
could not bend or force my heart to a submission,
14*
an acquiescence in its shame, and to escape the
horrible depressions of self-conviction. I sought
new stimulants, in a more frequent indulgence in
the use of wine. It answered for a little, a very
little while; but the momentary sunshine would
pass away, and leave only a deeper gloom. Still,
I was not a sot; the habit had not yet fastened
itself
on me, nor did I carry on my face or person,
those infallible indications which mark the victims
of this beastly vice. I could at any time abstain,
and so far, my destiny was in my power. By
degrees
,
I made deeper and deeper encroachments
on the fortunes of my sisters, and the period was
fast approaching, when my shame must inevitably
come to light. I was becoming reckless and
desperate
,
when a lucky chance, as I then thought it,
threw in my way a mode of retrieving my affairs,
and preserving my reputation
I had considerable advantages of person, and a
habit of keeping myself always neat, and
fashionably
dressed. Even when I spent my nights at the
cock-pit, and came forth in the morning covered
with feathers. I never failed to appear immediately
after in the garb of a gentleman. I had also a
natural
and off-hand gallantry in my disposition, which
made me acceptable to the most modest and
well-bred
females, whenever I chose to exert it, as I
often did. As a proof that I was not altogether a
brute, there never was a period of my life, up to the
time I have now arrived at, in which I could not
relish the society of virtuous, intelligent women
and make myself agreeable to them.
Accident about this time threw me into the
society of a young gentlewoman, of good family,
and possessing a handsome fortune in her own
right. Her person was attractivealmost
beautiful
,
and her face shone bright in the lustre of a pair
of intelligent black eyes, matched, or rather
contrasted
with a fine set of white teeth. Hitherto I
had never thought of marrying. The life I had
led, had in fact made me incapable of loving a
virtuous
woman as she deserves to be loved.
Excesses
had blunted all my finer feelings, and I
contemplated
every handsome female, with the eyes of a
glutton, or an epicure. Let no woman who values
her happiness, unite herself to a reformed
debauchee
,
who has long past the age of unbridled youth.
The heat of youthful blood, unrestrained by
experience
,
may, and often does, precipitate a boy
into the most dangerous excesses; but his
transgressions
are those of inexperience, not habit; and
if he returns to the path of rectitude in time, he
may still save something valuable from the tempest
in which he has been tossed. But it is otherwise
with him whom years of estrangement from the
society of the worthy, and years of fellowship with
the worthless, have disfranchised from all
communion
with the pure susceptibilities of woman,
and rendered absolutely, and forever incapable of
knowing or estimating her worth. Such a man
may return to the performance of the ordinary
duties
of society, but he will have lost in his long
wanderings, what he can never regain; the
capacity
to enjoy the innocent endearments of virtuous
love, and the gentle attractions of the domestic
fire-side. But the fondest lovers may be said to be
strangers to each other before marriage. Perhaps
it is best it should be so, since it is often as
mischievous
to know too much as too little.
Finding my society agreeable to this lady, who I
shall call Amelia, the idea by degrees occurred to
me that she would be an advantageous speculation,
as we used to say at the club. Her person, as I
said before, was attractive, but that did not much
matter; and her fortune was liberal, which
mattered
a great deal. She was young, romantic, and
somewhat buoyant in spirits. I played the
hypocrite
finely. We rode out together through the
beautiful landscapes of a most beautiful country,
and she greeted every murmuring brook, twittering
bird, and rocky glen, with a vivacity of admiration,
that would have called up a corresponding feeling
in the heart of any one, but one like me, labouring
under a sense of degradation, combined with the
lethargy of worn out sensibilities. She had
neither
father or mother living; but she had friends,
who, though ignorant of the extent of my fall, still
knew enough of my habits to think me unworthy
of her hand. But young women who are rich, and
mistress of themselves, are, I believe, not apt to be
controlled by friends in the choice of a husband;
and believing, as Amelia did, that they wronged
me, she was only the more determined to do me
right. She consented to trust me with herself, her
happiness, her destiny in this world, I might almost
say in the world to come, and we were married.
At the moment I was about to be put in
possession
of youth, beauty, and fortune, I was not
happy
,
I could not disguise from myself that I was
receiving
a victim, not a bride, to my arms; that I
had played the hypocrite and the villain, in
disguising
from her the state of my fortune, and
affecting
a character, now no longer mine. She
strenuously insisted on having my sisters for
bridemaids; but I resisted at first with feigned
excuses, and at length, with an obstinate violence,
which caused her to look at me with a keen
scrutinizing
glance, and heave a sigh, too true a signal
of her future fate. I took her a tour during the
summer; visited my estate, and heard her warmly,
and seriously propose that we should settle down
there, and spend the rest of our days, without
sinking into the earth. We went to the springs,
and I take some credit to myself, that for three
weeks that we staid there, I neither flirted with
other men's wives, nor sat up after four o'clock in
the morning at whist. In short, I was the model
of a good husband, and my wife the happiest of
women; at least she said nothing to the contrary.
For some months after we returned to town for
the winter, I led a prodigy of a life. I neither
drank nor gamed; and the connexions of my wife
began to give me credit for a thorough
reformation
.
But, alas! where the fiend is within, the
fiend will come out at last. About this time one
of my sisters married, and it became necessary that
her portion should be forthcoming. I had now a
man to deal with, and farther deception
became
impossible. The crisis of my fate arrived.
My generous, noble hearted wife, had
peremptorily
resisted all the cautions of her relatives to
have her fortune settled on herself. No, she
always
replied, no, I trust him with my happiness,
and my fortune shall go with it. It rested with
me now, either to tell her candidly my situation,
and throw myself on her generosity; or to make
use of her fortune secretly to replace that of my
sister's. That strange pride which clings even to
guilt and degradation prompted me to the latter.
To replace the money of which I had robbed my
sister, I robbed my wife of that, which after events
proved, she would have given me with all her
heart.
Up to this period, I had loved Amelia as well
as it was possible for me to love a delicate
virtuous
woman. Her affection, and the complete
acquiescence
to my wishes which she exhibited on
all occasions, had won all that was left of a heart
seared in the fires of mad voluptuousness. But
from the moment I robbed, I hated her. With
the injustice which I believe ever accompanies the
perpetration of injuries, I considered my wife a
spy, prying into my actions, and at every moment
on the eve of discovering the deception I had
practiced, the robbery I had committed. All
confidence was now at an end, on my part; all
pleasure in her society; all enjoyment in her arms.
I began to estrange myself from home, and by
degrees
to drink drams, to keep up the courage of
dastardly guilt, and make me sufficiently a brute,
to meet her after my nightly orgies without
sinking
into the earth. Now it was that my downhill
course became more rapid than ever. I fell in
company with some of my old associates of the
club; renewed my intimacy with Balty and the
ferret eyed butcher; got half fuddled, was
robbed
and cheated every night, and returned to my
home every morning, more of a beast than I left it
in the evening.
To meet these perpetual losses, I made other
drafts upon my wife's fortune, and to dull the
sense of infamy, I drank deeper of brandy.
Sometimes
I rallied the remnant of the divinity that was
within me, and abstained both from gambling and
drinking for days and nights, sometimes weeks
together
;
but again I was carried away by impulses
and habits only the more impetuous for their
momentary
restraint. My wife behaved like an
angel
;
she kept my secret, and neither betrayed me
to her friends, nor uttered a reproach. She did
not, it is true, know that I had robbed her of more
than two thirds of her fortune; but she knew what
was far more difficult to be borne, that I neglected
her person, and dishonoured both her and myself
by indulging in the lowest dissipation. Yet she
bore all in silence. Had she been more of a
woman
,
it had been better perhaps for me.
During this period we had two children, a boy
and a girl. I could not bear to look at them, from
the moment their little eyes began to know me. I
had injured them as well as their mother, and bad
as I was, I never could bear the looks of those I
had wronged. To the virtuous and happy father,
these little strangers, form those gentle links that
bind him the closer to his home, and inspire new
feelings of gratitude and goodness. But it was
not so with me. I was rapidly becoming an
outcast
from the domestic circle; an alien from all
that is good, and beautiful, and elegant. My heart
was already one half rotten, the other half turned
to stone; my tastes, my propensities, my habits
were now all assuming the same hue of deep
bottomless
infamy, of irretrievable debasement. My
friends, for I still had estimable friends, whom the
virtues of my father and mother had gained me,
now began to draw off one by one, to treat me with
coolness, distant civility, neglect, and finally to
pass me without notice. Few men that have their
senses left them, can bear the contempt of their
friends, and know that they have deserved it, without
shrinking into their inmost soul, and cowering there.
For me, I was always as proud as Lucifer. The
more degraded I felt, the more obstinate I
bebecame
,
and when I could not disguise from
myself
that I merited the detestation of all the world,
I only the more resolutely determined to brave
that world, and become worse and worse, out of
pure spite. Thus does the nature of man become
perverted, until at last he comes to cherish a
gloomy mistaken pride, in more than justifying the
scorn and contempt of his honest associates. From
getting intoxicated at night, I proceeded to
getting
intoxicated by day. As the sense of
degradation
,
the consciousness of my approaching fall, my
irretrievable, eternal ruin, pressed upon me only
the more keenly, in the intervals of oblivion.
I flew to the bottle, and drank oblivion again. Yet
sometimes my watchful angel would interfere, and
more than once have I madly dashed the glass to
pieces on the hearth, in a paroxysm of momentary
and desperate resolution. I would describe the
dreadful chaos of my mind, while under the
influence
of the destroying bowl, that those who
read my story may shrink with horror, from the
terrible
detail, and learn if possible, how hopeless,
how fatal the attempt to quell the raging surges of
guilt and remorse, by pouring hot inflammable spirits
upon them. At first indeed the attempt may
produce
a tempory obscurity; a leaden numbness of
intellect, through which objects appear confused
15
and indistinct, and the sense of shame or guilt is
not so keen. Sometimes it may bring about a
deep yet unrefreshing sleep, from which the
miserable
drunkard awakes, only to enjoy the bitter
contrast of a refreshed remorse preying on a
weakened body. But by degrees, even these
miserable solaces fade away, and drunkenness,
instead
of dulling the sense of guilt, or misery, only
sharpens the pang, by giving a temporary life and
vivacity to the mental perceptions. Their
indistinctness
is overbalanced by their increased
vigour
.
The next step is still more deplorable, when
habit at length renders the wretch almost callous
to the influence of the poison, and excessive
indulgence
produces not oblivion, but phrenzy. Too
truly will the remainder of my story exemplify that
I speak from woful experience.
The depredations I had committed on the
inheritance
of my children, were now brought to light,
by that inevitable train of events, which never
fails, sooner or later, to bring the villain to his
reckoning. Nearly at the same time, my estate
was advertised by the sheriff, on a foreclosure of
the mortgage. It was thus discovered that I was
a beggar when I married, and that I had since
become a scoundrel. Even my unbending pride,
aided by the maddening bowl, could not stand
this. I could not endure the sight of those, who
from having once looked up to me, now shunned
me with averted eyes, or gave me only glances of
cool contempt. No man, however degraded in
his own estimation, can bear the scorn of his
equals; the very pickpocket aspires to an equality
with his fellow pickpockets, and will quarrel for
precedence, like a courtier.
One day I happened to meet an old
acquaintance
,
in company with two or three gentlemen, in
such a way that it was impossible for him to
pretend
not to see me, or for me to avoid him, without
actually sneaking away. I accosted him, but he
took no notice of me. I believe you don't know
me, said I. O yes, I
do
know you, he replied,
and turned on his heel. The emphasis he laid on
this little word was admirably expressive. I
understood
it, and so did the gentlemen present.
My blood boiled, and the more, for knowing I
deserved
this treatment. I poured forth a deluge of
invectives, and provoked him at length so far to
forget himself as to knock me down. That very
hour I sent him a challenge, for I was not yet low
enough to put up with a blow, and though I
acknowledged
to my own heart that I deserved the
treatment I had received, still I burned for revenge.
It was in vain that the friend to whom the
gentleman
applied to carry his answer, represented me
as unworthy of his notice, a man without any
reputation
to lose, and to whom a blow could add
no deeper disgrace. I should have thought of
all this before I gave the blow, he replied.
Having
noticed him in the first instance, I have no
right to say now, that he is beneath my notice. I
must offer either apology or atonement. I cannot
descend to beg his pardon, and there is but one
other alternative.
But he is a disgraced man.
True, yet I had no right to add to his disgrace.
He gave the first provocation.
Aye, but if he was so far degraded, as to be
unworthy
of my anger, I had no business to be angry
with him. I forgot he was beneath my notice
when I gave the offence; I have no right now to
say he is so, when he demands satisfaction. I
know it is the morality of the day, to bandy
reproaches
,
to offend public decency, to outrage a
man's feelings in every possible way, and when
called upon for atonement, to plead either scruples
of conscience, or inferiority in the other party.
Neither this species of piety, nor this morality
satisfies me. I must meet this man.
Under the influence of these mixed principles
of right and wrong, did this high spirited young
man consent to meet me. My habitual excesses
had so shattered my nervous system, that nothing
but copious draughts could steady my hand. I
drank deep that morning, and though my vision
was indistinct, my hand did not tremble. My
second
,
one of my old club companions, who was an
amateur of duellingthat is to say in the second,
not in the first person, gave me many special
directions
how to hold my pistol, and when to fire.
But I was stupified by the time we got to the
ground, and every object swam before my eyes, as
if floating on the waves. I scarcely heard the
words, onetwothreefire! I raised my
pistol
mechanically, and yetstrange and
inscrutable
dispensation!my antagonist fell dead at
the first fire. A mother lost her only son,an
amiable and virtuous woman an affectionate
husband
and
three children became orphansfor
the wife survived the shock but a few months.
Thus, as my worthy second assured me
triumphantly
thus,
and at this price, had I vindicated
my honour. What honour? The honour of an
unnatural brother, a brutal husband, an unfeeling
father, a beastly sot!
For some time after this magnificent exploit, I
was moody, and serious. I had a sort of indistinct
vision of blood, forever peering through the mists
of intoxication, and my nights became horrible,
whenever I ventured to go to bed otherwise than
in a state of brutal insensibility. Even then the
vision haunted my dreams, until I groaned in
agony
,
and awaked in such indescribable horrors, that
I used to get up at all times of the night, to resort
to the bowl, to bring on another brief interval of
oblivion. Thus it was that each new crime drove
me to still greater excesses, and that every new
excess only brought with it new punishment for
my crimes. By degrees I came to loathe the city,
to hate the face of man, and to cherish the wish
15*
of burying myself in the country, that I might
drink my fill, and revel in beastly excesses, free
from the prying eye of my fellow creatures, and
beyond the reach of the restraints of society.
The friends of my wife, gladly acceded to my
wishes, and a farm was purchased, in a distant
part of the country, where my family and myself
were unknown, which we went to take possession
of on a fine spring day. I remember it to this
hour; for languid, worn out, decayed as was my
frame, I still felt the bland influence of the fresh
air, playing about my forehead, and refreshing my
parched lungs, while the flowers, the verdure, the
birds, and all the combined beauties of a genial
sun, and a fair, far spreading landscape, once
more awakened me, and I think for the last time,
to feelings allied to my better days. Our new
home, was a little white house, shaded by an
immense
weeping willow, that threw its wide
declining
tendrils, completely over the roof, like a vast
umbrella. From the door, a little greensward
sloped down to a stream, something between a
river and a brook, that murmured its way through
a long meadow, dotted with gigantic elms, button
woods, and other vast children of our rich
alluvions
.
It was a pretty scene for a good man to
repose
himself in, and seek his quiet way to heaven.
But for me! Paradise had no charms for the great
enemy of mankind, and rural scenes, and rural
quiet, are only stimulatives to him who lives on
artificial excitements. If there be the means of
revelling in one single vicious indulgence, left
within his reach, he will seize upon them with an
avidity sharpened by the absence of all other
temptations, and all other means of gratifying
evil appetites.
For me, I was past all hope, I might say all
possibility of being saved. Even if my moral
sense had not been perverted, if my mind had not
become irretrievably prostrated before the altar
of debasement, my physical frame, now so long
used to artificial stimulants, became almost
inanimate
without them. Once, certain symptoms of
apoplexy, actually frightened me into a
momentary
reform; and at other times when the swelling
of my legs gave indication of dropsy, I was
alarmed
into a temporary abstinence. But the reader
would shudder, if I were capable of drawing a
picture in colours sufficiently glaring, to exhibit
the depression, the lassitude, the sinkings of the
very soul, that shook my body; or the
indescribable
terrors that haunted me, sleeping and waking.
For some time past I had totally lost my appetite.
I had lived wholly on the stimulating bowl, and
when that was abandoned for a few days, my
appetite
did not return. I absolutely sunk under
the privation. Let no one therefore venture upon
these excesses, in the flattering hope that he can
ever retrieve himself. He cannot, to use the
words of a writer whom I could once relish, He
cannot if he would, is not more certain than he
would not if he could. From these temporary
abstinences, I returned like the dog to his vomit,
with a renewed zest, and with a sort of apology
for deeper excesses. But it is time to speak of
my poor wife and children.
From time to time, during the progress of the
scenes I have just been sketching, Amelia had
been strongly urged by her friends to leave me.
But she always mildly, yet peremptorily refused.
My lot, would she say, was of my own
choosing
,
and whatever it may be, I have made up my
mind to bear it to the end. Even this devotion
did not touch my heart, nor brute as I was, did I
thank her for it. On the contrarybelieve it ye
virtuous husbands if ye canI taunted her with
her ridiculous attachment, and scarcely a day
passed that I did not ask her with brutal barbarity
why she did not go to her friends. I did not want
her company, not I; nay, I wished to get rid of it
and never see her face again. He who shall read
this horrible tale, with the remnant of one spark
of virtuous feeling just expiring in his bosom, will
not believe it. Yet it is true as that there is a
Being above the stars, who for some unknown
purpose
permits such things as I am to live. I used
to find a diabolical amusement in making her
innocent
heart shudder to hear me blaspheme; to see
the tears come into her forgiving eyes, as I
vociferated
that I cared not how soon I killed myself with
drinking; an assertion as false as it was
blasphemous
,
for often and often have I bellowed with
unmanly
fears, when the fullness of my head and other
symptoms, awaked the apprehension of apoplexy.
I consider it one of my last duties to do full justice
to this extraordinary woman, at the expense of
heaping tenfold curses on my own head. I
deserve them. It was my customary amusement
to exert every means, to resort to every species of
provocation, by way of experiment to see if it was
possible to overcome her. I found fault with her
domestic economy; reproached her with not
keeping her children decent; with being a slut
in her own person, though she was neatness itself;
with being ugly, disagreeable, stupid, tiresome,
a millstone about my neck, the bane of my life,
and the cause of all my misery. And then I would
conclude by cursing her; yes, reader, cursing her,
the wife of my bosom, the mother of my children.
Yet she bore it all, and what was for a long while
inexplicable to me, bore it without losing that
vivacity of temper, and flow of spirits which
marked
her happier days. Nay, her gaiety seemed
wilder than ever, and to increase with my brutality.
It was long before I discovered the reason. But
I will not anticipate. Let not the reader suppose
that even I, degraded and brutalized as I was, had
not my intervals of shame and suffering during all
this time. I sometimes, as if by enchantment,
suddenly awakened to a full sense of what I was.
Sometimes in the middle of the night, my
punishment
would come upon me. The embodied
representatives
of my guilt and crimes, would throng
round my bed, and make me gnash my teeth, and
roar in agony. At these times my resource was
to get up, light a candle, and set down to the
bottle
,
till the fumes of the poison again produced
insensibility to every rational feeling or
perception
.
Then would I defy Heaven, brag of my
utter fearlessness of the present or the future, and
play the reckless bully once more, while my
heart was quaking to its core with guilty
apprehensions
.
It is scarcely to be supposed, that this mode of
life, accompanied as it was by a total neglect of
my farm, and a complete disregard to pecuniary
affairs, should not in no long time produce the usual
consequences. I indulged in the most foolish,
wanton extravagances; purchased on credit, for
I seldom had money, every thing I wanted, and
every thing I did not want, of those who would
trust me; abused them when they called for
payment
;
defied them when they threatened to put
me in jail; and when some of my neighbours
bailed me out at the entreaties of my wife, took a
trip out of the state in the proper time, and
quietly
left them responsible for the money. Even
when she followed me with our children to prison,
Amelia seemed in more than usual high spirits,
and actually jested on the occasion. As for me, I
was beyond the rough discipline of merited
retribution
.
I had arrived at that stage of brutal
depravity
,
in which every new disgrace furnishes
only a new incentive to wickedness; and every
stroke of the lash, only drives a man to run his race
of infamy with swifter foot. The more I became
satisfied that my case was past all cure, the worse
I became; the more I suffered, the more
determined
I was to deserve my sufferings. Such is
the perverseness of sin!
If there ever was a lost, hopelessly, irretrievably
lost being in this world, it was myself. I was
dunned for money I could not pay. I was shunned
by my neighbours; my servants left me, as one it
was a disgrace to serve; and even the sots of the
neighbourhood disdained to drink with me,
because
,
as they said, a gentleman ought to be
ashamed to make a beast of himself. Though I
literally lived without food, I had become a bloated
mass of physical inanition. My hands shook; my
face was swelled and livid; my eyes exhibited the
red, fiery rings that mark the victim of the bowl;
and my legs were so swelled at times, as to prevent
my walking, except with crutches. Then my
mental
tortures! But they are past all description.
The reader will think this was bad enough. But as
yet, he has seen nothing. The tragedy is yet to be
exhibited.
My attention, during my temporary
confinements
to my chair, was drawn at times more
particularly
than usual, towards Amelia, who had
borne with me throughout, with patience, nay
indulgence
,
beyond all example. She acquiesced
in all my unreasonable, nay, cruel requirements;
she indulged me in every thing; she bore in meek
resignation, all the refinements of vexation, the
mad pranks of tyranny, my wayward, perverted,
unmanly spirit, heaped upon her day and night.
During the whole progress of this complicated
oppression
,
it seemed to me that her powers of
endurance
and submission increased with the
severity
of my inflictions, and that the more I
endeavoured
to wrong and distract her, the brighter
was the sparkling of her eyes, the more light and
buoyant her vivacity. To see her light step, and
hear her rattle away in the full effervescence of
sprightly vivacity, one would have supposed she was
the happiest of wives, and I the best of husband's.
But there is a certain state of endurance; a
forced elevation of the spirits which cannot be
sustained
beyond its stated period, without shaking
the intellectual fabric to its foundation. The
perpetual
tax upon the mind for high unnatural
exertion
,
sooner or later, will beggar it at last, or
drive it into excesses of some kind or other. It was
so with my poor Amelia, who now at times, even
to my blunted perceptions exhibited occasionally
eccentricities, that brutified as I was, made me
shudder. Her mind was sometimes evidently not
mistress of itself, and her vivacity became at
intervals
,
when she was strongly excited, so
misplaced
and ungovernable, as to indicate too
evidently
that the springs which regulated the fine
machine, were deranged, or worn out by intense
and perpetual exertion. I was too far gone now
to rally, or retrace the path upwards; but I did
pause, as this sad, and maddening truth flashed upon
my mind at last. I would, if I could, have tried to
be myself; to have been kind to her again, and if
possible, to have soothed her into her former state
of innocent and natural vivacity. But it was only
liquor that gave me a diabolical energy in
wickedness
,
and when free from its influence, I was
altogether
incapable of exertion. I tried the
experiment
,
and its failure only sunk me deeper into
despair and perdition. I could not retrace the
past, or undo its fatal consequences; but I could
still produce a temporary indistinctness of
perception
,
which though not amounting to total
forgetfulness, was still something to a wretch like
me. The effort therefore, like all efforts made too
late, only made me the more determined to
persevere
in the work of destruction, and accelerated
the consummation that always awaits a career like
mine.
My little childrenI can mourn over them now,
for I am compelled to be sober, and shall never
be permitted to see them again. My poor
children
were beginning to feel the effects of that
16
alienation of mind, which was now speedily
approaching
on their mother. They ran wild about
the house and in the fields, ragged and filthy. They
were old enough to see the degradation of one
parent, and the inconsistencies of the other. At
times, I encouraged them in all the wild, wayward
caprices of undisciplined youth; taught them to
blaspheme, like myself, and forced them to drink
with me till they reeled about the room. At
others, when the capricious fiend that ruled my
actions
,
forced me into another species of excess, I
would punish them in the most cruel manner, for
the very faults I had previously forced them to
commit, while my poor Amelia would dance about
the room, and laugh, till the tears came into her
eyes.
Will any body believe me? Yet it is true. I
now took a malignant pleasure in tempting my
wife to share with me in those excesses which had
blasted my soul, and destroyed her reason, in a
great degree. The innate delicacy of her sex,
and the barriers of a refined education, had
hitherto
preserved her from that influence which is so
often exercised by the husband over the wife, the
wife over the husband, in cases similar to mine.
Strange as it is, still experience proves its truth,
those very examples which one might suppose,
would become only the more disgusting by a
repetition
of their excesses, do actually in time
reconcile
us to their enormity. Use lessens the
sense of disgust, and continued forgiveness and
reconciliation, at length induces a compromise
with vice, fraught with imminent danger to the
innocent
.
To acquire a habit of forgiving crimes, is
too often to make advances towards them
ourselves
.
It is necessary to the security of virtue,
that we should abhor vice. My own experience
has taught me this.
Yet from the bottom of my soul, I believe my
poor Amelia, had she been herself,
notwithstanding
her mistaken lenity, and mischievous
indulgence
of my excesses, would never, in her rational
moments, have degraded herself by a participation
in my orgies. At last however, and by
imperceptible
degrees, she fell from her high estate, and
sunknot indeed to my dead level of measureless
brutalitybut low enough to lose herself, and all
she once had been. I will not describe the scenes
which my home now presented, almost every day.
Husband, wife, father, mother, children, all mad;
now singing and laughing; now cursing and
swearing
like the inmates of a mad-house. But I will
not particularize. Enough has been displayed, I
hope, to disgust and deter, whosoever shall read
my story, before he has become as lost as I am.
Let me hasten to the catastrophe, that my moral
may be complete.
From the period that my diabolical plot began
to succeed, my poor Amelia, who had hitherto
acquiesced, as I have more than once premised, in
all my wishes, whims, and inflictions, began to
exhibit
symptoms of opposition. Shaken in her
steady intellect, and stimulated by artificial
excitement
,
she became obstinate, contentious, and
occasionally keenly sarcastic in her reproaches.
Accustomed as I had been to unresisting
obedience
,
these strange novelties threw me sometimes
almost into a phrenzy. Alas! why is it that
obstinate
,
irreclaimable drunkards, are not treated as
madmen, and shut up where they have neither the
power of gratifying their taste, or the opportunity
to commit crimes? Surely, if there be such a
thing as madness in the world, it is exhibited by the
malignant sot, with his passions stimulated into
phrenzy by draughts of liquid fire. Such a one is
not only mad, but wilfully mad, not by the
visitation
of heaven, but his own deliberate acts. Yet the
innocent, afflicted being, is confined, starved, and
manacled, while the wretch who becomes the
assassin
of his own soul, is left at large, to disgrace
his country, his nature, and his God, by wallowing
from day to day, in beastliness and sin.
One dayit was an ominous daythe
anniversary
of our marriagein a fit of savage hilarity,
I swore I would celebrate it with more than usual
splendour. I got up at twelve the preceding night,
and intoxicated myself before sunrise, when I went
to bed and slept myself partly sober again before
dinner. At dinner I drank, and enticed my poor
Amelia to follow my example, till the little reason
left us began to stagger on its throne. I proposed
a toastOur wedding dayand many happy
returns
of it. A sudden pang seemed to cross her
mind, and produce a train of bitter recollections.
Was it not a happy day, Amelia, said I
tauntingly
.
She burst into tears, and covered her face with
her hands for a minute; then slowly removing
them, she replied with a look of agony, that still
haunts me day and night,Yes, it was a happy
daybut. The tone and look irritated my
already infuriated spirit, burning as it was in
liquid
flames. But whatreplied ICome,
speak outlet us have no secrets on this happy
day. We have paid dearly for itshe said
You with the loss of fortune, fame, and
goodness
I
with a broken heart, and a shattered
reason
.
And I alone am to blame for all this, I
suppose
?
No; I blame nothing but my own folly. I
had my warnings, but they came too late, or
rather
as my conscience tells me, I shut my ears to
them. Would I had died, added she, wringing
her hands, before that miserable day.
I laughed aloud. Poor soul, cried I, does
it mean to say I deceived it. Pish, woman! did
you ever flatter yourself your weak and silly sex
was a match for menmen of the worldmen of
experience. Pshaw! a wife is a mere plaything
a
16*
A victim, sighed my poor wife. But what
can you charge me with?
Your fortune is gone, said I.
Who was it wasted it for me?
Your beauty is turned to deformity; you have
grown as ugly as the.
Who spoiled it by robbing me of rest by night,
of happiness by day?
You are no longer the gay, sprightly, animated,
witty thing that won my heart.
Your heart, replied she, scornfully; but
who was it that robbed me of my gaiety; that
worried my sickened soul by night and day; that
has broken my heart, and turned my brain? Do
you know the man, the monster I would say?
Her eyes now flashed fire as she continued, Do
you know the monster, I say? he who deceived my
youth; wasted my fortune; destroyed my
happiness
;
degraded the modesty of my sex and station;
poured liquid fires down my throat and heaped
coals of fire on the heads of my children? who
rendered the past a recollection of horror, the
present
yet worsethe futureO my God!
I
, whom you promised to love and obey all
your life. Come, give me an example of
obedience
,
cried I, pouring out a glass of filthy liquor,
come, one bumper more; I swear you shall
drink one bumper more to this happy daycome!
I will not; I am already more than half a
beast!
And half a fool, muttered I, rising and
staggering
to the other side of the table, where she
was sitting, I swear by h-ll, you shall drink it.
I swear by Heaven I will not!
Who shall answer for the actions of a man, mad
with drink! Not himself, for he is a beast
without
a soul; not his Maker, for he has abandoned
him. A struggle now ensued, during which I
gradually
became irritated into fury. The children
clung affrighted about us, but I kicked them away.
My poor Amelia at length struck the glass out of
my hand; I became furious as a demon, and threw
her from me with a diabolical force, against the
corner of the fire-place. She fell, raised herself
half up, gave her children one look and me
another
,
and sunk down again. She was dead.
I am now the sober tenant of a mad-house.
The jury that tried me, would not believe a man
who acted such scenes as were proved upon me,
could be in his senses. They acquitted me on the
score of insanity. My relatives placed me here
to pass the rest of my days, and recover my senses
if I can. But I am not mad; the justice of
heaven
has ordained that I shall live while I live, in
the full perception of my past wickedness. I
know not what is become of my children, for no
one will answer my inquiriesno one will tell me
where they are, or whether they are dead or alive.
All I can understand is, that I shall never see
them more. My constant companion day and night,
waking or dreaming, is my murdered wife. Every
moment of my life is spent in recalling to my
mind, the history of that ill fated girl, and in
summing
up what I have to answer for to her, her
friends and her offspring. Denied the indulgence
of all sorts of stimulants, my strength is gone; my
body shrunk and shrivelled almost to a skeleton,
and my limbs quake with the least exertion.
Guilt grins me in the face; infamy barks at my
heels; scorn points her finger at me; disease is
gnawing at my vitals; death already touches me
with his icy fingers; and eternity waits to swallow
me up. I am going to meet Amelia!
The man to whose charge I am committed, has
furnished me with the means of fulfilling this my
last task, and making the only atonement in my
power, for what I have done. If there be any one
who shall read this, to whom temptation may
beckon afar off, at a distance which disguises its
deformity, let him contemplate me as I entered on
the stage of life; as I pursued my career forward;
as I closed, or am about to close it for ever. Let
him not cheat his soul; let him not for a moment
believe, that it is impossible for him to become as
bad, nay, worse than I have been. If we look
only at the beginning and the end of a career of
infamy
and wickedness, the space appears a gulf
which the delinquent has overleapt at a single
bound. But if we examine into the particulars of
his life and progress, we shall seldom fail to find
that the interval has been passed, and the goal
attained, step by step, by little and little, from
good to bad, from bad to worse. The pride of
human reason, may whisper in our ears that
we
can
never become like the wretch whose career we
have just been tracing. But as poor Ophelia
says, We know what we are, but we know not
what we may be. It is only to begin as I began;
to sow the same seeds, and be sure that in good
time you will reap the same fruits; drink the same
gall and bitterness here, the same fiery draught
hereafter.
DYSPEPSY.
O cookery! cookery! That kills more than weapons, guns,
wars, or poisons, and would destroy all, but that physic helps to
make away some.
Anthony Brewer
.
Ye
who flatter yourselves that indolence and
luxury, are compatible with the enjoyment of
vigour of health, and hilarity of spirits, that the
acquisition of the means of happiness, is to be
happy, and that the habitual pampering of the
senses, is not forever paid for by the depression
of the immortal soul, listen to my story, and be
wise.
I am the son of a reputable gentleman, who
made a good figure in the Revolutionary War,
and possessed a competent estate in one of the
adjacent counties. His name will be found in
the old
Committees of Safety
. He ranked as a
Colonel, in the Continental Army, and acted as a
Deputy Commissary General, in the year 1779.
In this latter situation he committed the most
enormous
follies; for finding the good people, his
neighbours, would not exchange their goods for
money that was good for nothingthey were
wiser than the present race notwithstanding the
march of mindhe pledged his own
responsibility
for the supplies, without which, the army at
Peeks Kill, would have suffered greatly. He was
warmly thanked in letters from distinguished
persons
in the old congress, for people are apt to be
grateful in time of danger; but when at the
conclusion
of the struggle, he presented his accounts,
the danger being over, the accounting officers
refused to allow a credit for the debts he had
incurred
on his own responsibility. My father
returned
home a ruined, and broken hearted man.
His old neighbours pitied him, but they could not
lose their money. They justly considered, that
charity begins at home, and that there was no
moral principle, obliging them to starve
themselves
and their children for the sake of other
people. I do not blame them. They divided my
father's property between them, and finding there
was nothing left, they forgave him the rest of his
debts. The contractors and commissaries of the
day, with great appearance of reason, called him
a fool, for ruining himself in a station where every
other man managed to grow rich. The old
farmers
,
his neighbours, some of whom are still alive,
have often told me that he deserved well of his
country; but his name has been smothered under
17
the load of great, good, and patriotic people, that
have since sprung up in these times that try men's
soles
.
My father might have petitioned congress, and
died like poor Amy Dardin and her horse, before
the members had finished making their speeches.
But he was a cold, proud man, who often went
without his dues, because he would not ask for
them. He accordingly sat down with his little
family around him, steeped in poverty; consoled
himself with reading books, and studying the
stars, and waited in gloomy inactivity for the
time, when a great pocket book full of continental
money, and a few thousand dollars in continental
certificates, should become worth something. The
continental money as every body knows, never
recovered itself; the certificates were afterwards
funded at their full value. But previous to this,
my father had under the strong pressure of
necessity
,
sold them for almost nothing, to a worthy
friend of his, who afterwards turned out one of
the most eloquent advocates of the Funding
System
.
Heavens! how he did talk of the sufferings
and privations of the patriots of the Revolution!
He certainly owed them a good turn, for he got
enough by them to build a palace, and purchase
half the Genesee country.
At the period of our ruin, I was about ten years
old, I think, and until that time, I had been
brought up as the children of wealthy country
gentlemen generally are. I had some of the
feelings
and a portion of the manners of a gentleman's
son, which I hope I still retain, although, to say
the truth, the latter part of my education was
deplorable
enough. My father, from the period in
which he felt himself dishonoured by the rejection
of his accounts, retired within himself, and seemed
benumbed in heart and spirits. He passed his
whole time in reading the few books that he
could come at; and his temper became
imperturbable
,
except at such times as he was disturbed,
and forced to remove from his seat. He would then
exhibit symptoms of internal discomposure, make
for the nearest chair, set himself down and resume
his studies. Half the time he would have forgot
his dinner, had my mother not waked him from his
reverie. To be sure, our dinner was hardly worth
eating; but to the best of my recollection, I never
enjoyed a better appetite, or had so little of the
Dyspepsy. We were often on the very verge of
want, and had it not been for the exertions of my
excellent mother, who, thank God, is still living,
and at least ten years younger than I amaided by
the good offices of a sister, well married in the
city, we had sometimes actually wanted the
necessaries
of life. It was not then so much the
fashion for genteel people to go begging. But it
is astonishing what the presiding genius of a
sensible
,
prudent, industrious mother, can do; what
miracles indeed she can achieve, in keeping
herself
,
her husband, and her children, decent, at
least. My mother did all this, and more; she sent
me to school; and it is not the least of my sources
of honest pride, that my education, such as it was,
cost the public nothing. Women,
notwithstanding
what cynics may say, are born for something
better than wasting time, and spending money; and
I hereby apprise the reader, that if ever I am guilty
of a sarcasm against woman, it is only when I am
labouring under the horrors of Dyspepsy.
Till the age of sixteen, I never saw the city; to
me it was the region of distant wonders, ineffable
splendours, wise men, and beautiful women. I
reverenced a New-Yorker, as I now do a
person
who has been to Paris or Rome; and I shall
never forget my extreme admiration of a fine lady,
the daughter of a little tailor, who lived near us.
She was an apprentice to a milliner, and came up
during the prevalence of the Yellow Fever, with
three band boxes, and a pocket-handkerchief
full of finery. The world of romance; the region
of airy nothings; of creatures that come and go at
will, before the youthful fancy, was now just
opening
before me in long perspective. I was without
employment, for if my mother had a weakness, it
was one which I verily believe belongs even to the
female angels. She could not forget old times,
nor bear the idea that her only son, should learn a
trade, or slave in any useful occupation.
Deprived thus of the resources of active
employment
,
I spent my time either in reading, or
roaming
at random and unpurposed, through the
beautiful
romantic scenes which surrounded our poor,
yet pleasant abode. My mind was a complete
contrast to my bodythe latter was indolence
itself; the former a perfect erratic vagrant. I was
eternally thinking, and doing nothing. The least
spark awakened in my mind visions of the future
for that was all to meand lighted my path
through long perspectives of shadowy happiness.
Sometimes I was a soldier, winning my way to the
highest heaven of military glorysometimes a
poet, the admiration of the fair; and sometimes I
possessed what then seemed to me, the sure means
of perfect happinessten thousand a year. For
days and weeks, and months, and years, I hardly
spoke an unnecessary wordI lived in a world of
my own, and millions of thoughts, wishes, fears,
and hopes; millions of impulses and impressions
arose in my mind, and died away, without ever
receiving a being through the medium of my
tongue, or my pen.
The first born of the passions is love; and love is
of earlier, as well as more vigorous growth, in
solitude
.
I was always in love with some one; for
love was indispensable to my visionary existence.
It ended however, as it began, in abstract dreams,
and amatory reveries. It is now my pride, to know
that no woman was ever yet the wiser, for my
preference
.
My affection never manifested itself in
17*
any other way, than by increasing shyness. I
never voluntarily came near a young woman at
any time; but when I was in love, I always
ran away. I would as soon have met a spirit,
as the object of my affections. I was
moreover
much given to jealousy, and pique; always
persuading myself against truth and reason, that
the love of which I was myself so conscious, must
of necessity be understood by her, from whom I
was at such pains to keep it a secret. The history
of my amours, with imaginary mistresses, and
mistresses
that never imagined my love, is curious; I
may one day give it to the world. But my present
object is different. I will therefore only say, that
I grew up to the age of seventeen or eighteen, a
sheer, abstract mana being of thought, rather
than action; a dweller in a world of my own
curious and ridiculous composition; living
neither
in the past or the present, but in the vast space
before me. My companions were shadows of my
own creation; my enjoyments were the production
of these shadows. Yet, for all this, I became
neither mad, nor an idiot. It seemed as if I was
all this time preparing myself for realities; and
that my sojournings in the world of fancy,
imperceptibly
initiated me into the material world.
I cannot otherwise account for my early success in
life, nor the miracle of escaping its shoals and
quick-sands.
At the age of seventeen or eighteen, I forget
which, I was sent for by an uncle who had
married
my mother's sister, and who was a merchant
of some note. At one step, I passed from the
ideal to the material world. There is but one
greater
step, and that is from the material world, to the
world of spirits. My uncle was an honest, liberal,
cross, gouty old Irish gentleman, with plenty of
relations in Ireland he would not acknowledge,
though they proved that they sprung from the
same family tree He was an inordinate tory; a
member of the Belvidere Club, and a mighty
fish-eater
at Becky's. When I first went to live with
him, he was getting rather old and infirm. His
hair was as white as snow; his face as rosy as the
sun in a mist; his body robust to all appearance,
and had it not been for his dd legs as he
was pleased to say, he would have been as good a
man as he was twenty years ago. There is
certainly
a great change in the world, within the last
half century, People lived at least as well as they
do now, and only got the goutnow they get
Dyspepsy. Can any learned physician tell me the
reason of this emigration of the old enemy, from
the great toe to the stomach?
The old gentleman had a heart big enough to
hold all the world, except the French, the
Democrats
,
and the multiplicity of cousins, and second
cousins, who claimed kindred there, and had
not
their claims allowed. He had in truth a most
intolerable
contempt for poor relations. I believe
he would have served his wife's family the same
way, but the truth is, my aunt wasbut it is a great
secretshe could make him do just as she
pleased, for she was the best natured creature in
the world, and none but a brute can resist a
kindhearted
woman. Being a relation, I was treated
with a seat at the dinner-table. The old
gentleman
was reckoned one of the best livers in town,
and here it was, I believe, that I laid the corner
stone of my miseries. At home, there had been no
temptation to gluttonyhere there was a sad
succession
of allurements, such as human nature
seldom
can resist, even when experience has
demonstrated
their ill consequences, and Death sits
shaking
his dart, over every successive delicacy.
People talk of the mischiefs of drinking; invent
remedies and preventives, and institute societies,
as if eating was not ten times more pernicious.
There are a hundred die of eating to one that dies
of drinking. But gluttony is the vice of
gentlemen
,
and gentlemanly vices require neither
remedies
,
preventives, nor societies. It is not
necessary
to my purpose that I should make a book out
of my apprenticeship, as Goethe has; nor am I
writing the history of my uncle, else I might tell
some fine stories of his life, actions, and end. His
latter years were spent as usual, in paying the
penalty of former indulgences, and a
complication
of disorders carried him off in a green old
age. In three months from the time of his death,
half the county of Kilkenny claimed kindred
with him. There were so many different
claimants
,
that nobody but the lawyers could settle the
matter. After three or four years, a decision was
finally had in favour of a young man, who on
taking possession, had the mortification to
discover
that nothing was left. The law had become
my uncle's heir. It is an excellent thing to have
plenty of laws and courts of law; but then one can
have too much of a good thing, and pay too much
for it. Tournefort, in his travels to the east, says,
An Italian once told me at Constantinople, that
we should be very happy in Europe, if we could
appeal from our courts to the divan; `for,' added
he, `one might go to Constantinople, and all over
Turkey too if there were occasion, before one suit
could be finally decided in Europe.' A Turk,
continues M. Tournefort, pleading before the
parliament of Provence, against a merchant of
Marseilles, who had led him a dance for many
years from court to court, made a very merry
reply
to one of his friends, who desired to know the
state of his affairs. `Why they are wonderfully
altered,' says he: `when I first arrived here I had
a roll of pistoles as long as my arm, and my
pleadings
were comprised in a single sheet; but at
present
I have a writing above six times as long as
my arm, and my roll of pistoles is but half an
inch.' I wish the lawgivers, the judges, and more
especially the lawyers, would recollect that time
is money, and that to waste both the time and the
money of suitors, is a double oppression. A man
might better get the bastinado promptly though
wrongfully sometimes, than wait seven years for his
rights, as in some Christian countries.
The death of my uncle was a lucky affair for
me, as by it I lost the mischievous allurements of
his table, and was thrown upon my own resources
for a livelihood. Hard days make soft nights;
and I soon found that the necessity of exertion,
and the occasional difficulties in procuring a
dinner
,
soon reinstated me in the possession of the
only inheritance I received from my father, a hale
constitution. It was my good fortune, as the world
would call it, to meet with a young man of capital,
who wanted a partner skilled in the business my
uncle had followed. We accordingly entered
into partnership, and our business proved
exceedingly
profitable. In a few years, I had more
money than I required for my wants, and with the
necessity of exertion ceased the inclination.
When a man has been toiling for years to get rich,
and dreaming all the while that riches will add to
his enjoyments, he must try and realize his dreams,
after his exertions have been crowned with
success
.
I had proposed to myself a life of ease
and luxury, as the reward of all my labours.
Accordingly
,
finding myself sufficiently wealthy, I
retired from the firm as an active partner,
continuing
,
however, my name to the connexion, and
receiving a share of the profits, in return for the
use of my capital.
I am now my own master, said I, as I shook the
dust of the counting house from my feet. I can
do as I please, and go where I please. Now a
man that has but one thing to do, and one place
to go to, can never be in the predicament of the
animal between two bundles of hay; nor puzzled
to death in the midst of conflicting temptations.
At first, I thought of going to Europe; but before
I could make up my mind, the packet had sailed,
and before another was ready I had altered my
mind. Next, I decided for the Springs; then for
the Branch; then for Schooley's mountain, and
then, in succession, for every other resort of
beauty and fashion, in these United States. In
conclusion, I went to none of them. I made but
two excursions: one of the Fireplace, to catch trout,
where I caught an ague; and the other to Sing
Sing, to see the new State prison, where I missed
the ague and caught a bilious fever. Thus the
summer passed away, and I may say I did nothing
but eat. That is an enjoyment, in which both
ease and luxury are combined, and my
indisposition
had left behind a most voracious appetite.
Towards the latter end of autumn, I began to feel,
I can scarcely tell how. I slept all the evening,
and lay awake all the night; or if I fell asleep,
always dreamed I was suffocating between two
feather beds. I was plagued worse than poor
Pharaoh. I had aches of all sorts: stiff necks,
pains in the shoulders, sides, back, loins, head,
breast; in short, there never was a man so
capriciously
used by certain inexplicable,
unaccountable
infirmities as I was. I dare say I had often
felt the same pains before, without thinking of
them, because I was too busy to mind trifles; for
it is a truth which my experience has since verified,
that the most ordinary evils of life are intolerable,
without the stimulus of some active pursuit, to
draw us from their perpetual contemplation. What
was very singular, I never lost my appetite all this
time, but ate more plentifully than ever. Indeed
eating was almost the only amusement I had,
ever since I became a man of pleasure; and it
was only while eating, that I lost the sense of
those innumerable pains that tormented me at
other times.
I went to a physician, who gave me directions
as to the various modes of treatment in these cases.
You are dyspeptic, said he, and you must
either eat less, exercise more, take physic, or be
sick. As to eating less, that was out of the
question. What is the use of being rich, unless a
man can eat as much as he likes; as to exercise,
what is the use of being rich if a man can't be as
lazy as he pleases. The alternative lay between
being sick or taking physic, and I chose the latter.
The physician shook his head and smiled, but it is
not the doctor's business to discourage the taking
of physic, and he prescribed accordingly. I took
medicines, I ate more than ever, and what quite
discouraged me, I grew worse and worse. I sent
for the doctor again. You have tried physic in
vain; suppose you try exercise on horseback,
said he.
I bought a horse, cantered away every
morning
like a hero, and ate more than ever; for
what was the use of exercise except to give
one impunity in eating? I never worked half
so hard when I was an apprentice, and not
worth a groat, as I did now I was a gentleman of
ease and luxury. It was necessary, the doctor said,
that the horse should be a hard trotter; and
accordingly
I bought one that trotted so hard, that he
actually
broke the paving stones in Broadway, and
struck fire at every step. O, reader! gentle reader,
if thou art of Christian bowels, pity me! I was
dislocated
in every joint, and sometimes envied St.
Barnabas
his gridiron. But I will confess that the
remedy proved not a little efficacious, and it is my
firm opinion that had I persevered, I should have
been cured in time, had I not taken up a mistaken
notion, that a man who exercised a great deal,
might safely eat a great deal. Accordingly, I ate
by the mile, and every mile I rode furnished an
apology for a farther indulgence of appetite. The
exercise and the eating being thus balanced, I
remained just where I was before.
I sent for the physician again. You have
tried medicine and exercise, suppose you try a
regimen
.
18
Continue the exercise; eat somewhat
less; confine yourself to plain food, plainly
dressed
;
abstain from rich sauces, all sorts of spices,
pastes, confectionaries, and puddings, particularly
plumb puddings, and generally every kind of
luxury
,
and drink only a glass or two of wine. Why,
zounds! doctor, I might as well be a poor man at
once! Why what is the use of being rich, if I
can't eat and drink, and do just as I like?
Besides
,
I am particularly fond of sauces, spices, and
plumb puddings.
Why so you may do as you like, replied he,
smiling. You have your choice between
Dyspepsy
and all these good things.
The doctor left me to take my choice, and after
great and manifold doubts, resolutions and
retractions
,
I decided on trying the effects of this most
nauseating remedy. I practised the most rigid
self-denial; tasted a little of this, a very little of
that, a morsel of the other, and ate moderately of
every thing on the table; cheating myself
occasionally
by tasting slyly a bit of confectionary, or
a slice of plumb pudding. Now and then, indeed
when I felt better than usual, I indulged more
freely, as indeed I had a right to do; for what is
the use of starving at one time, except to enable
oneself to indulge at another? The physician
came one day to dine with me at my
boarding
house, the most famous eating place in the
whole city, and the most capital establishment for
Dyspepsy. He came, he said, on purpose to see
how I followed his prescription. I was extremely
abstinent that day, only eating a mouthful of every
thing, now and then. The doctor, I observed
played a glorious knife and fork, and seemed
particularly
fond of rich sauces, spices, paste, and
plumb pudding.
Well, doctor, said I, after the rest of the
company had retired, am not I a herea
perfect
anchorite?
My dear sir, said he, I took the trouble to
count every mouthful. You have eaten twice as
much as an ordinary labourer, and tasted of every
thing on the table.
But only tasted, doctor; while youyou
gave me a most edifying example. Faith, you
displayed a most bitter antipathy to pies, custards,
rich sauces, and most especially plumb pudding.
My dear Ambler, said the doctor, you are
to follow my prescriptions, not my example. But
by the way, that was delightful wine, that last
bottleBingham, or Marston, hey?
I took the hint, and sent for another bottle,
which we discussed equally between us, glass for
glass. I felt so well, I sent for another, and we
discussed that too.
My dear fellow, said the doctor, who by this
time saw double, my dear friend, mind don't
forget
my prescription; no sauces, no spices, no
paste, no plumb pudding, and above all, no wine.
Adieu. I am going to a consultation.
That night I suffered martyrdom; night-mare,
dreams, and visions of horror. A grinning villain
came, and seizing me by the toe, exclaimed, I
am Gout, I come to avenge the innocent calves
who have suffered in forced meat balls, and mock
turtle, for your gratification. Another blear eyed,
sneering rogue, gave me a box on the ear, that
stung through every nerve, crying out, I am
Catarrh, come to take satisfaction for the wine you
drank yesterday; while a third, more hideous
than the other two, a miserable, cadaverous,
longfaced
fiend, came up, touching me into a thousand
various pains, and crying in a hollow, desparing
voice, I am Dyspepsy, come to punish you
for the gluttony of yesterday I awoke next
morning in all the horrors of indigestion and
acidity
,
which lasted several days, during which
time I made divers excellent resolutions,
forswearing
wine, particularly old wine, most
devoutly
.
This time however, I had one consolation. The
doctor and not I was to blame. It was he that
led me into excesses for which I was now paying
the penalty. I felt quite indignant. I'll let
him know, said I, that I am my own master,
and not to be forced to drink against my
inclination
.
So I discharged the doctor who set me
such a bad example, and called in three more,
being pretty well assured that I should now hear
all sides of the question. Professional men
seldom or ever agree perfectly in opinion,
because
that would indicate that neither has an
opinion of his own. They retired into my
dressing-room
,
forgetting to shut the door. Doctors in
consultation should always make sure to shut the
door.
He wants excitement, said Doctor Calomel,
a thunderbolt of science, there isthat is to
say, the bile has got the better of the blood, and
the phlegm has overpowered the atrabilethey
are struggling like fury for the upper hand. We
must give him a dose of calomel.
Not at all, quoth Doctor Jalap, whose great
excellence consisted in the number of capital
letters
he carried at the tail of his name, insomuch
that he was called the Professor of A. B. C,
not at allthe salt, sulphur, and mercury which
Paracelsus affirms constitute the matter of all
animal
bodies, are in a state of disorganization. We
must therefore give him two doses of calomel.
What a piece of work is man!thought Isalt,
sulphur, and mercury!
The body being an hydraulic engine, quoth
Doctor Rhubarb, who valued himself on his theory,
the body being an hydraulic engine, our
remedies
must be founded on the laws of magnitude, and
motion; we must therefore give him three doses of
calomel in succession; the first to increase the
18*
magnitude of the stomach, the others, to cause
motion.
Pish, quoth Doctor Calomel, what nonsense
is this, about salt, sulphur, and mercury:
Paracelsus
was a fool.
'Sdeath, cried Doctor Jalap, he always swore
by his old friend; 'sdeath! sir, if you come to that
sir, what nonsense is this, about bile, and phlegm,
and atrabile; and you sir, turning to Doctor
Rhubarb
,
with your hydraulic machine; you might as
well call a man a forcing pump at once.
Hippocrates
was a great blockhead, and knew nothing
of chymistry; and so was Meade, Borelli, and the
rest of the hydraulic machines.
The debate was getting hot, when Dr. Jalap,
who was a man of great skill and experience in his
profession, interposed the olive branch.
Gentlemen, said the doctor, nothing
weakens
the influence of the profession, and destroys the
confidence of the public in medicine, so much as
the opposite opinions of physicians. Where is the
use of quarrelling about the disease, when we all
agree in the remedy?
So they ordered the calomel.
But it would not do, though I continued my
system
of abstinence, and only barely tasted a little of
every thing; at the same time compromising
matters
with my conscience, by drinking twelve half
glasses of wine, instead of six whole ones. The
doctors on the whole, did me more harm than good.
Their different opinions had conjured up a
hundred
chimeras in my fancy, and inflicted on me a
host of new complaints I never felt before.
Sometimes
the conflicts of the bile and the phlegm,
turned every thing topsy-turvy; anon the salt,
sulphur
,
and mercury fell together by the ears; and
lastly, the hydraulic machine got terribly out of
order. It was no joke then, though now I can look
back upon these horrors, as on a sea of ills, that I
have safely passed over. My spirits began to sink;
for I considered that I had now tried all remedies,
and that my case was hopeless. The fear of death,
swelled into a gigantic and disproportioned
magnitude
of evil, came upon me. I never heard of a
person dying of a disease, let it be what it would,
that I did not make that the bugbear of my
imagination
,
and feel all the symptoms appropriate to
it. Thus I had by turns, all the diseases under the
sun; sometimes separately, sometimes all
together
.
The sound of a church bell, conjured up
the most gloomy associations, and the sight of a
church yard withered every feeling of hilarity in my
bosom. In short, there were moments of my life,
when I could fully comprehend the paradox of a
human being seeking death, as a relief from its
perpetual apprehension, as the bird flies into the
maw of the serpent, from the mere fascination of
terror.
It is one of the most melancholy features of the
disease, under which I laboured, that it creates a
most disproportioned apprehension of death; a
vague and horrible exaggeration, if possible ten
times worse than the reality. In most other
disorders
the pain of the body supercedes that of the
mind; in this, the mind predominates over the body,
and the sense of apprehension of the future,
swallows
up the present entirely. This was the case
with me; and often have I welcomed an acute fit
of rheumatism, or cholic, as a present cure for
anticipated
evils. I had another enemy to
contend
with, and that was the want of sympathy.
People laughed at my complaints, when they saw
me eat my meals with so good an appetite; for the
world seldom gives a man credit for ailing any
thing, when he can eat his allowance; nor is it
easy to persuade the vulgar, that there is such a
disease as appetite. Besides, a man who is always
complaining, and never seeming to grow worse, is
enough to tire the patience of Job, much more of
such friends as Job and most afflicted people are
blessed with. My mind was in a perpetual state
of fluctuation. One day I threw all my phials, and
boxes, and doses into the street, determined to take
no more physic; and the next perhaps, sent for
some more, and renewed my potions. I had lost
by this time all confidence in physicians, but still
continued to believe in physic.
For a while, white mustard seed was a treasure
to me, and such was my firm reliance on its
wonderful
virtues, that I actually indulged myself in a
few extra glasses, and a few extra luxuries on the
credit of its prospective operation. I read all the
guides to health, and all the lectures of Doctor
Abenethy. In short I took every means but the
only proper ones, to effect a cure. I
proportioned
my eating and other indulgencies, to my
faith in the workings of my favourite panacea.
When I took a dose of physic, I considered
myself
as fairly entitled to take a small liberty the
day after; and when I rode or walked farther than
usual, I made the old wine, and the sauces, and
plumb pudding pay for it. It was thus that I
managed to keep myself in a perfect equilibrium,
and like another Penelope, undid in the afternoon
the work of the morning. I found after all,
nothing
did me so much good as laughing; but
alas! what was there for me to laugh at in this
world!
The summer of my second year of ease and
luxury
,
I was advised to go to the Springs, where all
the doctors send those patients who get out of
patience
at not being cured in a reasonable time.
Here I found several companions in affliction, and
was mightily comforted to learn that some of them
had been in their present state almost a score of
years, without ever dying at all. We talked over
our infirmities, and I found there was a wonderful
family resemblance in them all, for not one of us
could give a tolerable account of his symptoms.
One was bilious, another rheumatic, a third was
nervous, and a fourth was all these put together.
Why don't you exercise in the open air?
said I, to this last martyr, one day.
I catch cold, and that brings on my
rheumatism
.
In the house then?
It makes me nervous.
Why don't you sit still?
It makes me bilious.
I thank my stars, thought I, here is a man to
grow happy upon; he is worse off than myself. He
became my favourite companion; and no one can
tell how much better I felt in his society.
We formed a select coterie, and managed to sit
next each other at meals, where we discussed the
subject of digestion. We were all blessed with
excellent appetites, and particularly fond of the
things that did not agree with us.
Really, Mr. Butterfield, you are eating the
very worst thing on the table.
I know it, my dear sir, but I am so fond of it.
My good friend Mr. Creamwell, how can you
taste that hot bread?
My dear sir, don't you see I only eat the
crust.
Let me advise you not to try that green corn,
Mr. Ambler. It is the worst thing in the world
for dyspeptic people.
I know it, my dear Abstract, but I always
take good care to chew, before I swallow it.
Thus we went on, discussing and eating, and I
particularly noticed that every one ate what he
preferred, because the fact was, he was so
particularly
fond of that particular dish, he could not
help indulging in it sometimes. However, we
talked a great deal on the subject of diet, and not
a man of us but believed himself a pattern of
abstinence
.
I continued my custom of riding every
fair day, and occasionally met a fat lady fagging
along on a little fat pony, with a fat servant
behind
her. One day when it was excessively hot,
I could not help asking her how she could think
of riding out in the broiling sun.
O, sir, I've got the dyspepsy.
I happened to see her at dinner that day, and
did not wonder at it.
I passed my time rather pleasantly here with
my companions in misfortune. We exchanged
notes; compared our infirmities, and gave a full
and true history of their rise, progress, and
present
state, always leaving out the eating. By
degrees
I became versed in the history of each.
One was a literary man, and a poet. He set out
in life, with the necessity of economy and
exertion
,
and practiced a laborious profession for
some years, when by great good fortune, he
made a lucky speculation, that enabled him to
lead a life of ease and luxury. He devoted
himself
to the muses, and gained enough of
reputation
,
as he said, to make him indifferent to a thing
which he perceived came and went by chance or
fashion. However, he did not make this
discovery
until after several of his works had been
condemned
to oblivion. Not having the stimulative of
necessity, and without the habit of being busy
about nothing, than which none can be more
essential to a life of ease and luxury, he gradually
sunk into indifference and lassitude. He finally
took to eating, and for want of some other object,
came at last to consider his dinner as the most
important affair of life. By degrees, he lost his
spirits and health, and came to the Springs to
recover them.
I ought to be happy, said he, for I have an
ample sufficiency of money, and as for fame, I
look to posterity for that.
The next person of our coterie, was a man who
in like manner had begun the world, a hardy, yet
honest adventurer. By dint of unwearied
perseverance
and the exertion of his excellent faculties,
he had risen, step by step, on the ladder of the
world, until at the age of fifty, he was in
possession
of a fair estate, and an unsullied name. But
he was sorely disappointed to find that what he
had been all his life seeking, was in fact a shadow.
This is the common error of sanguine tempers;
they first exaggerate the object of their pursuit,
and then quarrel with it because it does not
realize their expectations. I have all I ever
proposed
to myself in pursuing the means of
happiness
,
said he, and for aught I can remember, I
was happier in what I sought, than in what I
found. I will retire from these vain pursuits and
pass the rest of my life in ease and luxury.
Accordingly
he settled himself down, and having
nothing
else to think of in the morning, his time
hung heavy on him till dinner. Of consequence,
he began to long for dinner time; and of course,
dinner became an object of great consequence.
It was an era, in the four and twenty hours, and
you may rely on it, gentle reader, it was properly
solemnized. There are no people that eat so
much as the idle. The savage, basking in the
sun all day with his pipe, eats thrice as much,
when he can get it, as the industrious labourer.
The necessary consequences of high feeding,
connected
with inaction of body and mind, made
their appearance in good time, and my friend was
pronounced dyspeptic. Having in the course of
three years consulted twenty-five doctors; taken
a half bushel of white mustard; fifty kegs of
Jamison's Dyspepsy crackers, and swallowed six
hundred doses of various kinds in vain, (for he still
continued to have a glorious appetite, he at last
came to the Springs, where I had the happiness to
meet him.
I am indifferent to the world, said he, after
finishing the sketch, I am indifferent to the
world and all it contains.
19
Then why do you take such pains to live?
I don't know, said he, with a melancholy
smile, I sometimes think Providence implanted
in our hearts the fear of death, in order to enable
us to endure the ills of life, without fleeing to the
grave for a refuge.
Another of my new friends was brought up to
politics, a profession rather overstocked at present.
I will not enter into particulars, but merely state,
that after scuffling at meetings; declaiming at
polls; clinging to the skirts of great men;
fagging
at their errands; doing for them what they
were ashamed of doing for themselves; and
sacrificing
all private, social, and domestic duties to
his party principles, he at length attained an
honourable public station, which being permanent,
he flattered himself would secure him an
independency
for life. He accordingly discontinued his
active exertions, and confined himself to the
laborious
idleness and desperate monotony of his
office, which although it did not furnish
employment
,
enforced the necessity of constant
attendance
.
He grew lazy, idle and luxurious. The
morning was too long for his occupations, and the
usual consequence ensued; he waited for his
dinner
,
and made his dinner pay for it. In this way
he continued, increasing in riches and
complainings
of his health; passing through the various
stages of Dyspepsy, from the doctor to the horse;
from the horse to the white mustard, the blue pills,
and Dr. Abenethy; to every thing, in short, but
the right one. A sudden summerset of party, in
which all his friends turned their coats but
himself
,
brought him in jeopardy of office. They all
insisted he had deserted his party, when the fact
was, his party had deserted him, as he solemnly
assured me. Be this as it may, as his
appointment
was for life, and they could not get rid of
the incumbent, they got at him in another way;
they abolished the office, a cunning invention of
modern politicians. Having nothing to keep him
in town, he came to the Springs to nurse his
Dyspepsy
,
and rail at the ingratitude of republics.
There is but one more of the party to be
mentioned
.
He was the gentleman of all work, and
whose diseases were so provokingly contrasted,
that what was good for one, was bad for the other.
Being one day interrogated on the subject, he
began
:
I was born in the lap of here he yawned
pathetically, and I shall die in the arms of
here he gave another great yawn, but really
gentlemen, I feel so nervous, and bilious, and
rheumatic this morningI am sure the wind is
easterlypray excuse mesome other time. So
saying, he yawned once more, and went to see
which way the wind blew.
My readers, if they are such readers as alone I
address myself to, in looking back on the progress
of whatever wisdom and experience, time and
opportunity may have bestowed on them, will
have observed that a particular branch of
knowledge
,
or a special conviction of the understanding,
will often baffle our pursuit for a long while. We
grope in the darkwe lose ourselvesand lose
sight of the object of our pursuityet still we are
gaining upon it unknown and imperceptibly to
ourselves. The light is hidden, though just at
hand, and finally, all at once bursts upon us,
illuminates the mind, and brings with it the full,
perfect perception. Thus was it with me. I had
read all the most approved books, to come at the
mystery of a man being always sick, and always
hungry; and I had taken all the steps, save one,
which they recommended, either as cures or
palliatives
.
I was still in the dark, but I was
approaching
the light. The history of my
complaining
friends, at once put me upon the right path.
I saw in them what I could not see in myself.
On comparing their auto-biographiesodious,
clumsy word!I could not but perceive a family
likeness in all. They had commenced the world
with active ardent pursuits before them, and were
all too busy as well as too poor in their youth, to
become gluttons; and again they had each,
without
exception, attained at mid age, the means of
enjoying a life of luxury and ease. They had
arrived
at stations, in which they could enjoy both,
without the necessity of exertion, either of body or
mind, and they did enjoy them. But they wanted
something stillthey wanted a hobby-horse, a
stimulant of some kind or other, sufficiently
ardent
to carry their minds along without dragging
on the ground, and wearing them out with the
labour
of nothingness. They were in the situation
of a pair of fat pampered horses, belonging to a
friend of mine, a great mathematician, who though
he kept a carriage, never rode in it. Of course
they got plump, clumsy, and Dyspeptic; and never
were used without either falling lame, or tumbling
on their knees. My friend cast about for a
remedy
,
and at length hit upon one worthy of a
philosopher. He invented a machine, which
being fastened to the axle tree of his carriage,
made an excellent corn-mill, and sent his horses
out every day to take an airing, and grind their own
corn. The friction of the machine, created a
wholesome necessity for exertion in the horses,
which in a little time, became perfectly serviceable,
active, and sprightly. My companions in misery,
only wanted to be under the necessity of grinding
their own corn, and like the horses of my friend,
the mathematician, to combine the pleasure of
eating, with the labour of earning a meal.
Next to this necessity for exertion, is a hobby;
a pursuit of some kind or other, something to
awake the sleeping mind, if it be only to get up
and play puss in a corner. I know a worthy
gentleman, who has kept off ennui and its twin
sister, Dyspepsy, by a habit of going every day
19*
round all the docks, counting the vessels, and
reading the names on the stern. He came nigh
being drowned the other day, in leaning over the
edge of a wharf, to find out the name of a
beautiful
new ship. Another distances the foul fiend,
which is as lazy as a pampered house dog, by
walking up one street and down another,
examining
all the new houses that are building,
counting the number of rooms, closets, and
pantries
,
and noting divers other particulars. He can
describe the marble mantel-pieces of every new
house in town. But in my opinion, the wisest of
all my friends, was a wealthy idler, who was fast
sinking into the embraces of the besetting fiend
of the age. He all at once bethought himself of
altering his dinner hour, and afterwards went about
telling it to all his friends. Let not the dingy
moralists, who send out their decrees for the
acquisition
of happiness, from the depths of darkness,
and know no more of the world than a ground
mole, turn up their noses at these my especial
friends. Did they know what they ought to know,
before they set themselves up as teachers; did they
only know that when men have made their fortunes
by industry and economy, when they have paid
their debt to society in useful and honourable
pursuits
,
there comes a time when the bow must be
unstrung, when amusements, or at least light
occupations become indispensable, and trifles
assume
the importance, because they exercise the
influence of weighty circumstances on our
happiness
.
It is then that he who can find out an
innocent
mode of living, and innocent sources of
amusement, which interfere with no one's
happiness
,
and contribute to his own; which keep his
mind from preying on itself, and his body healthy,
is better entitled to the honours of philosophy
than inexperienced people are aware.
What would have been the effect of the new
light which had thus broke in upon me, whether
habit would have yielded to conviction, or
whether
as is generally the case with old offenders, I
should have continued to act against my better
reason, I know not. Happily, as I now know, I
was not left to decide for myself; fortune took
the affair in her own hands. I one morning
received
a letter apprising me of the failure of our
house, and the probable ruin it would bring upon
myself. That very day I set out for the city, with
a vigour and activity beyond all praise, and
proceeded
directly on without stopping by the way,
or once thinking of my digestion.
Adieu, said the poet, as I took leave of him,
never trust to the present age, but look to posterity
for your reward.
Farewell, said the despiser of this world,
take care of your health, and never eat sausages.
Good bye, said the politician, beware of the
ingratitude of republics.
Day-day, Mr. Ambler, said the nervous
gentleman
,
can you tell me which way the wind
blows? I wish you all hap here he was beset
by a yawn which lasted till I was in my carriage,
and on the way to the city.
Arriving in town, I plunged into a sea of
troubles. The younger partner of our house
being in a hurry to grow rich, had encouraged a
habit of speculating, which unfortunately for us
all, produced a pernicious habit of gambling in
schemes of vast magnitude. Having thrown
doublets two or three times in succession, he did
not, like a wise calculator, conclude that his luck
must be nearly exhausted, and retire from the
game with his winnings. He doubled again, and
lost all. I will not fatigue my readers with the
details of a bankruptcy of this kind. It will be
sufficient to say, that I took the business directly
in hand; nearly deranged my head in arranging
my affairs, and by dint of extraordinary industry,
and I will say extraordinary integrity, managed to
do what only three men before me in similar
circumstances
,
had ever done in this city, since the
landing of Hendrick Hudson. I paid the debts
of the firm to the last farthing, leaving myself
nothing
but a good name, a good conscience, and a
large farm in the very centre of the Highlands.
I worked every day in the business like a hero,
and took no care what I should eat or what I
should drink. My mind was fully occupied, and
I was perpetually running about, or examining
into my affairs at the counting house.
I went to pay off my last and greatest debt, to my
last creditor, a hard featured, hard working,
gigantic
Scotsman, who had the reputation of being a
most inflexible dealer. When all was settled he said,
Mr. Ambler, of course you mean to begin
business again. Remember that my credit, aye,
sir, my purse is at your service. You have gained
my confidence.
I thank you, Mr. Hardup, replied I, warmly,
sincerely; for I know you are sincere in your
offers. But I mean to retire into the country with
what I have saved from the wreck of my fortune.
I am tired of business, and too poor to be idle. I
have a farm in the mountains, which, I thank God,
is mine; for my creditors are all paid. You, sir,
are the last.
Very well, very well, replied Mr. Hardup,
stumping about as was his custom, but is your
farm stocked, and all that?
I was obliged to answer in the negative. It
was almost in a state of nature. Mr. Hardup said
nothing more, and I bade him farewell with a
feeling of indignation at his idle inquiries. The
next day I received the following note, enclosing
a check for a sum which I shall not mention:
Sir
You must have something to stock your
farm. Pay the enclosed when you are able. I
shall come and see you one of these days, when
you are settled. Send me neither receipt nor
thanks for the money. There is more where that
came from You have gained my confidence, I
repeat again; and no man ever gained, without I
hope being the better for it, sooner or later.
Your friend and servant,
Alexander Hardup
.
P. S. Get up early in the morning, see to
matters yourself; and never buy any thing dear
except a good name. A. H.
A worthy man was this Mr. Hardup; and I
shall never, while I live, again judge of any body
by the expression of the face, or the common report
of the world.
It was in the spring of the year 1818, that I
bade adieu to the city, and went to take
possession
of my farm, where I arrived, just when the
sun was gilding the mountain tops with his
retreating
rays, as he sunk behind the equally high
hills on the opposite side of the river. The scene
indeed was beautiful to look at, but by no means
encouraging to a man who was going to set down
here, and labour for a livelihood. I was received
by an old man and his wife, who had occupied
my farm a long time, at a very moderate rent,
which they never paid. The aspect of the
house was melancholy. Broken windows, broken
chairs, and a broken table. But there was plenty
of fresh air, and I slept that night on a straw bed,
and studied astronomy through the holes in the roof.
The dead silence too that reigned in this lonely
retreat, contrasted with the ceaseless racket of the
town, to which I had been so long accustomed,
had a mournful effect on my spirits, and disposed
my mind to gloomy thoughts of the future. The
fatigue of my journey, however, at last
overpowered
me, and I fell asleep with the certainty
of waking next morning with some terrible
malady
,
arising from my exposed situation. It is a
singular
fact, that I slept that night more sweetly
than I had done, ever since I determined upon the
enjoyment of a life of luxury and ease; and what
is equally singular, I waked early in the morning,
without either a sore throat, a swelled face, or a
rheumatic headache. I am certain of this, for I
felt my throat, shook my head to hear if it
cracked
,
and looked in a bit of a glass to see if my face
retained its true proportions. I confess, I was
rather disappointed. But never mind, thought
I, I shall certainly pay for it to-morrow.
The morrow came, however, and I was again
disappointed. I was sure it would come the next
day. But wonderful as it may seem, I thought I
felt better than when I had slept in a feather bed,
and a close room, warmed with anthracite coal. I
began to be encouraged, and by degrees became
reconciled to the enormity of sleeping on a straw
bed, in a room where the air was playing about in
zephyrs, without catching cold. My reader, if he
chance to be in the enjoyment of ease and luxury,
will shrink with horror from my dinners, which
consisted of a piece of salt pork and potatoes for
the first course, and some bread and butter, or
bread and milk for the dessert. At first, I was
certain
the pork would produce indigestion; but I
suppose as there was nothing particularly inviting
in it, I did not eat enough to do me any harm, for
I certainly felt as light as a feather after my meals,
and instead of dozing away an hour in a chair, was
ready for exercise at a minute's warning.
The old couple welcomed me to my nice
place, and were exceedingly eloquent in praise of
my nice, comfortable house, the nice pork, the
bread and butter, and the milk all equally nice.
By degrees I began to be infected with their
unaffected
content, and sometimes actually caught
myself enjoying the scanty comforts before me. I
did not reason on the matter, and cudgel myself
into an unwilling submission to necessity: but I
benefitted by the example of the honest old couple,
without reasoning at all about it. Reason and
precept, are a sort of pedagogues, that at best, but
bring about a grumbling acquiescence; but
example
comes in the shape of a gentle guide,
himself
pursuing the right way, and not commanding
us to follow, but beckoning us on with smiles.
I confess, when I looked around on my domain,
I despaired of ever bringing it into order, beauty,
or productiveness. I knew not the magic of labour
and perseverance; nor did I dream that the fields
around me which seemed only fruitful in rocks and
stones, could ever be made to wave in golden
grain, or green meadows. The only spot of all
my extensive estate that seemed susceptible of
improvement
,
was about twenty acres that lay
directly
before my door, between two shelving
rocky mountains, and through which ran a little
brook of clear spring water. But even this was
so sprinkled with rocks which had rolled down
from the neighbouring hills, that it was sufficiently
discouraging to a man who had for several years
worn spatterdashes, because he shrunk from
pulling
on his boots. I spent a month nearly, in
pondering
on what I should first undertake, and
ended
in despairing to undertake any thing.
One day I was leaning over the bars, at the
entrance
to my house, when a tall raw-boned figure,
with hardly an ounce of flesh to his complement,
came riding along, on a horse as hardy and
rawboned
as himself. He stopt at the bars, and bade
me good morning. In justice to myself, I must
say, that though proud enough in all conscience,
I am not one of those churls, who because they
have a better coat to their backs, which by the
way, often belongs to the tailor, think themselves
entitled to receive the honest salute of an honest
man, with coldness or contempt. Beshrew me,
20
such arrant blockheads, they call this vulgar
insolence
,
when in fact, it is the impulse of nature
whispering to the inmost man, that there is
nothing
in outward circumstances, or the difference
of wealth or dress, which places one being so high
above another, that he must not speak to him,
when they happen to meet or be thrown together.
Even when I was enjoying a life of luxury and
ease, and possessed of great wealth, it was a
pleasure to me to talk with these honest fellows
in linsey woolsey; and I will here bear this
testimony
,
that I have gained from them, more
practical
knowledge, heard more plain good sense, and
caught more valuable hints for the government and
enjoyment of life, than I ever did from all the
philosophers
I ever conversed with, or all the books I
ever read.
Good morning, good morning, said the tall
man on the tall horse, and good morning, good
morning, replied I, repating my salutation twice,
not to be outdone in courtesy.
I believe you don't know me, said he, after a
short pause, which short as it was, proved the
longest he ever afterwards made in his
conversations
with me. I believe you don't know me;
my name is Lightly, and I am your next neighbour
over the mountain yonder.
And my name is Ambler, said I, and I am
heartily glad to have you for a neighbour. Won't
you alight?
Why I don't care if I do; it was partly my
business to come and have a talk with you.
Mr. Lightly accordingly dismounted, and
fastening
his horse under a tree, to protect him from the
sun, which was waxing hot, followed me into the
house. After taking something, he looked about,
first at one mountain, then at another, and at
length began, A rough country this you've got
into, Mr. Ambler.
Very, replied I, so rough that I am afraid I
shall never make any part of it smooth.
No? said Mr. Lightly, why not?
Look at the trees.
You must cut them down.
Look at the rocks.
You must grub them up, they'll make excellent
stone walls.
Doubtless, if I had the people who piled Ossa
on Pelion, to assist me. Mr. Lightly had never
read the history of the great rebellion of the
Giants, and rather stared at me. But, added I,
do you really think I can make any thing out of
these mountains?
Do I? said he, only come over and see
me to-morrow, and I will give you proof of it;
but no, now I think of it, not to-morrow, the
day after. I am going to walk to Poughkeepsie
to-morrow, and sha'nt be back till sundown.
Poughkeepsie! cried I, and back again in
one day: why'tis sixty miles; you mean you'll be
back the day after to-morrow evening.
No I don't: I mean to-morrow evening, God
willing; but my days are much longer than
yours.
I should think so: you mean to make the sun
stand still, like Joshua.
No I don't, though my name is Joshua. I
mean to be up at the first crowing of an old cock,
that never sleeps after three in the morning, in
summer.
But you've got a horse, why don't you ride?
O, that would take me two days; and I can't
well spare the time. I never ride when I'm in a
hurry.
So saying, Mr. Lightly, after taking my
promise
to come over the day after to-morrow, took
his departure, leaving me to ponder on the vast
improbability of a man walking to Poughkeepsie,
and back again in one day. If he does, thought
I, I shall begin to believe in the seven league
boots.
The next morning but one, accordingly, my old
man guided me by a winding path, to the summit of
the mountain, and pointing to a comfortable
looking
house, surrounded by a large barn, and other
out houses, standing in the midst of green
meadows
and cultivated fields, told me that was the
place to which I was going. As I paused awhile to
contemplate the little rural landscape, I could not
help wishing that it had pleased Providence to
cast my lot where the rocks were so scarce, and
the meadows so green. Lightly saw me at the
top of the hill, and making some half a dozen
long strides with his long legs, met me more than
half way up the mountain side.
Good morning, good morning, said he,
repeating
it twice, for I soon found he was very fond
of talking, and often repeated the same thing to
keep himself going.
I returned his salutation, adding, I see you
have got back.
O yes; but not quite so soon as I calculated.
I went about four miles out of my way, to bring
home my old woman's yarn from the manufactory,
and it was almost dark before I got home.
During this brief dialogue, he had shot ahead
of me two or three times. You are no great
walker, I see, said Mr. Lightly.
Why, no; I don't think I could walk
sixty-eight
miles a day, in the month of June, without
being a little tired.
There's nothing like trying, said he.
I don't think I shall try, thought I.
My new friend, Mr. Lightly, kept me with him
all day, showing me what he had done in the
course of eight or ten years, and describing his
farm, as it was when he first purchased it, for little
or nothing. We came to a beautiful meadow,
20*
which I could not help admiring, and wishing I
had such a one on my farm,
You have a much finer one, said Lightly.
Where? I never saw it.
Directly before your door.
That! why it is paved with rocks.
Well, and so was this.
What has become of them all?
There they are, pointing to the wall which
surrounded the meadow.
The wall seemed a work of the Cyclops, or the
builders of the pyramids, for it was literally rocks
piled on rocks, as if by magic spell. I inquired
how he got these rocks one upon the other, as I
did not see any machinery.
We had no machines but such as these,
holding
out his hard, bony hands, and baring part of
his arms, that were nothing but twisted sinews.
But you did not dig these rocks out of the
ground, and pile them up here yourself, surely?
No, no; not quite that either. I have six
boys, who assisted me. You shall see them;
they will be home from work presently.
Fine boys' work! faith I should like to see
them.
Yonder they come, said Mr. Lightly.
I followed the direction of his eye, and beheld
coming down the hill, afar off, what I took for
six giants, striding onward with intent to devour
us at one meal. As they advanced towards me,
my apprehensions subsided, for I saw in their
open countenances, and clear blue eyes,
indubitable
tokens of harmlessness and good nature. I
never saw such men before; and here in the
mountains, out of the sphere of those artificial
distinctions, which level in some measure, all
physical disparities, I could not help feeling a sort
of qualm of inferiority. In the crowded city, and
amid the conflicts of civilized society, the mind
predominates; but here my business was to cut
down trees, and remove rocks, and the man best
qualified for these, was the great man for my
money. After seeing these boys, I did not so
much wonder at the miracles they had achieved.
The whole farm, in fact, exhibited proofs of the
wonders which may be wrought by a few strong
arms, animated and impelled by as many stout
hearts.
You see what we have done, said Lightly,
why can't you do the same?
My good sir, I am neither a giant myself, nor
have I any sons that are giants.
Well, well, said he, I will tell you what was
partly my reasonwhat was partly my reason, for
asking you over to see me. My youngest boystep
out, Ahasuerusmy youngest boy is just married,
and as our hive is pretty full, it is necessary that
he should swarm out with his wife, who is a good
hearty, industrious girl, that will be excellent help
for your old woman. You can't get on at first,
without some hard work, and you will not be able
to work yourself for some time very hard; you will
want such a boy as mine, to break the way a little
smooth for you."
I caught at the proposal instantly; we were not
long coming to terms, and in three days the new
married couple, the boy and the girl, were
established
at my house.
"She don't know any thing about
housekeeping
,"
said my old woman.
"You shall teach her," said I, and she went
about her work perfectly content."
"He is a mere boy," quoth my old man, "what
can he know of farming."
"He will learn it of you," said I, and the old
man felt as proud as a peacock.
My Polyphemus with two eyes, set to work
without delay, under the direction of my old man,
who talked a great deal, and did nothing; and
who, after having given his opinion was content
to follow that of the other. I was busy, too,
looking
on; running about, doing little or nothing; but
taking an interest, and sympathizing with the lusty
labours of the young giant, Ahasuerus, to such a
degree that I have often actually fallen into a
violent
perspiration, at seeing him prying up a large
stone. Thus I got a great deal of the benefit of
hard work, without actually fatiguing myself. By
degrees, I cam to work a little myself; and
when I did not work, I gave my advice, and saw
the others work. One dayit was the crisis of
my lifeone day Ahasuerus and the old man were
attempting to raise a rock out of the ground by
means of a lever, but their weight was not
sufficient
.
They tried several times but in vain;
whereat
the spirit came upon me, and seizing the far
end of the lever, I hung upon it with all my might,
kicking most manfully all the while. The rock
yielded to our united exertions, and rolled out of
the ground. It was my victory.
We should not have got it out without you,
said Ahasuerus.
It was all your doing, quoth the old man.
But, to tell the honest truth, I quaked in the
midst of my triumph, lest this unheard of exertion
might have injured a blood vessel, or strained
some of the vital parts. That night I thought,
some how or other, I felt rather faintish and
languid
.
But it may be I was only a little sleepy;
for I fell asleep in five minutes, and did not wake
till sunrise. It was some time before I could
persuade myself I was quite well; but being
unable fairly to detect any thing to the contrary,
I arose and walked forth into the freshness of the
morning, and my spirit laughed in concert with
the sprightly insects and chirping birds.
After this I became bolder and bolder, until
finally animated by the example of the great
Ahasuerus, I one day laid hold of a rock, and
rolled
it fairly out of its bed. I was astonished at
this feat; I had no idea that I could make the
least exertion, without suffering for it severely in
some way or other. I never could do it before,
and what is the reason I can do it now, thought
I; I certainly used to feel very faint, on occasion
of sometimes drawing a hard cork out of a bottle.
My new monitor, experience, whispered me, that
this was nothing but apprehension, which when it
becomes a habit, and gains a certain mastery over
the mind, produces a sensation allied to faintness.
It embarrasses the pulsation, and that occasions a
feeling of swooning. The mental, causes the
physical sensation. I was never so happy in my
whole life, as when I received this lesson of
experience
.
I was no longer afraid of dying off hand,
of the exertion of drawing a cork.
Thus we went on during the summer. The salt
pork relished wonderfully; the bread and milk
became a delicious dessert; and the rocks daily
vanished from the meadow, like magic. The
autumn
now approached, and I bethought to myself
how I should get through the winter, with so
many
broken panes, and so many sky lights in the
roof of my house. There was neither carpenter
nor glazier in ten miles; and I was at a loss what
to do. I spoke to Ahasuerus the Great, about it.
If you will get me a few shingles and nails, and
some glass and putty, I will do it myself, said he.
If you can do it, so can I, said I; for I began
to be a little jealous of Ahasuerus. Accordingly,
I procured the materials, and mounting on the
roof, went to work zealously. It was a devil of
a business; but I got through at last. It did not
look very well, to be sure; but it kept out the
rain, the snow, and the keen air. Encouraged at
my unaccountable ingenuity as a carpenter, I
commenced glazier, and broke six panes of glass
off hand. With the seventh, however, I
succeeded
;
and well it was that I did so, for I had
determined
this should be the last, and its failure
would have forever satisfied me, that none but a man
who had learned the trade of a glazier, could put in
pane of glass. As it was, I passed from the
extreme
of depression and vexation, to that of
exaltation
and vanity.
How easy it is to get on in this world, and
with what small means, we may attain to all the
necessary comforts of life! cried I; men make
themselves slaves to ward off evils that are
imaginary
;
and sweat through a life of toil, to
become
at last dependent on others, for what they
can do just as well themselves. What is the use
of plaguing myself with these eternal labours; I
will be idle and happy.
Remember the poet at Saratoga.
Remember the philosopher.
Remember the politician.
Remember the man of nerves, whispered
memory
in my ear, and remember thyself
remember
Dyspepsy
. I fled from my conclusion as fast
as I could run, and worked that day harder than
ever.
Winter came, and having a vast forest of wood;
some of which was decaying, and the remainder
had reached its full maturity, I determined to have
it cut down and sold to pay my debt to my old
Scotsman. With the assistance of one or two
others, Ahasuerus performed wonders in the
woods, as he had done among the rocks. I
forget how many cords they sent to market, but
it produced enough to pay my old friend, and then
I stood upon the proudest eminence an
unambitious
man can attain; I owed no man a penny,
and I could live without running in debt. This is
a great and solid happiness, not sufficiently
appreciated
at this time. People that know no
better
,
are apt to think that winter in the country, is
one long series of dead uniformity; and that there
is no enjoyment away from the fire-side. But they
are widely mistaken; nature every where presents
a succession of varieties, and those of winter are
not the least beautiful. The short days of
December
and January, are perhaps the most gloomy;
but have this advantage, that they are short, and
followed by good long nights, in which it is a
luxury
,
to nestle in a warm bed, hear the wind whistle,
or the light fleeces of snow patting against the
windows
,
and fall asleep thinking how much better
off we are, than millions of our fellow-creatures.
When the earth lies barren, the herbage destroyed,
and the forests, stript of their leafy honours, stand
bare to the winds, even then nature is not
altogether
desolate in these lonely mountains. The
homely brown of the woods, is dotted here and
there by clusters of evergreens, that appear only
the more beautiful from the barrenness that
surrounds
them; and even the gravity of the old grey
beard rocks, is often enlivened with spots of green
moss, that relieve their sober aspect. There is
music too in the wintry solitudes: for in the pure
clear air, every sound is musical. The lowing of
the cattle, the barking of the dog and the squirrel,
the drumming of the partridge, the echoes of the
fowler's gun, the woodman's axe, whose strokes
are by and bye followed by the loud crash of the
falling tree, all breaking in succession, and
sometimes
mingling in chorus on the beautiful and
buoyant air, bear with them a lonely, yet touching
charm, which to a contented mind, in a healthy
frame, affords the means of real substantial
enjoyment
.
Anon nature puts on her robe of spotless white,
the true livery of youth, beauty, and innocence;
and then what an intense, ineffable lustre invests
her all around, and every where. The impurities,
the blemishes, and the deformities of the earth, are
all hidden under the snowy veil; the roughness
becomes smooth and glassy; the stagnant pools,
exhaling in summer disease and death, are robbed
of their poisons; the bogs all invisible, and the
21
very swamps salubrious. All is clear, pure,
unsullied
,
and still; the pale image of innocent
beauty
clothed for a while in the trappings of the tomb.
All is soothing, but nothing lively: all grave and
solemn, yet nothing melancholy. But the night
is, if possible, still more holy and beautiful, when
the brightness of the moon-beams sporting on the
glittering surface of the snow, creates a sort of
female day, softer, and more soothing, yet almost
equally bright. Not an insect chirps or buzzes in
the ear; there is nothing of life stirring in nature's
veins; her pulses are still. A thousand glittering
stars, invisible at other times, come forth, as if to
view the scene stretched out below them, or watch
with sparkling eyes, the course of their bright
queen, athwart the heavens.
Then come the lengthening days, which at first
steal on imperceptibly, with steps noiseless and
slow, silently unlocking the chains of winter,
and setting nature free so easily, that we do not
hear the turning of the key. At first the trickling
of the waters from the roof, and the falling of the
icicles, apprize us of the advance of the sun,
to resume his glowing sceptre. Anon the little
sunny southern exposures begin to spot the vast
white winding sheet with brown; and here and
there, though very rarely, along the margin of
some living spring, the tender grass begins to peep
forth. Every day the empire of the sun extends
by slow degrees. The brooks begin again to
murmur and glisten, marking their courses by the
increased verdure of the grass, and willows, on
their margins; and by imperceptible degrees, the
few brown leaves that clung all winter to the
sapless branches, are pushed from their hold by
the swelling buds, and fall whispering to the
earth, to mingle with her crumbling atoms. It is
thus, with all the works of nature and with man.
The young buds push off the old dry leaves; the
very rocks are mutable; all feel the universal
law of change, and man the most of all.
I did not spend my winter idly, but went out
every day to see my wood cutters. In order to
give some interest to my walks, I purchased a
gun, procured a brace of fox hounds, and in time
became a mighty hunter, before the Lord. No
man of sentiment has ever heard the
deepmouthed
hound, as the poet, with singular
felicity
calls him, saluting the clear frosty morning, with
sonorous and far sounding challenges, without
feeling its inspiration, in the silence of the
mountains
.
I found their society, and that of my gun,
delightful, though truth obliges me to confess,
that I seldom got any thing but exercise and a
keen appetite in my sporting rambles. Almost the
first extensive excursion I made, being intent in
following the hounds, I unluckily fell through the
ice into a small pond, which the melting of the
first snows had formed in a little valley. I got
completely wet from head to foot; and I was
some miles from home. The whole way, I
suffered
the horrible anticipation of diseases without
number; rheumatism, consumption, catarrh, sore
throat, inflammation of the chest, and a hundred
others. In short, I gave myself up for gone; and
was in such a hurry to get home and settle my
affairs
,
that I arrived there in a perfect glow. I lost
no time in changing my dress, and it being now
evening, went directly to bed, expecting next
morning to find myself as stiff as a poker. At
first, I fell into a profuse perspiration, and then
into
a sound sleep, which lasted till morning.
I can hardly believe it myself, at this moment; I
awoke as well as ever I was in my life, and never
felt any ill effects from my accident. After this, I
defied the whole college of physicians, nay, all the
colleges put together. I considered myself
another
Achilles, invulnerable even at the heel, and
now cared no more for the weather than a grizzly
bear, or a seeker of the north west passage.
Thus passed my first winter. In the spring I
paid my debt to Hardup with the product of my
wood. In the summer he came to see me. I
would not come before, for fear you would think it
was to dun you, said he. He has repeated his
visit every summer, for the last seven years, and
assures me every time, that were he not Hardup, he
would be Ambler. It would be tedious, neither is
it necessary to the moral of my story, to detail the
progress I made, and the wonders achieved by
Ahasuerus, from the period in which I first took
possession
of my estate, to that in which I am now
writing
.
Great as they were, they bear no comparison
with those I have undergone. My farm is now a
little
Eden, among the high hills, whose rugged
aspects
only add richness and beauty to the
cultivated
fields. I have saved enough to add two wings
to my old house, and to put it in good repair, besides
building a barn and other out-houses. Every
year I execute some little improvements, just to
keep up the excitement of novelty, and prevent me
from thinking too much about myself. Every fair
day in spring, summer, and autumn, it is my
custom
to climb a part of the mountain, which
overlooks
my little domain, and affords a full view of
its green or golden enclosures.
It lays at the head of a long narrow vale, skirted
on either side, by rough, rocky, steep mountains,
clothed with vast forests of every growth. My
house is on a little round knoll, just on the edge of
the meadow I spoke of at my first arrival here, and
which now has not a single stone above its
surface
.
The clear spring brook which meanders
through it, and is full of trout, forms the head of a
little river, which gathering, as it proceeds
onward
,
the tribute of the hills, waxes larger as it
goes, and appears, at different points far down the
valley, coursing its bright way to the Hudson. On
either side of the valley, among rocks and woods,
is sometimes seen a cultivated field or two, with a
21*
house, and a few cattle; but, with this exception,
there is a perfect and beautiful contrast between
the bosom and the sides of the valley. The
former
is all softness, verdure and fertility, the latter
all stately forests, or naked sublimity. In a clear
day, and a north west wind, I can see the junction
of the little stream, of which, as being the
proprietor
of its parent spring, I consider myself the
father
,
with the majestic Hudson. I wish the reader,
that is if he is a clever man, or what is still
better
,
a clever and pretty lady, would come and see
my farm next summer.
I have paid but one visit to the city, and that
was to my old friend Hardup, who is become very
fond of me ever since he conferred a benefit.
While I was one day strolling along the Battery, I
exchanged one of those glances, which bespeak a
doubtful recognition, with a portly, rosy cheeked
man, I was sure I had seen before. On these
occasions
,
I generally make the first advances.
I think I have seen you before sir, said I,
but really I can't tell exactly where.
I am in the same predicament, replied he,
smiling; your face is familiar, though I can't
recall
your name.
My name is Ambler.
Good heavens! is it possible, and though glad
to see me, he seemed quite astonished; my
name is Abstract! I almost fell backwards over
one of the benches; it was my friend, the man of
nerves, as hale and hearty, as if he never had any
nerves in his life.
I'll not believe it, said I, why what has
happened
to you?
O I'm married, he replied, and have enough
to do besides attending to my nerves; but you
you are metamorphosed too; what has come over
you? are
you
too, married?
NO: I'm a bachelor still, said I, so you see
there are two opposite ways, to the same thing.
Having exchanged our addresses, we parted the
best friends in the world.
You had better get a wife, cried he.
I mean to, I replied, as soon as I can afford
the revenues of a city, to keep her in pin-money.
Pooh! if you can't keep her in pin-money,
you can keep her in order, answered he of
the nerves, and strutted away, with the air of a
man who was either master at home, or so
dexterously
led captive, as not to suspect it.
I begin to grow weary of talking about
myself
;
and as I have observed, that listeners and
readers, generally get tired before speakers and
authors, will here conclude my story. Its
moral
is completed, and I hope cannot be
mistaken
.
I committed to paper the result of my
experience
,
not for the purpose of ridiculing the
infirmities
of my fellow creatures, or laughing at
the miseries of human life. I wished, if possible,
to persuade them that a large portion of the cares
of this world, from which we are so anxious to
escape, are nothing more than blessings in
disguise
,
and thus to diminish that inordinate love of
riches, which is founded on the silly presumption
that they are the sources of all happiness. It is
under the dominion of this mistaken idea, that
money becomes indeed the root of all evil, by
being sought with an insatiable appetite, that
swallows up all our feelings of brotherhood, and
causes men to prey upon each other like the wild
beasts of the forest; nay, morefor even their
instinct teaches them to spare their own species.
Were mankind aware of the total inability of
wealth to confer content, or to make case and
leisure delightful, they would perchance seek it
with less avidity, and fewer sacrifices of that
integrity
,
which is a far more essential ingredient in
human happiness, than the gold for which it is so
often sacrificed. My history may also afford a
useful example to those whose situations entail on
them the necessity of labour and economy, by
teaching them the impossibility of reconciling a
life of luxury and ease, with the enjoyment of
jocund spirits, lusty health, and rational
happiness
.
But what has become of your DYSPEPSY
all this time? the reader will ask.
Faith, I had forgot that entirely!
OLD TIMES
IN THE NEW WORLD.
ADVERTISEMENT OF THE EDITOR.
It
appears from a note, in the hand writing of our
author, that the following Tale was principally compiled
from an old Manuscript Drama, the spelling and style of
which were of the age of King James the first. The
note also states that it was never printed nor played,
having been rejected by the manager of the Red Bull
Theatre, in London, to whom the author transmitted a
copy. In revenge he turned Puritan, and published a satire
upon the theatres, entitled,
The School of Abuse; or
a Pleasant Invective against Poets, Pipers, Players,
Jesters, and such like Caterpillars of the
Commonwealth
.
Our author says the manuscript was given
him by an officer of Lee's Legion, a descendant of
one of the first settlers of James Town, with whom
he became intimate about the close of the
Revolutionary
War. I thought it best to advise the reader
of these facts, which account for some peculiarities of
style, as well as the highly dramatic cast of the story.
22
Who loves to live at home, yet looke abroad,
And know both passen and unpassen road,
The prime plantation of an unknown shore,
The men, the manners, fruitfullnesse and store,
Read but this little book, and then confesse
The lesse thou lik'st and lov'st, thou liv'st the lesse.
Commend this story, by a loyall man,
Or else
come-mend
it, reader if you can.
Thomas Macarnesse
,
To his worthy friend and countryman
,
Captaine John Smith
.
CHAPTER I.
I commend me right worshipfully to my
worthy
countrymen, and most especially to my lovely
country-women, hoping that not one of them hath
forgotten the famous old times of gallantry and
adventure
,
when the sprightly springalls of the old
world, stimulated by the example, and aided by the
purse of the great Sir Walter Raleigh, (whose
memory God long preserve,) turned their eyes to
the glowing west, and placed their hopes in a new
hemisphere. The history of an honourable
ancestry
,
is at all times a precious, and delightful
contemplation
;
and what ancestry can be more
honourable
than ours? Brave and gallant spirits,
resolved to mend their fortunes, at the risk of their
lives; and pious, unconquerable pilgrims, clothed
in the armour of faith, which no weapon can
pierce, seeking in the wilderness, among savage
pagans that free exercise of opinion which was not
only denied them, but punished with stripes and
imprisonment in civilized countries, among
Christians
.
Assuredly those who have read of the
perils encountered and overcome by these daring
soldiers of fortune, and these invincible followers
of the faith, can never become in all the
vicissitudes
of life, from youth to age, from the cradle to
the grave, indifferent to their memory and their
actions. If any one whose heart is too hard, and
his understanding too obtuse to feel the force of
such impressions, should perchance take up this
my story, let him lay it down again forthwith. It
is not for him, for, as one of our writers has truly
observed,Nothing now remains of James Town,
the cradle of the new world, but a few simple
ruins; a few tomb stones, marking the spot where
was interred, somebodywe know not whom, for
the name has become illegible. But the spot is well
known; and every century, while like a river, it
carries millions of light wonders to the ocean of
oblivion, will only render it the more interesting
and illustrious. It is closely connected with the
first links of a great chain of causes and effects,
that have already changed the destiny of the
new
,
and will probably change that of the
old
world.
He therefore, who cannot feel the inspiration of
such spots as James Town, and Plymouth Rock,
need not take the pains to go to Rome or Athens,
for he may rest assured that the fine and subtile
spirit which lives, and moves, and hath its being in
the past and the future alone, is not an inmate of
his mind.
It chanced one bright spring morning, in the
year 1611, that a young gentleman of the name of
Percie
[1]
[1]
A person of that name was a contemporary of Smith. He was of
the Northumberland family, and acted as President of the
settlement
on one occasion.
was seen reclining against an old live oak
tree that spread its broad arms over the borders
of the famous Powhatan, now called James River.
The hour was about sunrise, and the scene
exceedingly
fair. The river spread into a wide
basin
,
several miles across, over which, glided from
time to time, flocks of those aquatic birds, that love
to skim the surface of the salt water. On the left
was a grove of stately trees of primeval growth,
encumbered
with vines and wild flowers; and on the
right a little village, of rather rude huts, enclosed
with a stockade, and defended by some poorly
constructed
fortifications. The whole had an
appearance
of rural beauty that contrasted strongly
with the absence of that life and noise, which is
characteristic of the crowded habitations of men, of
a blithe summer morning. Not a single female, or
child was to be seen; nor any domestic animals,
save a few half-starved melancholy curs,
rawboned
and moody, prowling about with hungry
avidity, or lying gaping in the morning sun, or
whining in their sleep, as if their dreams were
troubled.
Percie, Robert Perciethat was his name
stood leaning against the tree, contemplating the
birds as they flitted down the river to the ocean,
not far distant. His thoughts accompanied them
in their flight towards England, and he communed
with his heart in something like the following
soliloquy.
How swift they fly! They seem in haste to
visit the far distant, sea-girt Isle, from whence love
and hate have banished me. My imagination
outsoars
them in their swift flights, and bears me
to where the happy hopes of my youth,
sunned
into life a thousand blooming flowers, since
overcast and withered by the clouds of manhood.
Would I were there! No; would a thousand
worlds, unknown erewhile, like this which I inhabit
a thousand untracked seas, whose virgin bosoms,
never daring keel wounded with its swift passage,
rolled between me and my native country.
Distance
,
like time, is kinsman to oblivion.
22*
He then turned his face towards an old
grey-headed
man, sitting at a little distance, and
dressed
like the better sort of followers of cavaliers in
those days, and exclaimed, Gilbert!
Master, here am I, quoth Gilbert, and yet
in strictness of sound logic, such as is learned at
Oxford, here am I not; unless your philosophy
can convict me that a man can be where that
which constitutes his being is not.
What, still dealing in quips, Gilbert, replied
the other, with a languid, indulgent smile, which
indicated that the old man had earned by past
fidelity, a privilege of being familiar.
In good truth, sir, said the greybeard, I
have, within the last half hour, emigrated to a
certain, snug little paradise in the North Country,
of which I would draw your honour such a
picture
!
'Tis better not, Gilbert. I know it well. We
must forget these things, if possible, said the
other, with a deep sigh. The past must be as
nothing, the future every thing to you, and most
of all to me. The old world must give place to
the new. From this time forward, we must look
right forward, nor think of the past but as a lesson
for the time to come.
But must I never talk of home, dear master?
No, not even think of it.
And may I not sit on a bench of a summer
day like this, under the clambering vinesthat is
to say, if I am not shortly starved to deathand
talk to myself of old times, old friends,
christmas
frolics, and foaming nut-brown ale?
'Twill only make you the sadder, replied the
other.
And if it does, 'fore heaven. I'd rather cry
over such matters, than laugh at the best jest, or
merry tale, that ever was, or will be broached in
this new world, which, the fiend take Columbus
for finding out, say I.
And so say not I, good Gilbert. Already the
poor and wretched, those who have no home, or
to whom their home is misery, begin to look this
way with longing eyes, as to a place of refuge, or
oblivion. The world is in want of a sanctuary,
where kingly pride and priestly rule, may no
longer create beggars and bigots. I see it coming,
Gilbert.
Three score and ten can't live on distant hopes,
my master. They are the next year's harvest, or
rather the next year's ships, to us poor, perishing
adventurers. Before either arrives, we shall be
gone hence, unless the savages make friends, and
come in with a supply.
Well, well; so you don't talk to me of these
old times, I am content.
I accept your terms, my dear young master.
I'll to the bank yonder, where there is a fine echo,
and there we'll discourse of days of yore. Talk
of the Percies; your old, honoured father; your
good brother Harrya plague take him though
for a and she, the most beauteous of all
beauties
,
the Rose of Beverly. Hey! master of mine!
Silence! old croaking raven! cried Percie,
making a motion as if to collar the old man.
Thou hast named three names, each dearer than
the other; each more cruel, than famine, plague,
and pestilence, all combined. Had I three hearts,
they would have broke them all. In the name of
God, leave me, or leave off prating.
My honoured master, forgive me!
Go to the woods, old Gilbert, and howl there;
or let me go. There is not a beast that roams
these irksome solitudes, but has some tie of
nature
,
some dear affection, some attachment to
blood, or place. I may learn of them, perhaps
some new affections. Those I had are broken,
and cannot knit again.
I knew nothing of this, my dear master. You
may remember I was absent, a prisoner to the
Borderers, when you left home. When I
returned
,
I heard you had gone the Virginia voyage, and
followed as fast as I could, without knowing why
you left home.
I remember, so you did, replied the other,
affectionately. Forgive me, good Gilbert. So
true a friend deserves to know all. Hear, but
never speak. While you were absent, the curse
of younger brotherhood, which is to be beggared
in fortune, and despised in love, fell upon me.
The father I revered, spoiled me of my inheritance
to enrich my elder brother, who tempted her to
whom I was betrothed, whom I loved as my own
immortal soul, whom I had twined to my heart of
hearts, and who had grown to be part of my
beingtempted her by his riches and my poverty,
to forsake her beggar for a wealthy heir.
The unnatural brother! exclaimed old
Gilbert
,
furiously.
That brother! you know, Gilbert, he had
played with me through boyhood; studied,
travelled
,
warred with me in youth; was my
companion
,
my friend, my confidant. He knew all, and
he betrayed me, Judas like, with kissing. I saved
his life when he was drowning, and he plunged me
in the waters of bitterness.
No more, no more, dear master, rejoined the
other, now that I know your griefs, I will never
talk of home again.
Nay, replied Percie, now the ice is broke
you shall know all, that hereafter eternal silence
may be between us. Outraged in every feeling
of nature and humanity; all the early ties of my
youth broken to atoms; my affection for my
father
changed to a sense of his injustice; my early
love for my brother, turned into a feeling of
violated
friendship and betrayed confidence; my
devotion
for Rose curdled into despair, horror,
madness
and jealousyI sought this new world, and
you followed me, old Gilbert. I shall never see
my native country more. But see! our president,
Captain Smith is coming this way, apparently in
contention with Master Vere and Master
Harrington
.
Leave me, and let your lips be like the
sepulchre.
Ed
.
CHAPTER II.
The group which now entered on the scene,
was composed of Smith, then acting, as he always
did in times of peril or suffering, as president of
the little colony of James Town; Master Arthur
Vere, Master George Harrington, Master Hardin,
and Master Hyacinth Lavender; each of whom I
shall specially introduce to the reader.
Smith, of whose name and actions, it is a
disgrace
for any American to be ignorant, was a
person
of fine, manly figure and proportions, erect in
his port, and of a commanding look. His eyes
were of a greyish hue, and of a most piercing
lustre
;
his hair cut short, and curling thickly about
the ears; his beard and mustaches very full, and
suffered to grow long, as was still the fashion of
the times. Though at this period he had scarcely
reached the age of thirty, he had already
encountered
a series of romantic adventures, in almost
every quarter of the globe, and his face, eminently
manly and prepossessing as it was, wore the
impression
of suffering and care. His forehead bore
the wrinkles of thought and anxiety; and between
his eyes were two deep, upright lines, indicative
of a mind troubled with frequent perplexities.
His complexion was darkened by exposure to
vicissitudes
and hardships; but upon the whole, he
still bore about him a charm of person and
manner
,
that quelled the minds of one sex, and
wakened
the affections of the other. Of his daring
courage, unconquerable perseverance, and
adventurous
spirit; of his extraordinary qualities and
acquirements, no one can judge, who has not
followed
him through the various events of a life of
danger, trial and vicissitude. Suffice it to say,
that in an age, than which there never was one
more fruitful in extraordinary men, he stands
eminently
conspicuous.
Of the other members of the group, Vere and
Harrington were younger brothers of younger
branches of noble houses. Gentlemen of the inns
of court, which at that time contained more young
fellows of wit and pleasure, than all London
beside
.
They were accustomed to give masques; to
enact plays before the sovereign; and some of the
best writers, as well as best actors of the day,
were originally of the inns of court. They were
indeed a set of lusty gallants, who treated the
city husbands with great contempt, and their
wives with great courtesy.
Master Hardin was a preacher of the gospel;
one of those zealous, hardy and invincible spirits,
to whom impossibilities are as nothing; whose
faith is as a rock; whose ardour for the interests
and growth of religion never tires under hardships
or difficulties, and who are ready at any time, to
carry the gospel into the very jaws of death. He
had accompanied one of the earliest companies of
adventurers to Virginia, and proved himself on all
occasions, ready to suffer in the cause of heaven,
or to make any sacrifices for the welfare of his
fellow creatures.
Master Lavender was a complete specimen of
the fashionable dandy of that age, save that he
was now somewhat rusticateda spruce, neat,
apish, nimble, fantastic, conceited gallant, with
hollow eyes, sharp visage, dark complexion and
meagre face. He was devoted to toys;
worshipped
satin doublets, and adored a white hand in a
perfumed glove. He could never resist fine
clothes and jewelry; and all his estate, which
indeed
was only that of a younger brother, was
spent in velvet, satin, trinkets, and new fashions.
He ruined his tailor, mercer, and jeweller; but
then he comforted the first by swearing he had the
patience of a burnt heretic; the second, that his
faith was sufficient to save all Fleet-street, and
the Strand; and the third, that his repentance
would pay all his scores at church, if no where
else. He was withal not destitute of wit, having
kept company with the templars, and had more
valour than discretion; for at that time no man
without courage could associate with gentlemen.
Master Lavender had come to the new world,
some two years before the present period, with a
competent array of finery and trinkets. The
trinkets
he had from time to time pawned to a little
tailor
,
for repairing his costume; and the finery was
now in the last stage of a rapid dissolution. With
the exception of a pair of perfumed gloves, he
exhibited
the perfect wreck of a beau, insomuch
that his old enemy, Mr. Justice Knapp, with whom
he had many a sharp contest of wit, was wont to
say, that his velvet jacket had made three voyages
round the world; that his cloak had belonged to
Marco Polo, when he visited the emperor of China
and the Great Khan; and that had his dimity
breeches been mortal, they would have perished
long before the flood.
Such was the company that now intruded
somewhat
tumultuously on the sorrows of Percie. As
they advanced they seemed in a state of hot
contention
,
and from time to time placed their hands
on the swords, which in those dangerous times, it
was customary for the adventurers to wear on all
occasions. To explain this apparent hostility it
is necessary that we go a little way backwards.
The colony which is the scene of our story,
was settled in the first instance, by a company of
daring spirits, many of them connected with
families
of distinction at home. High tempered, and
23
somewhat disinclined to discipline, they
constituted
the best possible materials for defence and
warfare; but when it came to labouring, which
the exigencies of the colony at almost all times,
made indispensable to its very existence, they were
apt to be exceedingly refractory and indignant.
Placing a precarious dependence in the friendship
of the savages, and the supplies from England,
they were too prone to idleness, and unthrift, and
it required all the ascendency of such a spirit as
that of Smith, to maintain any tolerable degree
of subordination. Among the devices invented
by him for cooling the courage of these high
blooded gallants, was one which in general, was
found exceedingly effectual. This was to tie
the delinquent's right arm to the branch of a tree,
and pour cold water down the sleeve until the
culprit
signified his submission.
At the period in which our story commences,
the colony was in a state almost bordering on
absolute
famine. Every thing being in common,
and the products of the labour and enterprise of
all being deposited in a large store, constituted a
common stock, under the special guardianship of
the president and his council, who sometimes
abused
their trust, and wasted the precious deposit.
Such an event had not long since taken place, and
the colony indignant at this mal-administration,
deposed their president, and chose Smith in his
place. As usual, he exposed himself to all sorts
of dangers, exerted all his energy and activity to
remedy the desperate state of affairs, and set the
example of labour, economy, and endurance.
But all did not avail. The savages, offended by
the unjust exactions of the late president, retired
to a distance, refusing to hold communion with
the strangers, or hid their corn under ground, and
preserved a sullen silence. To complete their
misfortunes, the rats got into their store house,
and consumed a small quantity of grain, which
was all that was left of what Smith had collected
in a voyage up the Potomac.
From this time they had no bread, but a
miserable
substitute made of the flesh of dried sturgeons,
which fish, together with the little game they could
procure in the woods, constituted almost the whole
of their food. Still it would seem that they
preserved
their good spirits, and the same daring
hardihood
that precipitated them on the new world,
sustained
them through all their dangers and
sufferings
.
They sometimes grumbled, sometimes
rebelled
against the authority of Smith, and
sometimes
resolved to go home. But in general, it
would seem, that the very hardships they endured,
the privations they laboured under, had produced
what may be called the philosophy of necessity,
which is neither more nor less than a sort of
desperate
carelessness, which makes a jest of the
present
,
and defies the morrow. They passed like the
swift lightning from one extreme to the other, and
the pressure of hunger, as in the case of children,
was lightened by merry jests, or playful pastimes.
Desperation sometimes produces a strange
hilarity
;
and necessity is not only the mother of
invention
,
but the source of great actions, which are
almost always performed by poor adventurers, the
fruits of whose genius and hardihood, are generally
reaped by the rich drones of this vast hive.
Such was the crisis of affairs in the little cradle
of the new world, which in truth was never a
sleeping
place for the children or their parents, when
the refusal of the refractory cavaliers to work,
produced
the scene which followed, and which we
shall endeavour to exhibit to the reader.
For shame, for shame! cried Smith, as they
approached to where Percie was standing, these
unmanly complaints, these eternal bickerings,
will ruin the noblest project of the age. Within
is famine and disaffection; without, the bloody,
bold, and cunning savages, watching for the
miserable
leavings of famine. Shame, shame I say,
gentlemen; the word is work or starve.
Not I, by Jupiter, cried Master Vere.
Nor I, by Mars, quoth Master Harrington.
Nor I, by these lily hands, whispered Master
Hyacinth Lavender.
We shall see, gentlemen, cried Smith, the
time is come when that authority which necessity
creates and justifies, shall be exerted, let what will
follow. Your extravagance has consumed our
food; your idle example has corrupted my people;
and now when famine and danger stare us in the
face, you refuse to lend a helping hand, because,
forsooth! the distant kinsmen of nobility! You
know me sirs, and on the faith of man, this day shall
see you labouring with the meanest. By heaven I
will force you to work, and punish you if you
rail.
Few words to that bargain, most valiant
Captain
,
quoth Master Vere, you say the rats have
eaten up the corn. These rats are yourself and
your minions. You say the savages are watching
to destroy us: your prudence has provided against
this, by securing a refuge for yourself at least,
with your copper-coloured Siren of the woods:
your gentle Indian maid, your
Ungenerous, and illiberal slander, cried
Smith, warmly, when have I ever shrunk from
any hardships or sufferings, that youor youor
youthe best and bravest of you all have borne?
when did I refuse to eat what you have eaten, or
fast when others fasted? I have shared labours,
dangers, watchings, heat, cold and famine, with the
meanest of my people. Is it,is it not so?
'Tis true, and I'll avouch it, exclaimed
Percie
.
Doubtless, quoth Master Harrington, you
led us wantonly into dangers, and took all the
credit of escape to yourself; and you consumed
our corn, to save us from starving by inches.
23*
'Tis true, as this back and stomach of mine
can witness, lisped Master Lavender.
Unworthy imputation! rejoined Captain
Smith, but enough of this. Now mark me,
gentlemen
,
for men, it seems ye are not. Since
hunger itself has no power to force you to
exertion
,
I protest by Him that made me, you shall not
only labour for your own support, but for that of
those poor souls who are sick, and perishing with
want. They shall not starve while we have hands
to help them.
What! become the slaves of base mechanics?
exclaimed Vere and Harrington.
Aye sirs: and he that gathers not a supply, or
performs a task equal to myself, shall as sure as he
lives, be sent over the river, to taste the sweets of
idleness, among the savages. Bring hither the
implements
,
added Smith, calling to some labourers
at a short distance, who came with axes, shovels,
and other instruments of labour.
Lookee ye, Captain Smith, said Vere, only
point me out a mode in which my sword may be
employed in any useful labour, and I am your
man; but an axe, I disdain; a spade I abhor. If
you have any fighting to do, send for me; till then,
adieu most noble Captain.
He was proceeding to quit the spot, when Smith
placed himself before him, and offered the choice
of an axe or a shovel.
By the bright Jupiter, my natal star,
exclaimed
Vere, before I turn my blade into a
ploughshare, I'll try conclusions with your
toasting
iron. What! shall the seed of nobles become
the bondsmen of the scum of England? Sweat for
them!
Sweat! O vulgar sprig of nobility! lisped
Master Lavender.
Softly, softly, high-born sir, rejoined Smith, in
a sarcastic tone: what, I pray you, is your noble
blood to me, or those poor souls whose substance
you have devoured? Will your long pedigrees
confound these Indian warriors, or quell the
anger
of savage murderers? Prithee high-born
sirs, call up your noble lineage, and bid them
speak to these wild warriors to come and bring us
corn, for christian charity to their dry bones.
Beseech
them to bring their mantles of state, to
shield us from coming winters' cold; their
coronets
of pearl, to barter here for food; their proud
escutcheons, to ward off the Indian arrows. They'll
come I warrant you. Work, work, I say. The
basket-maker is the king in this new world. The
implementstake them gentlemen, the axe or the
spade, the gallows or the wilds; come, here are
our weapons.
And here is mine.
And mine, cried Harrington and Vere,
drawing
,
the only one a gentleman ever uses.
And mine, quoth Master Lavender, if it
will only come forth; for by St. George and his
dragon, it hath not shown its point as a snail doth
its horns in broad day, since last I drew it on a
sheriff's officer in merry London. Come forth my
trusty and rusty toaster, continued he, tugging
at his sword. No! well to him that is without
arms, neutrality is policy. Now will I stand on
one side and count the slain, as a boy notches the
game on a stick. Sasathat's it gallants!
Well, since it is coming to blows, I must beat
up for recruits, exclaimed Smith, his bright grey
eyes beginning to strike fire. Who stands for
the new world?
I for one, quoth Robert Percie, while the
labourers all ranged themselves by the side of
Smith.
By St. Ragamuffin, the patron of rent
doublets
,
surmised Master Lavender, but our
president
hath a noble competency of backers; two
bundles of rags, a skeleton, and a greasy leathern
jacket! I should like to have a tournament with
that same greasy knight. But, tugging at his
sword, it will not be, the rusty fates forbid it.
Stand aside, good varlets, said Captain Smith,
I'll not take odds in a good cause. Percie and
I can match these braggarts. Now sirs, are ye
desperate, wil't work or fight.
Not a stroke but of the sword, replied Vere,
Come on, rascal Rabble and all.
The two parties were now about to engage in
mortal fight, when the good old Hardin passed
between them, and they paused for a moment.
Stay, cried he, in the name of the living
God! addressing himself to Vere and his party,
Unthinking swaggerers, what brought you here?
Did you think to play the drones in this new hive
to revel as in the filth of London stews at home
to swagger up and down the streets, putting
ladies to the blush by peering under their bonnets
to bouse it at taverns, brothels, and such like
hells, and pay no other reckoning but daily
lengthening
scores, chalked up as chronicles of time
murdered, health wasted, wealth consumed, and
honour ruined?
In good faith, quoth Lavender, this
cropear
must have been a sad reveller in his timea
most swaggering swipester to know of all this
naughtiness. If I thought he meant any
reflection
on me, I'd fillip him.
Merciful heaven! resumed old Hardin,
what good will fighting do? will you make
these fields fruitful with corn, by sprinkling them
with blood, and blast this new world as Cain did
the old, with a brother's murder? And suppose
you get the better, what then, sir.
A homeward voyage, and freedom from
famine
,
answered Vere.
Have you ships for the voyage? rejoined
Hardin, provisions, mariners? or will you put to
sea on a plank, live upon air, sail by the witches
chart, or dabble for damnation in the black books
of wizzard spells which the friar of Linne
consulted
,
and by that means found the new world,
but lost his soul?
Now who'd have thought there had been a
peascod of discretion in this crop-ear'd puritan?
quoth Lavender to Master Vere. I begin to wax
remorseful, and would most assuredly back the
president, were it not for this vulgar chopping
and digging. Perish all worlds, old and new, ere
such prodigious degradation.
Pish! replied Vere; listen to the oracle of
the nose.
You are silent, resumed Hardin. Is it
conviction
or obstinacy? I do beseech you
comrades
,
by the faith you profess; by the hopes you
cherish; by the charity we owe to all mankind,
not to blight this noble project in the bud.
Think
'Slife, Master Hardin, interrupted
Harrington
,
keep your breath old man; you've little
to spare, if one may judge by your peevish little
voice.
I am glad of it, rejoined the other. I
rejoice
that I am old and must soon go to my Father.
I would not wish to live to see these filthy broils
renewed day by day. But once more, before it is
too late, let me beseech you to reflect on what a
glorious harvest of future hopes will be blighted
by these dissensions. Think, my noble
comrades
,
that the time will come when this howling
wilderness will be peopled by your free and happy
offspring
That's altogether likely, quoth Master
Lavender
,there
are but two women in the colony,
and they poor souls are in the jaws of famine.
Madam Arabella Fenton is the worst half of a
shadow; and little Anne Burras looks like a ghost
in a consumption.
Think, resumed Hardin, if you only
persevere
until the ship arrive, what a glorious world
this will become hereafter. I am no prophet, but
I see beyond the mists that bound my few
remaining
days, a noble prospect. A little while, and this
wild region of the west, will become the refuge
and abode of millions of happy beings, the
asylum
of virtuous poverty, the sanctuary of men's
consciences, the hope of the oppressed, the fear of
the oppressor. Then the howlings of rude
savages
shall give place to songs of joy, and hymns of
sweet thanksgivings. Then this man (pointing
to Smith) will be revered in his immortal memory,
as one of the founders of a new and noble empire;
you as his faithful friends, the sharers of his toils
and future honours. What say you friends,
added
he, earnestly; seeing Vere and Harrington
consulting with each other.
Stand aside, good prophet, cried Vere, at
length, or take the chances.
Then may the good cause prosper, and might
be on the side of right; cried the good old
man, as slowly he passed on one side to wait the
issue.
The parties then advanced towards each other,
and a most keen and skillful encounter began.
All four were excellent at the sword, and for a
time both skill and fortune seemed equal. Vere,
who stood opposed to Smith, was one of the most
lusty gallants of the day, and had in his youth
taken lessons of a prize-fighter of note in London.
He held his ground manfully before the president;
but there was not a man of that day, who could
encounter him without rueing it. Active and
vigorous
,
with a quick eye, a steady hand, sure foot,
and dauntless heart, neither Christian, Turk, nor
savage ever got the better of him in fair fight. He
dealt nobly with Vere, whom he admired for his
gallant spirit; parried his blows, and restrained
his own; worried and wearied him out, and at
length with a triumphant flourish of his weapon,
caused that of Vere to fly into the air, and caught
it with his left hand. This was an age of punning
and rhyming, as well as gallantry; and Vere, who
was scratched in two or three places, gaily
exclaimed
,
when he found himself disarmed
The day is yours, the conquer'd must obey,
And those who can't do better, must say yea.
I am at your mercy, sir. Give me the axe,
I'll call it a battle-axe, and then it will be
gentlemanly
recreation. Give me the axe.
Aye, cried Smith, and the sword too. I
am not afraid to trust you again, Arthur Vere.
On my honour, you shall never again have
occasion to distrust me. I am yours to command.
You have won me in fair fight, and so I may
prosper
here and elsewhere, if I do not approve
myself
your true servant.
Nearly at the moment in which Smith jerked
the sword out of Vere's hand, Percie had closed
with his antagonist, and tript up his heels. He
fell, having previously received a wound in the
shoulder, and the prayer of the preacher Hardin
prevailed, for the good cause triumphed.
Now will I play the Goddess of Victory, and
go over to the strongest side, quoth Master
Lavender
,
as he joined Smith's party with great
seeming alacrity.
CHAPTER III.
The party then one and all, went to work with
axe and spade, and soon the adjacent wood
resounded
with the strokes of lusty labourers and
soft handed cavaliers. Master Lavender
attached
himself to Smith, being resolved to
recommend
himself by a huge day's work. He drew on
24
his white, perfumed gloves, and addressed himself
to the president, as follows:
Look ye, Captain Smith, though I despise
every thing useful, as unbecoming a man of
fashion
and figure, yet being partly convinced by
the sound logic of the worthy Master Hardin, that
it is no irretrievable dishonour to work when one
can't help it, I hereby avow my compliance.
Well said, and well resolved, Master
Lavender
,
replied the other.
But by this hand, rejoined Lavender, I will
have it clearly understood that it is not thy valour
but his discretion, that hath laid prostrate my
opposition
,
even as I mean, by the might of this good
arm, to lay prostrate yon high tree.
He then began to chop with great vigour; but
presently laid down his axe, pulled off his glove,
and looking at his hand, exclaimed
'Fore heaven, a blister! Hear, or rather see
this, ye bucks and bloods of merry London! ye
loungers at the play; ye smokers of the best
Virginia; ye tavern lovers of the first quality,
Lavender's
hands are blistered! and blistered be his
tongue, if he doth not from this time henceforth
and forever, consign wood cutting to Pluto,
Proserpine
,
Ops, Mops, Chops, and all the rest of
them.
Come, come, said Smith, more work and
less swearing. You know the law, Master
Lavender
.
Lavender then proceeded to chop a few more
strokes, and threw down the axe, exclaiming
'Sblood! Captain Smith, I'll not strike
another
blow, if thou hangest me incontinently on
this high tree, which I disdain to cut down,
split me!
Why then the law must have its course,
replied the other. Layton! come hither with
Burras.
I care not, exclaimed Lavender, let law do
its worst, and gospel too; I swear by mine
ancestors
,
I won't work, and I will swear, 'slid!
The two men now came up. Take this
refractory
gentleman to Justice Knapp, and desire his
worship to inflict the penalty of hard swearing
and idleness.
As they led him off, towards the seat of justice,
Master Lavender communed with himself in this
wise: Now do I begin to smell cold water, a
thing I have abhorred, like unto a mad dog, ever
since I came to years of discretion. It is the very
antipodes to warming, generous wine, that liquid
whetstone of the dull spirits. Peasant, turning
to Layton, beware of me; I shall foam at the
mouth, and bite desperately, at the first pollution
of this execrable beverage. Lead on, plebeian
base.
We will now carry the reader to the seat of
justice
,
where sat, in all the dignity of magistracy,
Mr. Justice Knapp, who having been appointed
to administer the laws, by the express authority of
the Company of Gentlemen Adventurers in
London
,
considered himself almost independent of the
president and council of James Town. His worship
was a man of moderate height, and great breadth
of beam, with a waggish mouth, little mischievous,
twinkling eyes; and, if the truth must be told,
had little of the gravity, and less of the honesty
becoming a judge. If a jest or a pun came across
him in the middle of a most weighty cause, he was
sure to give it utterance, and it was the general
opinion, that he felt a hundred times more
pleasure
in making the jury laugh, than in convincing
their understandings. Since the scarcity which
had afflicted the company, he was the only fat
man in James Town; and while every body else
was waxing pale and lean, his worship continued
to wear his usual florid complexion, while he
increased
in bulk every day. Whether he lived,
like some provident animals, on his superfluity of
fat, we cannot say; but the general opinion was,
that Master Justice had some secret hoard, which
supplied his wants, and kept up his rotundity.
When reproached with this unseemly jollity of
person, he was accustomed to pass it off by
warning
the people against a lean justice. When
you see me growing thin, quoth he, beware of
me; for, by'r lady, if I once get fairly an
hungered
,
I'll hang you all; without the least remorse.
Only feed me well, and I am as harmless as a
scarecrow in a corn field.
In hot weather, the Justice was accustomed to
administer the laws in the open air, as he said, in
imitation of the patriarchs, whom he held in great
honour. His favourite seat, which he called the
Woolsack, was the stump of a vast sycamore,
which had been cut down to make room for the
city, and which in the morning and middle of the
day, was protected from the sun by the
neighbouring
forest trees. He had taken his place, the
morning
in which Master Lavender was apprehended
in the manner aforesaid, and was communing with
himself, something to the following effect:
Now shall the commonalty behold the
melancholy
of the magistrate, and taste the fury of a
citizen in office. I'll reform the new world, and
make it an example to the old. The lord
chancellor
shall call me brother, and the king uncle.
There shall be no drinking, but to my profit; and
no laws broken, but with my consent. If a
suitor thrusts a bribe into my hand, I will thrust it
into my pocket, and quiet my conscience by doing
justice thereafter, upon some poor rogue, with a
good cause and no money. The world shall now
see your true personification of justice. In one
hand, I'll hold the scales to weigh bribes; and in
the other, will I brandish the fiery sword, to drive
away all beggarly suitors who have the
impudence
to appear before me with empty pockets.
24*
And that I may properly imitate the impartiality
of justice, I will incontinently shut both eyes and
ears, to all tedious argumentsby falling asleep.
Simon!
Please your honour, I'm proximate, replied
Simon, coming out of the adjoining building.
Simonbut it is unnecessary to be minute in
describing
him. He was one of those odd, rusty,
indefatigable creatures, that we so often see about
the skirts of the law, who do a vast deal of
drudgery, for little or nothing, in the hope of one
day, by dint of the patience of Job, the meekness
of Moses, and about as much wisdom as Solomon
threw away on a single proverb, being entitled to
exact fees, and tack Esquire to their names.
Simon, quoth the Justice, are there any
culprits
,
forthcoming? I must make an example of
some one soon, or by'r lady, the commonalty will
lose all respect for mine office. Answer me,
Simon
;
thou hast permission to speak when justice
is silent.
None that I wot of, your worship, quoth
Simon.
None? why 'sfoot! I may as well throw away
the true scales of justice, and take to the false
weights of the grocers for a livelihood. My fees
wont maintain a camel in the desert. By my
faith, Simon, if these villains wont break the old
laws, we must make new ones to entrap them. It
would be villainous, were justice to starve here in
this new world, when there is so much
employment
for her in the old. When criminals are
scarce, we must multiply the statutes, as the
fowler limes more twigs in case of necessity.
Just so, your worship. But now I think of it,
your worship will have business soon. There is
a man charged with shooting an Indian, and they
threaten war, unless he is given up.
Hath the villain advanced thee any weighty
arguments, whereby justice may become blind to
his enormities?
None, your worship; he is a poor blacksmith,
and dealeth not in the precious metals.
Then his doom is fixed. Poverty is proof
presumptive. If he is honest, he might be trusted
for the amount of a bribe; or if industrious, he
might earn one. He shall be given up an he were
lame Vulcan himself. But who have we here?
Marry! this is not Dole, the blacksmith.
One of the town constables now entered,
hauling
in a worthy, called Tankard, who cannot be
said to have belonged to any profession, or to
have had any special business on hand, save that
of tippling. When asked what he did for a living,
his reply was, that he lived upon his means; and
if interrogated as to his residence, he would
answer
,
that he slept at the sign of the Moon and
Seven Stars. The constable presented him as
having been caught drinking, against the statute,
and upon being demanded by the justice, where,
replied, at the Bottle Spouting Beer.
What! tippling, and not at my bar, quoth
the justice, aside. Bring the culprit to the bar
of justice. Caitiff! how durst thou drink at the
Bottle Spouting Beer?
Please your royal majesty, replied Tankard,
I drank of the Bottle Spouting Beer, because
they had no glasses; and I drank the beer,
because
because
there was nothing stronger to be
had for love or money. Please your royal
justiceship
,
I was overtaken with liquor.
As how, insolent varlet?
The liquor ran down my throat and overtook
me.
It did, did it? Then hear the fiat of justice,
which never fails to overtake those who are
overtaken
after thy fashion. Thou shalt be taken
from the place where thou art, to the place from
whence thou camest, and from thence to the river
side, there to be ducked, ducked, ducked, till you
are sober, sober, sober, and may the Lord have
mercy upon the fishes, for thy nose will go near to
parboil them. Away with him Master Constable.
Ah! here comes Master Dole, and Master
Newcut
,
the tailor, against whom I have an old grudge,
for spoiling my doublet. 'Fore heaven, but this
Dole is an old offender. I can tell by his
phiznomy
.
The pillory, the stocks, and the whipping
post, to say nothing of the gallows, are imprinted
in it, even to the third and fourth edition
improved
.
Who is this monster of iniquity? if justice
were not blind, I'd swear it was Dole, the
blacksmith
.
Please your worship, quoth Simon, this is
he accused of shooting a savage! They demand
him to be given up to condign punishment.
Hast any thing to say, culprit, to blind the
law, and stop the ears of justice?
Please your worship, quoth Dole.
Be quiet, Dole, interrupted his worship.
Thou art condemned upon the confession of thy
countenance. I have been twice under sheriff,
and know villainy by instinct. I have taken a
confession of guilt before now, from such a face,
verbatim
, and never missed a syllable.
But please your honour, cried Dole, I acted
in self offence. I am as innocent as your worship.
Silence, culprit, none of your odious
comparisons
,
rejoined the Justice, if thou art
innocent
,
then thy face bearest false witness against
thee, and that's flat perjury. If thou art honest,
then thy countenance is an arrant cheat, and that's
just the same thing. It's all over with thee, Dole.
But having made up my mind as to thy guilt, I am
willing to hear what thou hast to say for thyself,
Master Dolefull.
Please your worship, said Dole, I've a
proposal
to make, for the good of the colony.
I am placable, what is't marry?
Here now is Master Newcut, the tailor,
rejoined
Dole, as innocent a man as myself, except
in the way of his profession. The colony can't do
without a blacksmith, and has no use for a tailor.
Now I would humbly propose in all christian
charity
,
as these savages are not very particular, that
you would worshipfully consider the propriety of
selecting Master Newcut for this honour.
Well argued, Dole, cried the Justice, and
with astonishing discretion. We can do without
a tailor, and we can't do without a blacksmith.
Besides, your tailor being but the fractional part
of a man, it will be defrauding the copper-coloured
villains of a good portion of their revenge.
But your worship, I never killed so much as the
ninth part of a man in all my born days, cried
Newcut.
Be quiet tailor! rejoined Master Knapp,
thou diest for the good of thy country; or if
thou livest, will be all thy life a perfect
gentleman
,
for these copper-coloured caitiffs, wear no
doublets. Shalt have a statue, with a needle for a
sword, a thimble for a helmet, and a goose for thy
plume.
But please your worship, cried the alarmed
tailor,
Stitch up his mouth if he utters the ninth
part of a murmur, interrupted the worthy
magistrate
,
away culprit!
Poor Newcut was accordingly taken away, but
for the honour of the colony, it is necessary to
premise
here, that Captain Smith, on hearing a
statement
of the affair, arrested the course of justice,
and ordered that neither the tailor nor the
blacksmith
should be given up.
Scarcely was this most exemplary decision
pronounced
,
when Layton and Burras arrived with
Master Lavender in custody. Ah! Master
Lavender
,
as I live, quoth the Justice, mentally,
If I don't tickle him for his scurvy jests upon my
doublet, which that rascal tailor, murdered by
stitches an inch apart, I'm no true justice. Why
how now, delicate Master Lavender?
And how now, fat justice Knapp, replied
Lavender
,
does the law keep thee still in that jolly
rotundity even in the midst of plague, pestilence,
and starvation. If it doth, may the catchpole
catch my undutiful guardians, for not bringing me
up to the trade of a Justice.
All's one for that, quoth Knapp, bringing a
man up
to
justice, is only a substitute for bringing
him up
for
one.
O villanous dull jest, worthy a dull, round,
plump Justice, the very inspiration of small beer,
rejoined the other. Dost live by sucking thy
paws, Justice, thou art so plump and round?
Plump and round! 'Fore heaven, if I am fat,
'tis past all ancient miracles, and must be the
blessed fruits of a good conscience. May I never
eat nor smell roast beef again, if I have tasted any
thing better than bread made of dried sturgeon,
since the rats committed trespass on our store
house.
Right, old Minos, rejoined Master Lavender,
for Minus thou art in discretion, to say nothing
of honesty. And yet, on reflection, thou art not
right. Thy bread should have been made of
dried sharks' flesh, and then according to the
immutable
principles of justice, one shark might have
preyed upon another.
Respect the majesty of justice, cried Knapp,
who felt a little sore at this thrust, respect the
majesty of justice, or the majesty of justice will
have no respect for thee. What is his crime,
Master Layton?
To which Layton replied, Hard swearing, for
which the president recommends the application
of cold water.
Say no more, exclaimed Master Justice, with
great alacrity, he hath bayed me in mine own
proper territory; I'll cool his courage i'faith.
Simon
,
administer.
Thus instructed, Master Simon, assisted by the
constable, brought a large pitcher of cold water,
and proceeded to tie the right arm of Lavender, to
the bough of a tree, in an angle sufficient to give
the water an easy descent towards the shoulder,
which done, they were proceeding to the
ceremony
of libation, when Master Lavender suddenly
exclaimed
Stay a moment. Simon, art thou a tanner?
A tanner, quoth Simon, indignantly, no
verily, a dealer in parchment, not leather. His
worship's
vade mecum
, that prompts his judgment,
refines his discretion, and writes his commitments.
To sum up all, a limb of the law.
Well then, Cousin Simon, quoth the other,
if thou art a limb of the law, I beseech thee in
Christian bowels, to suffer thyself to be tied to this
limb of a tree in my place. 'Twill be limb to
limb, and by virtue of this ablution, thou wilt
doubtless become in good time, a thrifty sapling
of jurisprudence. What sayest, cousin, is there
not a congruity in this?
Servant, Master Lavender, rejoined Simon,
I decline hearing any farther argument on the
matter.
Dost thou! cried the irritated beau, thou
pander to the dull wits of a knavish justice; thou
hanger on at the quarter sessions; thou inciter of
old termagants, to fathom the bottomless pit of
the law; father of strife, son of a dried sheepskin,
and cousin german to the pillory, away! thou
piece of musty parchment.
What! asked Mr. Justice, who had been a
little lethargic for a few moments, what says the
culprit, is he refractory, Simon?
He reproves the majesty of justice in the
person
of her representative, one degree removed,
answered Simon.
25
Tie him up then incontinently; the beau to
the bough, and sprinkle this unchristian railer. I
dare say it will be the first time he ever underwent
the ceremony.
Moderate, moderate, most precipitate Justice,
exclaimed Lavender, pulling off his coat, spare
my coat, 'tis of the first London cut, at least it
was so, I wont say how long ago; and made by a
most orthodox tailor, whose measures were all cut
from a parchment folio of St. George of
Cappadocia
.
It standeth in no special need of
sprinkling
.
There it lies, and eke my glove, which
latter I do throw down in utter defiance of the
president, the justice, the clerk, the constable,
and all those wicked followers of the law, who
entrap
those whom the law followeth.
Without more ado, they tied up his arm and
proceeded to pour the cold water into his sleeve,
during the which while, he exclaimed from time
to time
Pour away thou ugly water-god, thou
unseemly
Triton of the pitcher; and now since I
have been thus polluted by the saucy fingers of the
law, and dishonoured by wicked libations of cold
waterOhh! who would have thought the
rascally liquid was so coldlet my wrath be
without bounds. Pour I say, while I take a few
pitchers of swearing. May bribes and presents
fail thee, thou half starved justice. May'st thou
be speedily detected in taking a double fee for
cheating both suitors, thou double faced Justice.
May the serpents crawl out of thy hollow seat of
justice, and bite thy solid seat of honour. Here
the justice looked into the stump a little alarmed.
Thou unjust Justice. And to sum up all,
may'st thou live a thousand years on dried
sturgeon
,
and dream every night of the flesh pots of
Egypt; thou bowelless magistrate.
What a remorseless villain! exclaimed
Justice
Knapp. Give him another pitcher for the
sake of the flesh pots of Egypt. The unfeeling
monster has awakened the sleeping tiger within
me.
Abstain, illustrious Minos, quoth Master
Lavender. Having sufficiently vented my
indignation
,
I am now quite cool, and hereby declare
myself compunctious, sorely repenting, not in
sackcloth
and ashes, but villanous cold water.
Justice Knapp hereupon declared the law was
satisfied, and dismissed the culprit with a monition
to be sure he did not catch cold.
CHAPTER IV.
For some time previous to the occurrence of the
matters just related, the savages had evinced
towards
our little colony, various symptoms of
dissatisfaction
.
They refused to bring in their grain
to exchange for merchandise, and now seldom if
ever came into the town. The necessities of the
colony
,
had obliged Smith to scour the neighbouring
country, and seize their corn wherever it could be
found; and his old friend Powhatan, had sent him
a bundle of arrows tied with the skin of a
rattlesnake
.
To this significant message, Smith made
as significant a reply, by sending back the skin
filled with powder and ball.
All of a sudden, however, the savages renewed
their friendly relations with our adventurers. They
thronged about James Town as usual, and, indeed
in greater numbers, proffered their good offices
with great apparent sincerity, and would have
brought their usual supplies of corn, but that their
harvest had failed, and they were almost in as
great distress as their white neighbours. There
was among the savages who ranged the woods
between
James and York rivers, a tall, handsome
chief, about twenty-five years of age, called
Namatanow
;
remarkable for his courage and
success
in war, but excessively fond of finery, as
indeed all the savages were. He could not resist
glass beads, and would have sold an empire for a
red cloak, or a couple of yards of gold lace. He
generally came to James Town, dressed in a suit
of buckskin, fitting tight to his limbs, and showing
his fine proportions to the greatest advantage; a
pair of silver bracelets, received as a present from
Governor Newport; and a high coronet of feathers
upon his head. For this reason the English
nicknamed
him Jack o' the Feather. But with all his
passion for finery, Jack o' the Feather was deep,
designing, artful, and vindictive. He had long
been exceedingly anxious to procure some of the
weapons of the white men, but it had always been
the policy of Smith to keep them out of the hands
of the savages, knowing that the possession of
these, and the art of using them, would give to
the Indians the means of certain destruction to
the colony. The first recorded instance of
treason
,
in this new world, is the case of certain
Dutchmen, who had come over to the colony with
the early adventurers, and who about this time
deserted to the Indians, carrying their guns,
swords, and ammunition with them. From one of
these, Jack o' the Feather procured a broad sword,
and learned the art of using it. It was the
acquisition
of these traitors and their weapons, that
probably emboldened Jack and his confidants to
25*
execute a plan for surprising the town, and
massacreing
the people, which they had long had in
contemplation.
With this object in view, they all at once, as
we before premised, returned to their old habits of
intercourse, and appeared more friendly than
before
.
Pretending to feel great anxiety about the
situation of the colony, they inquired particularly
into the quantity of provisions, the arms,
ammunition
,
and means of defence; and they took every
mode of ascertaining the strength of the men, by
challenging them to wrestling matches and other
trials of manhood. But the master stroke of policy,
was played off by Jack o' the Feather, who
pretended
to have serious thoughts of becoming a Christian.
He declared himself greatly dissatisfied with his
own faith; requested to be instructed in that of
the white men, and came every day into the town
to receive the ghostly instructions of Master
Hardin
,
who took the most unwearied pains to
enlighten
him. There was a strange mixture of spiritual
and temporal views among the incentives which
prompted the early adventurers to this new world.
Their zeal for converting the savages, was almost
equal to their avidity for the acquisition of gold;
and beyond all question, much of the ill treatment
the aborigines received, proceeded from a holy
and religious horror of Paganism. In those days
the humane and charitable doctrine of toleration,
was considered an abomination, and those who
came hither to escape intolerancy, became in their
turn intolerant. The idea of converting so brave
a chief as Jack o' the Feather, was so peculiarly
gratifying, that even Smith himself relaxed in that
sleepless caution with which a knowledge of the
profound dissimulation which marks the savage
character had inspired him. Master Hardin
laboured
with all the zeal of a sincere believer, and
Jack o' the Feather, daily became more
convinced
of the truth of his doctrine. In the
meantime
,
he gained opportunities of acquiring a
complete
knowledge of the wants, weakness, and
disaffection
of the colony, by the aid of which he
was enabled to concert with the other
neighbouring
chiefs, a plan for the total destruction of the
infant settlement. This was now fast ripening to
a consummation. The wants of the colony, and
the difficulty of supplying them became every day
greater; and the people, instead of labouring to
ward them off in future by planting for the
ensuing
year, spent a good portion of their time in
finding fault with their rulers, talking about their
privations, or in sitting on a little eminence nigh
by, which commanded a view of the Chesapeake
and its capes, anxiously watching for the ships,
which Smith, to quiet their murmurings, had
assured
them were on their way from England with
supplies of men and provisions.
A party of these worthies, who in sober truth,
had special reason for grumbling, on the morning
of the day on which the savages had arranged to
consummate the massacre, precisely at noon, when
the people were at dinner, were seated on the little
knoll, looking anxiously towards the bay for a sail.
It was not then as now, when the whole expanse of
this noble water, is sprinkled day and night with
white sails, flitting to and fro, from the gallant
war-ship, with her cloud of snowy canvass, to the
little fishing smack appearing like a white speck
on the waters. All was solitary; nothing moved
but the world of waters heaving as with the breath
of life; and nothing seemed active, but the
seabirds
,
which could at times be dimly distinguished
winging their course far down the river. The
group consisted of one Jeffrey Shortridge, a
schoolmaster; Sicklemore, a farmer; Curll, a
barber; O`Reilly, an Irish gentleman; and our old
acquaintance, Newcut, who had escaped paying
the penalty of Justice Knapp's most politic
decision
.
O`Reilly was smoking a long Indian pipe;
the rest were idly lounging on the ground, leaning
on their elbows. O`Reilly first broke the silence.
His majesty, King James of Englanda
murrain
take him for the wisest fool in all
Christendom
maintains
that this same tobacco is a most
filthy abomination. Now to my mind, Master
Sicklemore, were it not for this same blessed
invention
of smoking, which takes away one's
appetite
,
when there's nothing else to eat, and so
makes eating unnecessary, by the powers of Moll
Kelly, I should think this new world did little
credit to any improvement in world making.
Hey, Master Sicklemore, at the same time
puffing
a whiff in his face.
A plague take your tobacco, quoth
Sicklemore
,
if we had planted corn instead, we should
have something else to eat now, besides dried
sturgeon.
There it is now, there it is, rejoined O`Reilly,
The true difference between my countrymen and
yours, is that your Englishman is always thinking
of eating, and your Irishman of drinking.
Botheration
,
farmer take a puff now to stay your
stomach, till these same slow sailing ships heave
in sight. 'Twill put you in good humour, and
that were a miracle in a hungry Englishman.
Nay, nay, I want none of thy smoke, said
Sicklemore, I've a notion it wont fill the belly,
so e'en keep it to thyself.
You wont? well just as you like; there's not
as much good fellowship in you, as there is
between
a priest and a parson.
I'm thinking you'd better be doing something,
Master O`Reilly, to help along the colony. You'll
have cold water upon your resolution ere it be
long, said the farmer.
Faith, so it don't go down my throat, I care
not, replied O`Reilly; but look ye, Master
Sicklemore, I did not come here to work; I'd
enough of that in my own country, so there was
no occasion to come three thousand miles to look
for it. Without vanity now, farmer, I look upon
myself to be the only real gentleman in the colony,
not excepting these same sprigs of nobility the
president
hatchelled yesterday. The only man, honey,
that came here with liberal views.
Pray Master O`Reilly, asked Newcut, what
d'ye mean by liberal views?
A matrimonial speculation, my dear, replied he.
The rest of the company hereupon set up a
long laugh, which neither put the good natured
Hibernian out of temper, nor out of countenance.
Aye, cried he, a matrimonial speculation,
burn ye. I came in search of some copper
coloured heiress, with an estate to her back as big
as all Ireland.
Did you speed, Master O`Reilly, asked
Newcut
.
No, by St. Patrick! cried he, laughing, I
made up to some half a score of them as they
came here to show off their finery, but all my
English was thrown away on them, the little rogues.
I might as well have made love to a dumb fish, or
deaf adder, or a copper-head, as these copper
coloured creatures, God bless 'em!
How so? quoth the tailor, the most
inquisitive
man in the whole colony.
Why they did'nt comprehend either words,
looks, or winkings, the only three languages I
know of. I made a glorious declaration to the
heiress of Pamunkey; but she mistook the
language
of love for that of hunger, and instead of
her sweet self, offered me a piece of raw bear's
meat.
Only an Indian bull, cried Newcut, but I
hope you were not discouraged?
Disdisdiscouraged! what's that? There's
no such word in Irish, Master Newcut. It must
be Indian. Discouraged, no no; I've been treated
with bear's meat, by three princesses royal, since
then. I believe I might have carried off one, if
little Nathan, the puritan, he that scolds the
bonny
birds for chirping on Sundays, had not got the
better of her with his psalmody.
Ah! let these slyboots alone for the women,
cried Newcut, but why did'nt you call him out,
and fight for her like gentlemen?
Faith, I did. I invited him to settle the
preliminaries
;
but he sent me word, though he did'nt
much mind giving a civil offence, it ran against
his conscience to make satisfaction.
Mighty satisfactory, observed the other, I
hope you proceeded no farther in the affair.
No, no, faith! answered Master O`Reilly, I
never meddle with people's consciences. I've seen
enough of that in my own country, which I only
love the better for having been treated like a dog
there. Conscience, Master Newcut, is naturally
a peaceable thing enough, till you point your
finger
at it, and then 'twill fly in your face like a
great mastiff. But now I've given you my
autobiography
,
as master Jeffrey Shortridge calls the
like, I should wish to know what brought
you
here,
my masters, one and all. Come, you Master
Newcut
?
I came to make coats for the aboriginals.
The devil you did? That now was rather an
aboriginal idea though, Master Newcut. If an
Irishman had made such a Judyism! I hope you
had plenty of business.
Business! saving a satin doublet for Master
Lavender, which he turned on my hands, as
antediluvian
;
and a cloak for Justice Knapp, which
he refused to pay for, I've not done a stitch, but
in the way of regenerating these rags.
Lamentable! lamentable! exclaimed O`Reilly.
But that's not the worst of it, continued the
other, I came within a single stitch of being
sent to make a bonfire for the savages, in the place
of Master Dole, had not the president reprieved
me. They say we shall be attacked one of these
days, on that account.
Let 'em come! cried O`Reilly, snapping his
fingers. By the powers, but I'll carry off an
heiress
in the scuffle, or do for a king, and take
possession
of his dominions by right of discovery. But
Master Sicklemore, may I crave to know what
brought you here. Could not the roast beef of
Old England keep you at home?
Marry, I came to teach the salvages our
English
improvements in farming.
You did'nt now? I hope they took your
intentions
kindly!
Kindly, I don't know what you call kindly,
not I. We caught one and set him to work with
a spade, with the which after a few trials, he did
knock me soundly on the pate, and then ran away
into the woods whooping like a devil incarnate.
A promising beginning, rejoined O`Reilly.
May I now take the liberty of inquiring, Master
Jeffrey Shortridge, what might have moved your
scholarship to these parts?
Master Jeffrey, who had all this while been
poring
over his book, without joining in the
conversation
,
now pulled off his specks, and shutting the
volume, very deliberately repliedI came to
teach the wild indians tame learning, to wit:
reading
,
writing, the mysteries of science, philosophy,
and metaphysics.
By St. Patrick, the teacher of the whole
universe
,
but this is the most feasible project of all!
Did they show a reasonable aptitude for these
same mysteries?
Verily nay, quoth Master Jeffrey.
You don't say so? replied the other.
They did demur to A, B, Cthey became
exceedingly
restive at a, bab; impatient at
monosyllables
;
and when they came to join them
together
,
26
performed a disjunctive conjunction, and
scampered away incontinently, like Master
Sicklemore's
agricultural pupil.
Bad news for learning and philosophy, cried
O'Reilly; thus to be left alone howling in
the wilderness. Take a fool's advice now,
Master Jeffrey; go home to England and teach
the grown up gentry a little learning and
politeness
.
Faith, there's nobody wants them more for
all their bragging. You Master Curll, what makes
you here?
I came to shave the aboriginals, quoth Curll;
but the villains are born without beards, on
purpose
to destroy my vocation, I believe.
The rogues! it was rather ill natured though,
rejoined O'Reilly.
I was always served just so, quoth Curll; an
I had been a hatter, people would have been born
without heads on purpose to spite me.
What an ill natured world this is, said the
other. But there's no use in being melancholy,
that ever I heard of. Suppose I sing you a song
now, though faith 'twill be with a heavy heart, for
all mine are about home; and whenever the
thought of my country comes over me, my eyes
turn into wet quakers, and weep under their broad
lids; but I'll try: I lighted my pipe this
morning
with a piece of an old ballad, and have had a
singing in my head ever since.
There was never a land like my own for sweet lasses;
There was never a land like my own for full glasses;
Search all the world o'er, you'll not find to my thinking,
A land like old Ireland for love, wine and drinking.
There's never a rose, but that if it could speak,
Would beg for the bright tint that mantles their cheek;
And there's never a bottle, but that if it could think
I mean speakwould invite every stranger to drink.
But what a villain I am, cried he, suddenly
checking himself, to be wasting my time here,
when I promised that pale, half perished angel,
Mistress Arabella Fenton, and that ghost of a
beauty, Anne Burras, to try and catch them some
fish, or shoot a bird for them this morning. So
good bye, if there's a fish in the river, by St.
Anthony
,
I'll have him. Master O'Reilly then went
on his way towards the river side, and the rest
dispersed
to their several avocations.
CHAPTER V.
Mistress Arabella Fenton, to whom the gallant
O'Reilly alluded at the close of our last chapter,
was the wife of Master George Fenton, one of the
Governor's council, for the colony of James Town.
He was a gentleman of good family, and moderate
fortune, who from conscientious motives, had left
England with his wife and son, to settle in the new
world. Courageous, pious, and well principled,
he was held in great estimation by Smith, Percie,
and others of the principal persons of the
settlement
;
and besides was much beloved by the
common
people. Mistress Fenton was the younger
daughter of an English noble, who having become a
member of the puritan congregation, sacrificed his
aristocratic feelings to his religion, and permitted
the lady to marry Master Fenton. When the
persecutions
came on in England, this excellent woman
made no scruple of sacrificing the privileges and
luxuries of wealth and high birth; and with her
little son, a boy, then about five years old,
embarked
without a murmur or a tear, in the vessel
destined
to bear them to the untrod wilderness of
the west. Arabella was a woman of rare
endowments
of person, mind, and education. Gifted
with all the accomplishments of that age, she
possessed withal, a pious frame of mind, which,
instead of interfering with her worldly duties, and
domestic ties, only made her the more inflexible
in performing the one, and abiding by the other.
She was steadfast in faith; and next to her maker,
her heart cherished her husband and her boy.
Piety and love were so happily mingled in her
disposition, that the one might be said to borrow
of the other, and to partake in its essence. They
were the two moving principles of her existence,
and it would be difficult to say which most
contributed
to the sacrifice she had made, her faith or
her love. The little homely cottage of Fenton, was
a favourite resort of the better sort of colonists;
it was there, and only there, at that period, that in
all this wide continent they could enjoy the
society
that gives a charm to the desert, and more than
any other means contributes to humanize
mankind
.
It was here that Smith came to relax from
his labours and anxieties; that Percie resorted to
charm down for a while the fiend that haunted him
every where else; and that the gay and sprightly
Vere, and the quaint Master Lavender, were full
often
to be found, the one playing antics with the
little
boy, the other complimenting Anne Burras, the
humble, yet well bred friend and companion of
Mistress
Fenton. Hardship, anxiety, and for some time
past, unwholesome food, had robbed Arabella of
the roses she brought with her to the new world.
Yet the expression, the eye, the voice, the
manner
,
all that constitutes the never-dying charm of
woman, still remained entire and perfect. In the
midst of famine, danger, and necessity, she never
complained, but ever had a smile for her husband,
when he came home from his daily toils, or his
excursions into the forest in search of game, tired,
unsuccessful, and almost despairing.
On this eventful morning, Fenton had been out
with his gun in search of game, but returned
without success, it having been for some time past
the policy of the savages, to destroy or frighten it
26*
away, in order that the hapless colonists might
be the more reduced, and the more easily
murdered
.
Arabella was sitting at her work, with Anne
Burras, while the little boy was languidly
endeavouring
to amuse himself about the room.
Mother, at length he said, I'm very hungry;
give me some breakfast, wont you?
Anne, said the mother, in a voice trembling
under the effort to be gay, Anne, give him a nice
piece of your bread. Anne accordingly brought
him a piece of dried sturgeon's meat, the only
substitute for bread the poor colonists had used
for some days past. The lad tasted it, then threw
it away, exclaiming
I dont like it mother, it's fishy. Give me some
better, and I'll be a good boy.
We have no better, child, answered the
mother
,
her eyes dimming with tears.
Then give me some milk, mother.
Nor milk, dear son. The cows have all been
carried away by the Indians.
Then I'll borrow father's gun, and shoot them,
cried the little fellow; and pleased with the idea,
began strutting about the room with a broomstick
on his shoulder. But I'm
so
hungry.
O gracious power, where art thou! sighed the
poor mother. Your father has no better bread
than this, nor your mother, nor poor Anne. Eat it
to please your mother.
Well, I'll try, but it's very bad, replied the
boy, and retiring to a corner, he sat down and ate
his miserable pittance with determined appetite.
At this moment Fenton came in, almost exhausted
with fatigue, and placing his gun upon the
customary
resting place of deer's horn, kissed his
wife's forehead, and asked for little Hal.
There he is, replied Arabella, pointing to the
boy. Fenton looked at him and his heart melted.
He sat down sadly by her side, while she, parting
his matted hair and putting her hand to his
forehead
,
said, with a voice thrilling with anxiety and
love
You seem quite wearied out. What sport
have you had?
None, he replied. The very woods and
waters conspire against us I believe. The birds
are alarmed at our scare-crow figures, and the fishes
would not come if St. Anthony preached to them.
Then we must fast to-day?
Yes, and to-morrow, and to-morrow, and
tomorrow
,
till the ships arrive, or we go hence
forever
.
Are you hungry, father? exclaimed the little
boy, overhearing this. Here, take my breadI
don't want any more, added he, sadly.
My generous boy, cried Fenton, taking him
in his arms and kissing him. Even just like his
mother, ever unmindful of herself for others.
Am I good boy, father? exclaimed the little
fellow.
Take him out to play a little while, Anne; but
don't go far into the woodthe Indians may
frighten
him.
Have you brought nothing with you? asked
Arabella, after Anne had departed with the child.
Nothing. Is there nothing left of yesterday?
But this poor crust. I'm sorry I have nothing
better to welcome you with, than this, said the
wife, giving him a modest matron's kiss.
O Arabella! groaned Fenton, as he leant his
head upon her shoulder.
Cheer up, dear husband; He that feeds the
sparrow, will I trust remember those who have
trusted in him. While I have you and our boy, I
want for nothing. Cheer up!
I do not think of myself, but you, cried he,
you who left a father's stately halls, a paradise
of plenty, a dear home filled with friends, to come
hither to this howling wilderness of wants, to meet
danger, famine and death. It makes my very
soul sweat drops of agony.
Did not I come with you? replied she,
tenderly
.
You, continued Fenton, whom delicacies
nurtured, rank allured, and beauty decked in all
the bright regalia of sparkling eyes, and lips that
lived and breathed in odours. You! O Arabella,
what could have tempted you to these terrible
deserts?
My faith in heavenmy love for you.
My noble Arabella! cried Fenton, but alas!
even thy virtues make me sad now. It breaks my
heart to think how worthy you are of a better fate,
and almost makes me curse the hour that made
me happy.
And makes me bless it, rejoined Arabella,
fervently kissing him. Ah! Fenton, you have
yet to learn, that the twin stars of a woman are her
faith and her love. If she is a true dame, such as
I hope will be the mothers of the generations of
this new world, for either of these will she
willingly
sacrifice her home, and her customary
social comforts, so she can enjoy her own true
faith, her own true love. Here, in the midst of
want, surrounded by dangers, menaced with death;
here in this lonely wild, the love I cherish, I can
gratify; the faith I cling to, I can exercise. The
Being I serve, the husband I am proud of, are both
with me here. What do I want more?
Fenton gazed on her with looks of love and
gratitude. And when he saw her pale face, her
cold, delicate hand, through which the blue veins
meandered, like streaks of sky, amid a waste of
light fleecy clouds, and marked the languor of
her eyes, once the colour of gladness, his heart
was almost ready to break. She understood his
look, and her cheeks lighted up for a moment with
a passing blush.
See! cried he, the rose is coming back
again.
'Tis the colour of gladness, answered she,
modestly.
At this moment, Anne Burras came running in,
almost breathless, with the child in her arms,
crying, the Indians! the Indians!
What of them? asked Fenton, hastily.
The Indians are upon us! I was at the
woodside
,
and saw them skulking behind the trees.
One of them pointed his arrow at us, but
Fenton hastily took down his gun, and turning
with solemnity to his wife, said, Then I am
called from you, Arabella. There's not a moment
to lose. Part like a heroine that trusts in God!
I do, I do, cried she clinging to him, but I
remember I am a wife and a mother. The alarm
bell now rung violently.
Hark! the signal!
Well, well, go and do your duty, said
Arabella
,
almost choking.
Farewell! said Fenton, embracing her. In
love, and marriage; in prosperity and adversity; in
weal and woe; in sickness and in sorrow; first
and last, the best of daughters, wives and
mothers
,
bless thee, God bless thee!
He was proceeding quickly towards the door,
when the little boy cried out
Father! father! take me with you; I can
fight the Indians bravely.
Fenton looked at him with dim eyes, and shook
his head
Then give me a kiss, for good bye. He took
him in his arms, kissed him, and delivering him to
the mother, ran out of the house. The almost
broken hearted mother pressed the child to her
bosom in agony, and retired to supplicate the
Being she worshipped, for the safe return of the
husband she loved.
CHAPTER VI.
Now all was confusion and uproar in the village
of James Town; for now the Indians finding
themselves
discovered by the accident of Anne Burras
having walked farther into the wood than was
usual at this time of the day, when the colonists
were commonly all at dinner, surrounded the
place with the signal of the terrible war whoop.
It was a scene of sad dismay to many; but each
man of the bold spirits that inhabited the place,
nerved his waning strength and wasted spirits, to
meet the tugging of the perilous moment. They
came forth like shadows of men to fight what they
believed was their last fight; yet still the
daring
spirit revelled in their sunken eyes, and the
same reckless uncalculating gallantry, which
precipitated
them on the new world, supported them
now while they jested with the perils around
them. There is something gloriously inspiring in
the approach of battle.
In the midst of this turmoil and uproar, were
seen Master Justice Knapp, and Master Hyacinth
Lavender, advancing to the barriers, one armed
with a vast broad sword, the other with an
enormous
club, in lieu of the rusty weapon which as
before premised, had grown fast to the iron
scabbard
,
so that the steel and the iron were become
one and indivisible.
Though the justice affirmed to the last day of
his life, that he was valiantly seeking the enemy,
yet it appears upon the record, that he was going
exactly the wrong way for consummating his
purpose
.
He was making all convenient haste
towards
the centre of the town, instead of the
outward
defences, when he was encountered by
Master
Lavender, who addressed him as follows:
Now Justice, if thou hast the valour of a
bumble
bee, give these copper coloured villains one
sting ere thou goest the way of all flesh; if it be
only for an example to the rising generation. Toe
the mark like a man.
Look ye, Master Lavender, quoth the
Justice
;
if my vocation were to keep the peace
here, instead of encouraging fighting by my
example
,
thou shouldst see me enact prodigies of
unheard of valour, marry.
Aye, and unseen too, quoth Lavender.
Thy, valour in the field, is like thy discretion on
the bench, invisible. Couldst thou reverse the
argument, and display the same valour in the field,
thou dost on the bench, and the same discretion
on the bench thou dost in the field, marry, thou
wouldst be a most heroical Justice, and a most
justice like hero. Eh! Justice, continued he as
the dismal war whoop twanged on the ear from a
distance, how dost like that quaver? On my
conscience, I do believe thou tremblest.
I was born in time of a great ague, and have
been much given to shaking ever since; quoth
the Justice.
Ah! that was a saucy trick of fate, rejoined
Lavender. Hadst thou been born in a great
fever, thou mightest peradventure have been
valiant
.
The world hath lost a most invincible
champion
thereby.
Harkee, Master Lavender, replied Knapp, if
thou wilt do me the good office to cover me from
harm with thy body in the coming battle, I will
requite thee hereafter, by a dispensation for all
future
offences against law or gospel. I will on my
honour.
Cover thee with my body, quoth the other;
an I were sawed into deal boards, that would
be impossible. But I'll promise if thy valour
should chance to effervesce too rampantly, to allay
it with thy invaluable specific of cold water.
Good, if I don't sprinkle thee for this, say
27
I've lost my memory, and am an ungrateful
villain
.
Why,here Master Lavender indulged in a
great laugh, why justice hast been robbing
Guy of Warwick of his toaster? 'Twas a shrewd
omission not to take his porridge pot for an
helmet
.
But come, let us exchange armour; thou
shalt be the valiant Hercules with his club, and
I the invincible Guy. I see thou dost not mean to
fight; thy sneakers are up already.
I not fight! replied the Justice. 'Sfoot! I
have maintained a bridge, and driven a score
before
me at a time, when I was young.
Aye, quoth the other; non-combatants,
quaker bullocks without horns. If they had been
swine, thou hadst never stood the encounter of
their bristles, I'll be sworn.
Why thou smooth chinn'd Catamite, exclaimed
Knapp; thou profane seeker of milliners' shops,
whose entire knowledge consists in the newest
fashions, wouldst have me turn coward, and
wantonly
run into danger, that I may escape death?
Pish! lend me thy weapon. Mine is safe in
the scabbard, you know; or I had long since made
an example of thee'tis buried in the rust of
ages.
I'll not lend thee an inch of it, even though it
were in thy half starved weasand. What though
I did not mean to seek danger, danger may seek
me, and then this valiant weapon may defend me,
by frightening the enemy away.
Well, rejoined Master Lavender, since thy
valour is likely to prove altogether defensive, and
thou wilt not lend me thy sword, I will make thee
my shield, and advance under cover of thy
rotundity
to battle.
What! convert me into a moving
breastwork
!
quoth Knapp.
Marry, yea; answered the other. Move on
thou huge folio of obsolete statutes in wormeaten
vellum, that art sheer bullet proof. Trip, trip
thou volume of unrighteous decisions! By this
light thou goest. Why I do believe thou hast tied
up thy valour as the man did his legs, for fear
they might run him into danger. Come, `roll on
thou fair orb;' revolve thee, thou huge father
Earth. O! for the lever of the learned heathen
Greek.
Away! thou sun burnt, smoke dried
caterpillar
,
knave thou; cried the Justice, as Master
Lavender
pushed him out, at the moment the
whooping
of the savages announced that they were
advancing in the direction pursued by Lavender.
While this scene was passing, Smith, Percie,
Vere, Harrington, and other stout spirits of the
colony, were marshalled in another quarter,
consulting
on the best mode of repelling the assailants,
But little time was left for this, and but few words
were wasted on the occasion. It was the
opinion
of Smith, that instead of waiting for the
savages, in their poor entrenchments, it was better
to sally out boldly, and thus take them by surprise.
Hand to hand, foot to foot, and breast to breast,
say I, cried the gallant Vere; if we fall, amen;
'twill only be cheating famine. We have no
wives or children to fall into the hands of these
bloodhounds, when we are gone. They shall be
welcome to all I leave behind.
True, Arthur Vere, replied Smith; but we
have motives equally strong to preserve ourselves.
A siege will starve us; a battle may give us
victory
and food; a dinner or a grave. Are we all
agreed?
All, all; cried the others.
Come on, then, fellow soldiers, follow me;
cried Smith, as he dashed out upon the savages
now thronging onward, and attempting the little
stockade that surrounded the town.
A scene of bloody contention now ensued; a
contest such as old Homer describes, hand to
hand, and man to man. As the struggle
continued
to wax hotter and hotter, the whoops of the
Indians gradually ceased, and nothing was heard
but blows, and pantings, and groans of the dying.
The savages were five to one; but the skill, the
coolness, the superior weapons of the white men,
balanced the superiority of numbers; and the fight
continued for some time apparently equal. But
we decline administering to the blood thirsty
propensities
of this polite and refined age, which can
scarcely relish a work either of fact or fancy, unless
it is plentifully sprinkled with human gore. We
delight not in carnage, even on paper, and
cannot
find in our hearts to put scores of christian
people to death in cold blood, even with the point
of our pen. It is doubtless from having become
so familiar with such murderous legends, that the
most tender hearted young ladies who would not
kill a fly, or even a cockroach, do not scruple to
commit half a dozen murders of an evening, upon
the bodies of young gentlemen, as innocent as
a pair of white kid gloves. Suffice it therefore to
say, that the valour of Smith and his party at
length triumphed. Jack o' the Feather fell by
the hand of that dauntless adventurer, and the
savages discouraged by his loss, retreated into
their impenetrable woods again.
But much as we dislike to administer to the
carnivorous
propensities of our fair readers, we
cannot
in conscience pass over an exploit of Master
Lavender, which deserves to be transmitted to the
latest posterity. We left that valorous dandy,
propelling Justice Knapp to the scene of battle,
as he verily believed, and as the reader will
doubtless
remember, unless he hath peradventure fallen
asleep, for want of that zest which gives such
irresistible attraction to the modern romance, to
wit: blood and murder.
The progress of Master Lavender, as might be
27*
expected, was somewhat slow, as the Justice
proved
refractory, and backslided from time to time.
At length they gained the outward defences of the
town, as it happened, precisely on the side opposite
that where the battle raged most fiercely. This
was a trick of fate; for as we before observed,
Master Lavender lacked not that courage which
was common to the age.
Push on Justice, exclaimed Lavender, as they
emerged into the open space between the town
and adjoining wood. 'Fore heaven, if thou wert
a Lord Chancellor, or a suit in chancery, thou
couldst not get on more deliberately. I might as
well have turned snail, and gone to battle with my
house on my back. Push on, I say; the glory will
be all reaped before we come.
Let them reap and welcome. I decline such
harvesting.
'Sdeath! the battle will be over before we
come.
So much the better; the latter end of a feast
is preferable to the beginning of a fray. 'Tis a
maxim in law.
Dost see the enemy, Justice?
As thick as hops, marry.
Which way?
Yonder, to the left.
Then wheel thy rotundity that way. Zounds!
why thou art as long in making thy evolutions as
mother Earth.
As these worthies approached the confines of
the wood, a savage darted out upon them, which
the Justice perceiving, very adroitly turned round
behind Lavender, and climbed a tree hard by,
with a degree of activity little to be expected in
one of his make. The Indian in the mean time
cautiously approached, scrutinizing the enemy
closely, and on seeing he was only armed with a
club, advanced boldly to battle, while Master
Lavender
communed with himself as follows:
Now my trusty sapling be true as steel, and
thou shalt have ballads made on thee like the
swords of the rascally errant Knights. If I fall,
on my life I'll lay all the blame on thee. I wash
my hands of it. Come on thou painted he
Jezebel
.
A furious combat now ensued, which ended at
length to the immortal renown of Master
Lavender
,
who had practised at quarter staff, at the
White Conduit House, in merry London. After a
good deal of manuvring, and vast feats of
activity
in making and avoiding blows, the Christian
Knight at length succeeded in planting his cudgel
with such sound emphasis and good discretion
upon the bald pate of the Pagan, that had not his
scull been of extraordinary thickness, it had
certainly
split like a ripe pumpkin. As it was, he fell
and lay as if dead.
Hah! boy, quoth the victor, there's North
Country for you. Now will I carry my captive to
the President, who shall ask pardon for the
infliction
of cold water. But first will I plant this
trusty scion in some rich bottom, where it shall
grow lustily, and furnish cudgels for the
commonwealth
.
Woe to the first man I meet who hath
ever looked askance at me, for he has not long to
live. I do pronounce him a most unhappy shadow.
And as for that trusty poltron, Justice Knapp, him
will I speak into a carcass incontinently. Now
for my trophy.
Turning round as he finished his soliloquy,
Master
Lavender discovered, to his great confusion,
that the Indian had taken the opportunity to get
up and run away.
Eh, quoth the disappointed champion, as I
am a true man and invincible, the counterfeit
copper-washed
man hath made himself invisible
absconded
evaporated,
broke his parole and
defrauded
me of my immortal fame. O! fate, fate!
If that caitiff, Justice Knapp, had only staid to
bear witness to my exploits, it had been
something
.
But now no soul will believe me though I
swear to it. Yet I will swear, and that lustily
too.
He was proceeding in the direction where the
confusion of the fight seemed by the noise to be
the greatest, when he heard a cough as if from
one of the trees at a little distance.
Another prize! quoth he. If I don't
cudgel
this one into an utter incapacity to run away,
I am the last edition of a fool.
Peering about cautiously, he at length
discovered
the veritable apparition of Master Justice
Knapp, gazing ruefully from his lofty perch.
What! cried he, laughing, is it you, my trusty
companion in arms? Now will I bring down this
strange bird and have it stuffed entire for a new
species. Justice! why Justice Knapp, I say, art
so proud of getting up in the world thou'lt not
speak to an old acquaintance. Why, marry,
Justice
,
deliver thy responseshoot a little, or I'll
murder you for a dumb owl.
Master Lavender, quoth the Justice, an
thou hast the bowels of a silkworm, help me to
get down. I did climb this tree, being sorely
smitten with the sight of a most beautiful cudgel,
with the which I did resolve to back thee valiantly.
The tree, if it could speak, would swear to it.
Why thou false rogue, cried the other, hast
forgot thy immeasurable toaster?
What, rejoined Knapp, wouldst have me
take odds against an enemy, by matching my
sword against his club? Thou knowest nothing
of the laws of errantry, Master Lavender. But
come now, my dear friend, help me down, will
you?
I help thee down? I'll see thee set up to be
shot at for sixpence, first. Let thyself go. I'll
warrant thy natural alacrity in sinking will bring
thee to the ground in good time without my
assistance
.
You wont? Then 'fore Heaven I'll tickle
thee, thou accidental champion. I will not only
withhold my testimony to thy valour, but swear
I saw thee running away from a poppoose, armed
with a turkey feather. I will.
Lookee, Justicewilt swear, if I help thee
down, thou sawest me smite a savage sorely to the
earth?
Two dozen. I'll not stick at trifles, an thou'lt
help me speedily.
Descend then, thou old bald pated magpie,
while I catch thee as a boy does an over-ripe
apple
,
lest it should burst in falling. Dart from thy
sphere, most majestic orb; but beware of coming
head foremost, good ursa-major, or thou'lt arrive
wrong side outwards.
Have done with thy scurvy jestsa joke out of
place is as bad as a limb out of joint. I will
essay
me; stand ready, and catch me if I fall.
Come on thenthere now, take care of thy
footing, Justice! By this hand, if I had'nt chanced
to read that fear lent a man wings, I'd have sworn
the fiend helped this fellow up the tree. Softly,
softly, Justice; remember thou art the depository
of my immortal fame. So, so, there now, here's
my back; if it sustain thy enormities of flesh and
wickedness, I will beard that fellow, Atlas, to his
teeth. Now Justice.
Master Lavender hereupon bent down upon all
fours, to receive his burthen, while the Justice,
whether by accident or design, letting himself go,
lighted on his back, and almost crushed him five
fathoms deep into the sand. Master Lavender,
jumping up with some difficulty, exclaimed
If I did'nt think some overgrown, stall-fed
world had tumbled on my back, instead of my
being
on the back of the world, may I never wear a
satin doublet more. The monster hath crushed
me.
O! O! ah! ah! oh! exclaimed the Justice.
Why how now, quoth the other, art hurt,
Justice?
Mortallythe king's touch cant save me.
Thy weight hath made excellent paste of my
bones.
O! father Abraham! what an ungrateful
villain
to accuse me, whose every bone can bear
witness
against thee. But come, arise. I swear by
all the fat saints of the calendar, if I did not
require
an eye witness to my exploit, I would turn
thee on thy back like a turtle, and leave thy fat to
melt like butter before the sun. But thou'lt swear
lustily, Justice?
Like a true manshalt be in the chronicles,
quoth the Justice, and thereupon the two departed
for the quarter where the battle had raged most
violently, but where the quiet which had
succeeded
,
indicated the defeat of the assailants.
CHAPTER VII.
During the progress of those events we have
been sketching, Mistress Arabella Fenton
remained
in the situation we left her, in a state of intense
anxiety, only mitigated by her reliance on heaven,
and her habit of submission to its will. She heard
the distant yells of the savages, mixed with the
uproar of the battle, and if ever pious prayers
ascended
to heaven, it was now, when she petitioned
for the safety of her husband, her child, and place
of refuge in the lonely regions of the west. While
thus employed in offering up her orisons, a party
of two Indians, which had penetrated into the
town, in a direction opposite to that where the
great struggle was passing, suddenly burst into the
room, where Arabella was, with Anne Burras and
the child, and seizing the latter, bore him away,
shrieking and struggling, in their arms.
The hapless mother, wasteed with hardship,
suffering
and want, made one effort to follow, and
sunk on the floor without sense or motion. The
faithful Anne Burras, animated by gratitude to the
mother, and affection for the boy, followed the
savages
,
calling loudly for help. But no help came;
every man in the colony, capable of resistance or
assault, was now fighting on the opposite side, and
the quarter inhabited by Master Fenton was as a
desert. The savages carried off the boy, spite
of his struggles, and Anne followed, regardless
of their threatening gestures. They were too
fearful of pursuit to stop and murder her; and she
continued to pursue them, crying for help, and for
mercy, until they had proceeded a considerable
distance into the forest, when, considering
themselves
safe from immediate pursuit, they stopped,
and gave her time to come up. Determined not
to forsake the boy, the faithful handmaid made
them comprehend by signs, that she would go with
them without resistance, if they would permit her.
After a moment's consultation, they gave her to
understand they consented, and bidding her
follow
,
they proceeded deeper into the forest. As
they went on, Anne, whenever she could do it
unperceived
,
broke off the little tender branches of
the bushes, and strewed them by the way, so that
if an opportunity of escape occurred, they might
serve as a guide through the forest home again.
In this manner they proceeded through tangled
woods, and twilight solitudes, sometimes carrying
the boy, and sometimes making him walk, until,
becoming themselves tired, and believing they
might do it with safety, they sat themselves down,
and in a short time one fell asleep, while the other
remained watching.
In the meanwhile, Fenton, who with the rest
28
had pursued the retreating savages, till they were
lost in the pathless forests, returned in haste to his
home. As he approached, his heart palpitated
with eager hopes; but when he saw neither wife,
nor boy, nor handmaid, watching from the windows
for his return, while the open door remained
unoccupied
,
a presentiment of evil crossed his mind, and
smote his hopes to the earth. On entering the
little
parlour, where sat his wife, Joy! joy, my
Arabella
,
he exclaimed, our fold is safe again.
She paused, and looked wofully at him for a
moment, then replied
Yes, but the little cosset lamb is stolen.
What mean you, dearest wife? said he; you
seem wild and sad withal. Yet 'tis no wonder;
gaunt hunger fastens on the brain at last. Poor
Arabella!
It is not that, said she; we've had a feast
to-day. They killed our little pet lamb.
What can she mean? thought Fenton; her
mind is wandering. Spare me sweet Heaven this
last calamity.
You think my senses are wandering, I know
you do; cried she, wringing her handsno,
no! my heart is breaking, but my brain is free.
But wilful, selfish mother that I am! Listen, dear
husbandbut I cannot tell itlook round, do you
not miss something? She covered her face with
her hands, while Fenton looked wildly round the
room, and at length catching the horrid idea,
exclaimed
Merciful God!our boywhere is he?
Bleeding beneath the butcher's knife. But,
rallying herself, and speaking with great effort
while you were gone, two savages broke into
our house, and carried off our boy. Poor Anne
followed thembut I could not; I was dreaming
on the floor.
Fenton covered his face for a moment, and
wept.
How long ago was this?
Not longat least I think it could not have
been long before you came.
Then perhaps they may be overtaken; cried
he, again seizing his gun.
Nay, nay, cried Arabella, earnestly; my
heart is rent in twain already. The half is gone
leave me the other half. Then after a pause
and a struggleDo not follow them, 'twill only
be another victim.
I were no father, then. No moment must be
lost. Weep not my Arabella; we shall see our
boy again.
I shall go to him; but he will never come to
me.
Fenton now loaded his gun, and was sallying
forth in full speed, when he was met at the
threshold
by Percie, Vere, and Layton, the former of
whom had come to congratulate Mistress Fenton
on the victory; and the latter to see Anne Burras,
to whom he was affianced.
Why how now Fenton, cried Vere, gaily;
you run as if in pursuit of an enemy. But where's
little Hal, my old playmate; I came to kiss the
rogue, and wish his mother joy.
I can't stop to talk, cried Fenton; life and
death are in this moment.
What is the meaning of all this? asked
Vere.
Will you let him go alone, good Percie, and
gallant Vere; and you Layton? asked
Arabella
;
will you let a father seek his lost child
alas! his only one, in the wilderness, alone? Our
little Hal is loststolen away by the savages.
What! our favourite, cried Percie; the
first little male christian that ever opened his eyes
upon this new world. He shan't go alone, by
Heaven; I for one will follow him to the world's
end.
And I lead! cried Vere. Poor fellow!
Away gentlemen! Madam, I will bring you back
that boy, if the earth bears him alive.
May Heaven reward you! Good Layton,
you
will gopoor Anne is with him.
Layton bowed his head, but could not speak.
Go now, added she, while I can bear itgo,
and God be with you.
Come, come away, cried Fenton; each
moment
is a jewel.
Mistress Fenton sunk to the floor on her knees,
and sought her never failing refuge, while the rest
hurried away into the woods.
CHAPTER VIII.
The reader will now peradventure condescend
to follow us down to the riverside, where sat under
the shade, not of their laurels, but a wide
spreading
elm, Master O'Reilly, Jeffrey Shortridge, and
Newcut, the tailor, discussing various indifferent
matters.
Tim Newcut, quoth O'Reilly, resolve me
one question, will ye? Tell me what we have
been fighting for, a little bit ago?
My name's not Tim, Master O'Reilly, quoth
the other.
Is that the way to answer a civil question? I
say it is, Tim being the short for Timble; answer
me, then, Tim Newcut, what have we Judys been
fighting for?
Why, our lives and fortunes to be sure.
And we gained what we fought for?
To be sure we did.
By St. Patrick, the pink of the calendar, I
deny
it, unless you, Master Jeffrey, will prove by your
logic that a man can live without eating, till he's
28*
used to it. It's now good four and twenty hours
since I devoured my last paraty of the batch I
intended to bestow as a benefaction on dear old
Ireland.
And I have devoured my parchment measure.
They say I'm but the ninth part of a man. I wish
they'd prove it; for then belike my appetite might
dwindle in proportion.
Faith Tim, dried sheepskin is but a bad
substitute
for fresh mutton. But here now is Master
Jeffrey
,
the philosopher, who I dare say, makes out to
live as most of your great scholars do now-a-days,
upon other people's learning. What say you, you
old church mouse?
Verily, Master O'Reilly, quoth Jeffrey, I am
fain to chew the cud of understanding, for lack of
something more savoury. Last night I took a
piscatory
eclogue for supper; but it was so dry it
almost choked me.
Gads me! I don't wonder at it. Commend
me to dried sturgeon in preference. I never
myself
liked that sort of feasting, ever since I took a
surfeit of learning at school. O for a sea gull, or
a Mother Carey's chicken, with just so much as
skin to its bones. Tim, keep a sharp look out for
these light fingered gentry.
There's nothing to be seen but the
white caps
.
Master Jeffrey, quoth O'Reilly, have you
never a fat book-worm in training now? Or a
work on the delightful mysteries of pies and
puddings? I should like to borrow a leaf out of it
for supper, just to stay my stomach.
No: replied Master Jeffrey; but now I
think of it, I've a book of fasts.
Burn ye, dont we fast without book? But
come, if we stand here prating all the afternoon, ten
to one we go without supper. Let's to the woods.
If I meet an owl as old as my great grandmother,
I'll not spare a hair of his head.
The contemplative practice of fishing, suits
better with the abstraction of philosophy. I will
essay the waters; quoth Master Jeffrey.
Do so, Master Jeffrey; we'll try both the earth,
the air, and the waters; aye faith, and the fire too,
for a salamander. If you should chance to hook
a whale, call out lustily, and we'll come and help
fish him up.
Mind your phraseology, Master O'Reilly; a
whale is no more a fish, than the mother that bore
you.
And she was no mermaid, I'll swear for it. But
no fish! 'Slid, what manner of man may it be,
then. Is it flesh or fowl?
Marry, neither.
Then it must be a great vegetable; cried
Newcut.
Only an overgrown insect, Tim; a fish louse of
magnitude. But expound Master Jeffrey, what is
it?
The first step in science, is to tell what a thing
is not, the next to tell what it is. That a whale is
no fish is palpable; but what it really is, hath not
yet been decided.
By St. Patrick, but that is rather hard upon the
poor fishI mean the poor creature. It is making
a sort of a sea mulatto of him, who is thrust out
of the company of white people, and is too proud
to keep company with black. It's lucky he
has got plenty of fishI mean whales, to keep him
in countenance. But come away, Tim; for unless
Master Jeffrey can teach me to doubt whether I
am half starved or not, there's no use in
philosophy
at present. Before we go, Master Jeffrey,
I do beseech thee to tell me what this same whale
actually is?
Hemit isit isvery like a fish, quoth
Jeffrey.
Thank you, Master Jeffrey. O Tim! Tim, if
you could only look down my throat and see what
a parcel of hungry devils are at work there!
I'll not trust myself too near, Master O'Reilly,
quoth Newcut.
Faith, you'd better not. There's a great
what d'ye call ita great vacuum, Master Jeffrey,
that would swallow up a dozen systems of
philosophy
,
and be never the wiser. O Kit Columbus, what
possessed you to go out of your way looking for
new worlds, when the old one was bad enough in
all conscience.
O'Reilly and Newcut then departed for the
woods; and Master Jeffrey essayed the waters,
where he soon fell into a doubt, whence he
relapsed
into a reverie, and from thence into a nap,
from which he was at length aroused, by a fish
jirking his pole out of his hand, whereat Master
Jeffrey, was not a little troubled.
CHAPTER IX.
The repulse of the savages had relieved the
little
colony from immediate danger, but left it in
the same starving condition as before. The
Indians
carried with them no provisions, and could
leave none behind. Smith, whose noble spirit
was always at work for the benefit of his
fellow-sufferers
,
had ever since the battle been revolving in
his mind a plan for making a distant excursion
towards
the head of Chesapeake Bay, with a view of
bartering with the savages for their corn.
Harrington
,
Vere, and others of his friends,
endeavoured
to dissuade him from his purpose; but he
was not a man to yield when he had resolved;
and was now concerting with Harrington, a
plan for departing the night but one ensuing, that
the savages might not know, and take advantage,
of his absence, and that of so many persons as he
must necessarily take with him. They had just
finished making their dispositions, when they were
interrupted by the intrusion of Justice Knapp, and
Master Lavender; the latter of whom, as they
approached, whispered the other
Now, Justice, let thy gratitude shine forth
like a light from afar. Exalt my valour
exceedingly
.
Mum. Say no more, Master Lavender. I'll
blazon. Thy deeds shall be pictured, sculptured,
and engraven in brass and marblethey shall.
Why, Justice, cried Harrington, as they came
forward, hast risen from the dead? We thought
you lost.
Not lostonly mislaid a littleup a high
treehey, Justice? quoth Lavender, aside to
him.
In truth, Master Harrington, replied the
Justice
,
I was in great danger of being tomahawked
by the villains. But I gave them their bitters, I
warrant you. I was down
Up
you mean, quoth Lavender.
'Slid! if thou art not silent about the tree, I'll
pledge mine office to the President, I saw thee
fleeing from thine own shadow, when it was
invisible
to every body elseI will.
And so, Justice, said Smith, you were at
odds with them?
There was a whole tribe upon me; but I
ought to mention that they were dead
somebody
did me the kindness to kill them for me, before
I could convert them into mince meat.
'Fore heaven, quoth Lavender, aside, there's
some grace in this fellow, yet! An he had not
let somebody else kill these savages for him, his
account of my valour had been deemed
incredible
.
Now, Justice, edge in a word or two
about my exploits.
Away! cried Knapp, thou braggadocio
thou suborner of true men, to tell false liesthou
air bubble, in azure satin doubletthou that hast
not the valour of a lady's little finger, that shrinks
from the prick of a needle, though ensconced in
silver thimble. Get thee behind me, Satan!
Why how now Justice, in wrath? said Smith.
Aye, marry, sirand with reason. Is not the
sin of ingratitude deadly? This craven coster
monger, did desert me in the thickest of the fight;
in the very teeth of danger.
Is it possible? Why, Master Lavender!
That ever I should have trusted this false
knave! said Lavender to himself. Justice,
thou liest like an almanac maker.
Lie in thy teeth! thou apocryphal beau. As
I am a despiser of cowards, this ungrateful
offspring
of a tailor and a silkworm, after I had saved
his life three times: once from the fury of an
enraged
poppoose, armed with a huge piece of a
cornstalk
;
secondly, from the nails of a warlike squaw
heroine; and thirdly, from a holly bush, that
seized him by the cloakthis ungrateful poltron,
I say, after all this, deserted me in my sore
extremity
,
and climbed up a high tree for safety.
Shame, shame, Master Lavender, cried the
others.
Villain! quoth Lavender, apart to the
Justice
,
see if I don't baste thee in thine own gravy,
for this.
I defy thee, coward. I've not fat enough left
me to administer to thy diabolical malice.
What says he, Justice? asked Harrington.
He privately offers to bribe me to silence,
with his best satin doublet.
O! for shame, cried Harrington, offer to
bribe a justice! But is all this actually true?
True! were it not sheer idolatry, I'd kneel
down and swear to it.
But how did you discover the bird in his roost,
asked Smith, willing to forget or beguile his
heavy cares for a moment, with the squabbles of
our two heroes.
Why, quoth the Justice, being hungry, he
did essay himself to rob the nest of a valiant turtle
dove, that chanced there; when the she turtle, the
he one being absent, seeing him about to suck her
eggs, flew at him, and he did cry out for help
most lustily. Beholding this, my heart smote me,
notwithstanding his demerits, and I drove the
assailant away.
Justice! thou diest. This night shalt thou
sup with Pluto, cried Lavender.
A fig for Pluto! So I get any supper
tonight
,
I care not for my company.
Gentlemen, cried Lavender, as there is
truth in man, or honour among thieves, he hath
belied me. I did encounter a lusty savage, and
quell him with the aid of a stout cudgel only. It
was he that climbed the tree.
Thou liest, traitor, roared the Justice; but
seeing Master Lavender making at him, added,
and I've a great mind to tell thee so, marry.
But I will return thee good for evil, and excuse
thy want of courage on the score of thy valour
having been cooled by that same cold water,
which is a sore queller of manhood. I forgive
him sirs, and having now vindicated mine honour,
here offer him my hand in token thereof.
But the enraged Master Lavender rejected this
offer of amity indignantly, and departed with looks
of deadly hostility to the valourous Justice.
CHAPTER X.
Turn we now to Master O`Reilly, who with a
felicity characteristic of his country, had lost sight
of Newcut, who as we have seen, accompanied
29
him into the wood in search of game. He
wandered
about hallooing, and as usual, involving
his steps still deeper in the perplexities of the
forest
.
At length, having satisfied himself by a
course of logic, that either he had lost Newcut,
or Newcut had lost him and that when a man
did not know which way to go, he had better stand
still and consider, he took his pipe, which he
always
carried at his button hole, and struck a light.
Then placing his gun against a tree, he sat down at
its foot, and began quietly to smoke, communing
with himself at the same time, as follows:
This is your true teacher of philosophy. But
Master Phelim O`Reilly, bad luck to you;I fear
you made a great Irish blunder, in coming out to
this same unfinished world. You got a lame leg
in walking down cellar in the ship, only for
miscounting
the steps, and have been shut up in the
thing there they call a town, till this blessed day,
when the first use your legs make of you, is to
lose you, like the dear little Babes in the Wood.
Faith, I begin to be solitary; and talking to
nobody
,
is unsatisfactory. I'll try what virtue there
is in singing.
He then began humming one of the airs of his
country, when he was startled into silence, by a
rustling among a neighbouring tuft of thick
bushes
and vines. Turning his eyes in that direction,
he perceived something which he conceived to
be a savage crawling on all fours, with a view to
surprise him.
Eh! cried he, who have we here? On my
conscience, my music beats that of the heathen
Greekit makes a two legged animal walk on
four legs. He seems a quadruped savage, dressed
in furs, and must be a person of distinction. They
say these Indians are born without beards, but
this genius has enough for all his tribe.
During this soliloquy, the creature, no other than
a bearan animal, which Master O`Reilly, having
been confined ever since his arrival by his
lameness
,
had never happened to see before
gradually
approached. The bear was equally a
stranger
to the white man, having lately arrived in those
parts, and being neither hungry nor amorous,
approached
rather in curiosity than hostility.
Arrah, honey, now, no nearer if you please,
till we come to a parley, cried O`Reilly,
presenting
his piece. Have at you, if you say the
word, taking aim at the unconscious animal.
No, hang it, never shall I have it to say of
myself
,
that I took advantage of an unarmed man.
I'll do the honours of the placeI'll show him
what breeding is.
Saying this, he approached the animal, and
offered
to shake hands.
Your servant, Master What d'ye Call'um; I
hope you and the family are well. Here the bear
growled, not liking the demonstration of the
hand. Faith, the gentleman don't seem inclined
to be sociable. May be he would like to smoke
the pipe first, in token of peace, as is the fashion
here.
So saying, he offered Sir Bruin the pipe, who,
as if to signify his gratitude, raised himself up,
and gave Master O`Reilly a hug.
O by the powers, he's loving enough, now!
cried O`Reilly. He's almost hugged the breath
out of me. But he seems to take a fancy to my
pipe, and 'twould be ill manners not to offer him
another puff.
So saying, he put his lighted pipe to Sir Bruin's
muzzle, who, taking it somewhat in dudgeon, gave
him a great box on the ear with his fore paw.
Is that your manners, you spalpeen! If you're
for that kind of fun, just let me bury the
calmut
as you gentry say, and we'll soon see which is
the best man of the two. I'll take measure of you
for a black eye, you whiskered divil.
He then put up his pipe carefully in his button
hole, and to show that he bore no malice, offered
the bear his tobacco box, for which courtesy he
received a cuff that nearly knocked him down.
Now by the glory of the stars! exclaimed
Master O`Reilly, that's more than sweet milk
could bear, without turning sour. Have at ye,
my beauty.
O`Reilly then run into his antagonist with all
the characteristic gallantry of his country, and
was received with a hug that made him pant like
a fish out of water. Finding the odds were
against him, he cleared himself with no small
difficulty
from the embraces of Sir Bruin, and seizing
his gun, belaboured him with the butt end so
lustily
,
that in a little time he fell to the ground,
yielding the victory and his life at the same time.
Just at this moment Newcut made his
appearance
,
and inquired if he had found any game.
Game enough, replied he. I've done for a
game Indian, Tim, that did'nt properly distinguish
between a hug and a box on the ear.
An Indian?
Aye, a person of distinction, dressed in furs.
I never saw a fellow that knew so little of his own
inclinations, or understood bad manners in such
perfection. But I've given him a lesson will last
him all the days of his life. See! here he is.
On seeing what it was, Newcut burst into a
loud laugh. Why, Master O`Reilly, are you so
ignorant of mankind, as not to know that this is
one Sir Bruin, well known in these parts?
What! one of King James' batch of new
knights?
Why, is it possible you never saw a bear
before
?
Never, except in a book: you know this is the
first excursion I have made into this world of big
trees. Is he good to eat?
Excellent, especially for hungry people, that
can get nothing else.
29*
Then by the powers, Tim, we'll feast the whole
colony. Saving your great knight, Sir Loin,
there's not one in all Christendom I'd rather have
fallen in with, than this same Sir Bruin. Lend a
hand, Tim.
O`Reilly proceeded, with the assistance of
Newcut
,
to lift the bear upon his shoulder, and was
turning on his way home, when he heard a distant
halloo, followed by the report of a gun.
There's somebody making signals of distress,
Tim.
Only the Indians whooping, answered the
other. Let us be off as fast as we can.
O`Reilly rejected this proposal, declaring that
to him it sounded like a cry for help from some
countryman. He desired Newcut to stay and
take care of his knight errant, while he went to
see what was the matter. To this Newcut refused
his consent, proposing that he should make for the
town, and give the alarm. O`Reilly swore that
not one of his own countrymen ever made such a
blunder as running away from people in distress;
and bidding him do as he pleased, dashed into the
forest, fired his gun on hearing a second cry and
another gun fired, declaring he could stand it no
longer. Newcut, after weighing the pros and
cons for a moment, determined on accompanying
him, rather than stay where he was, or find his way
home alone.
CHAPTER XI.
While these events were passing, the
disconsolate
Arabella remained in a state of dreadful
suspense
,
that shook her reason. The good old
Hardin
came to see and comfort her.
No tidings of them yet? asked she anxiously,
as he entered.
It is not time; days may pass before we hear
from them.
They'll never come again; child, husband,
and poor Anne; all that loved me will be
murdered
.
Hope for the best, dear lady, said Hardin;
you have trusted heaven often, and never in
vain; trust it now.
I do! I do! but O Hardin, while I am thus
distracted with hopes and fears, I cannot think of
heaven as I ought to do. If it were only certain
what I dare not think ofI would be
resigned
and die. But now I cannot think of the
future. The present has me all.
The grave is an inn, where all the race of
mankind, sooner or later take up their last night's
lodging, quoth Hardin. Mothers have lost
their children, wives their husbands, and lived
afterwards
to thank the power that gave and took
away.
So I have heard, said she; but I can never
reach such perfection. I tell you Hardin, they
loved them not, or they had other ties to cling
to, and knit their heart strings whole again.
But I have none but these, and when they are
gone, I stand a wilderness more lonely and
desolate
than that which surrounds us here.
But remember I beseech thee, dearest lady,
said the old man; thy husband and thy child
were as the babes, and husbands of thousands of
wives and mothers that lost them and yet survived
for many years of content and usefulness. They
are no better than others that have died.
Not better, cried the mother, rising into a
passion of grief, I say they were a hundred
thousand timesmillions of times. Did other
husbands love me as he did? Did other children
first receive a soul in this poor house of clay?
Good, but unfeeling Hardin! did other husbands
twine me in their arms, and court my smiles, and
what was a thousand times dearer, kiss the
scalding
tears that misery wrung from me in times of
sore distress? Did other children ever call
me
mother
,
and nestle on my beating heart, and feed and
laugh in wanton fullness till they fell asleep. Did
theyO did they ever look like him, and talk, and
laugh, and weep, and kiss like him, and love me
as he did?
Think of the just made perfect, replied
Hardin
,
whose heart belied the very consolations he
was offering; they bear their sufferings as does
the silent air, which suffers the ball that is winged
with death to cleave its bosom; yet heals again in
a moment, and bears no scar to show that it was
ever wounded.
Ah!talktalktalk, replied she, scarcely
knowing what she said; I hear you talk as if my
happiness were to grow out of my misery, like the
flowers that sometimes spring from new made
graves.Hark! I thought I heard a child's voice
calling!
Hardin walked hastily to the door, and
returned
'Tis nothing, all is silent.
Silent! said the poor wandering mother.
Yes, silence and darkness are the two sister
fiends that shoot their arrows most surely when
no one sees them. Hardin, do you think the birds
will cover
my
poor babe with leaves?
My heart bleeds for you, answered Hardin,
with tears in his eyes. O that I could tell you to
hope; but I can only preach of resignation.
Well, well, said she; my time is short, that
is a comfort yet. The little that famine has
spared
,
grief will make quick work with. But what
are we doing here, wasting our time, when murder
is going on. Let's to the woodsO nonoI
shall see their mangled bodies there! But let us
go somewhere; I can't stay here to lose the sight
of what I used to see. Good Hardin, take me to
the river side that I may look my last look towards
my native England.
I will; but madam, there is another land
where none are native, yet where all must go.
Think of that land, dear lady.
D'ye hold it a sin to think of our distant home
and absent friends, when we are dying? to take
one parting look at the green earth we are about
to leave, and the blue heavens where we are
going
?
I hope it cannot be a sin to think of distant
or lost friends, and die blessing them. Come,
come, or else I will go alone.
My office is to sooth, not irritate. Come
then, even where you will poor soul! quoth
Hardin
,
as he led her out of the hut towards the river
side.
CHAPTER XII.
On leaving the village of James Town, Fenton
and his party buried themselves in the forest, and
proceeded to search for the lost child. Without
guides, or pathway, or mark of any kind to direct
them, they wandered at random, they knew not
whither, till it became evident that without the aid
of chance or providence, their search would be
vain. At length they arrived, at a little open spot,
where long time ago, the lightning had shattered
a vast pine, which falling to the ground, had left
a space for the sun to waken into luxuriance a
little
green sward, that invited them to rest. Here
accordingly they sat down for the purpose.
Hush! cried Fenton, after a few minutes had
passed overhush! I hear something.
'Tis only the squirrel barking, answered
Percie.
Hush! again! cried Vere, laying his ear close
to the grass; there's something alive not far off.
'Tis in a direction towards the right. Follow, and
don't breathe above once in an age. These
red men can hear the grass grow. But what's
here? cried he, as stooping down he picked up
a little broken branch, and looking farther
discovered
others.
I have it, I have it, said Layton. How
ingeniously
the poor girl has contrived to give a clue,
in case she should be followed.
Well done, Anne Burras! said Vere; she's
a brave girl, and he that wont risk his life for her,
let him die the death of a bachelor, hey, Layton!
Now sirs, quoth Percie, be ready, aye, and
steady too. They can't be far off; the branches
are as fresh as ever. Listen! there were but two
you say?
But two, answered Fenton; so Arabella
told me.
Then two of us will reserve our fire on the
chance of the others missing, should we fall in
with them. Vere and I will try our hands first,
and if we fail, you and Layton will try and do
better
.
Excuse me, Percie, replied Fenton. A
father's
arm can best guard the life of his child. I
do not doubt your skill; but there are others you
may chance to hit.
Thy hand will tremble, Fenton, said the
other.
No, you shall see me aim as steady and as true
as the old Swiss Father.
And I, said Layton, claim the privilege of
drawing the first trigger for Anne Burras.
You'll not aim at her heart, Master Layton,
said Vere, smiling.
It is but just. The father's and the lover's
privilege shall never be disputed by me, said
Percie.
Nor me, rejoined Vere. Now let us follow
the broken branches, and my life we find them.
After this conversation, which passed in low
whispers, the party, guided by the broken branches,
which they found strewed at intervals, proceeded
slowly through a labyrinth, which led them into
the thickest and wildest recesses of the forest, that
covered the whole peninsula, between James and
York rivers. Fortune, or rather the good foresight
of Anne Burras, at length brought them to a little
basin, sunk a few feet into the ground, at the
bottom
of which bubbled a clear spring, almost the
only one in that sandy region. Here Fenton,
who led the van, approaching with the silent
caution
of a cat, discovered his little lost sheep. The
Indians had kindled a fire to cook a piece of
venison
,
and sat quietly smoking their long pipes.
Anne Burras was sitting disconsolate, leaning her
cheek on her hand, while the child was amusing
himself with picking berries. When he wandered
too far, the Indians would bring him back,
threatening
him with their tomahawks. Ever and anon,
Fenton could hear his boy complain of being tired
and hungry, while Anne soothed him with the
hope she felt not herself, that he would see his
father
and mother soon. Do you think so? he
at length exclaimed, well, then I will go to sleep
like a good boy. But, indeed, I'm so hungry,
Anne, that I could bite a piece out of your cheek
and eat it. He then quietly laid his head in her
lap, but soon declaring himself too hungry to
sleep, continued to skip about and gather berries.
The moment Fenton made the discovery, he
motioned
to the rest of the party, who silently as the
grave, disposed themselves at short distances
around the little glen, unobserved by the savages,
although once or twice the rustling of the bushes,
which it was impossible to prevent, alarmed them,
and caused them to look keenly towards the spot.
Fenton and Layton now gained a position whence
30
they could fire upon the savages; but just as they
were taking aim, the boy passed suddenly between
them and the Indians. Fenton shuddered and
dropped the muzzle of his piece. Again he raised
his deadly rifle, and again just at the actual
moment
,
the boy glided between the savages and
death. The agitation of Fenton became
uncontrollable
,
and his aim grew unsteady.
Why the dl don't you fire, said the
impatient
Vere, in a whisper so loud that the Indians
started upon their feet and grasped their
tomahawks
.
At that moment, Fenton and the other
pulled their triggers. The Indians gave a yell of
death; one of them fell stone dead; the other
bounded into the forest, and was not pursued. Anne
Burras fell back in a swoon, and the boy, throwing
himself upon her, wept and screamed with all his
might.
All's safe, thank God, cried Fenton, seeing
that Anne had only fainted. Why Harry, my
boy, my dear boy, don't you know me?
Yes, dear father, but I'm so frightened; and
see poor Anne; you've killed her, you bad man,
turning to Layton. Wake up Anne, here's your
sweetheart come to marry you.
By this time the poor girl opened her eyes, and
seeing Layton, held out her hand to him. He
raised her up tenderly, and pressed her to his
heart unperceived, while she, unheard by all but
him, whisperedDear Layton, you have won
me, and you shall wear me.
Ah! I thought I could bring you to life,
exclaimed
the boy, archly.
What! my honest little playmate safe and
sound, cried Vere. Kiss me you rogue, for old
acquaintance sake.
I will; but had'nt you better kiss Anne?
I am an older acquaintance than he, said
Percie; come hither.
Aye, but you can't play blind man's buff half
as well. But my mother says you are not happy,
and so I'll love you.
Dear boy, answered Percie, had any harm
come to thee, I should have been still more
unhappy
.
Come, let us lose no time, cried Fenton.
Our guns may have alarmed some straggling
party of the Indians, for I dare say the woods are
not yet clear of them. And there is one anxiously
waiting for us at home, who shall thank you all.
I cannot. Come, we have only to pursue the path
we came.
So saying, they bent their course as speedily as
might be to the village. But whether from want
of proper attention, or some other cause, they
missed their way, and remained wandering they
knew not whither, till the sun waned low in the
west, and the twilight of the woods began to
deepen
apace. In this perplexity they fired the guns,
which were heard and answered by O`Reilly.
Proceeding in the direction as nearly as they could
judge, they made their way through the
intricacies
of the forest, until again having entirely lost
all clue with which to thread the labyrinth, they
sat down, tired, and almost despairing. After
resting a little while, the boy, with the natural
restlessness and vivacity of youth, began running
about, among the trees, and on one occasion having
made a more distant circuit than usual, was seen
through a little vista of the wood by Master
O`Reilly, who with Newcut, was standing leaning
against a tree in almost equal perplexity with the
other party.
Tim, Tim, whisht! quoth O`Reilly, in a
suppressed
voice; by the powers, I saw a fairy
capering
in the wood yonder! Whisht, did'nt you
see ittherethere!
Where?
Yonder, don't you see the pretty little
robin-run-away
?
Pooh, pooh, said the other; there are no
fairies in this new world. They've not come over
yet.
Be quiet, Tim; hav'nt I seen thousands of
them dancing by moonlight in my own country?
By the powers I could swear I had seen this same
little fellow capering in the old church yard of
Ballyshallygruddery.
An odd place to cut capers in, quoth the
other.
During this whispering dialogue, the child in
playing about, at length came to the tree behind
which O`Reilly and the other had ensconsed
themselves, and was seized by the former.
Ah hah! my little merry spirit of flesh and
blood, have I caught you? What, you must run
away, and lose yourself in the wood, must you?
By my mother's soul it makes my heart water, to
think how glad Mistress Fenton will be to see you
again.
During this speech, the child not recognizing
the voice of O`Reilly, screamed and called for
help, which of course brought his father and the
others to his rescue, and a mutual recognition
took place.
What! honest Phelim, is it you, hunting
shadows of game in the forest; for there's nothing
of substance left, exclaimed the gay Vere.
I was brought here by a special providence,
I think, answered the other. I've killed a
knight errant, and found this little darling. But
now I think on it, I've lost my wayhave any of
you found it?
Vere in looking about here, at length found
one or two of the branches plucked off by Anne
Burras, and exclaimed
Huzza, huzza! I've found it, I've found it!
I know where we are now. By my soul, Mistress
Anne, I've a great mind to write a sonnet to your
discretion.
30*
Why not to my beauty sir? I'll promise to
forgive you, if you don't say a word about
discretion
.
Nay, I'm resolved, it shall be discretion.
'Twill be something new, since never damsel was
sung before for discretion, either because you are
the first that ever displayed any, or
Or that you are the first poet that ever had the
sense to find it out; that is what you were going
to say.
Harkee, Mistress Anne, quoth Vere, could'nt
a man persuade you now to desert an old
sweetheart
for a new?
No, no, cried the damsel, shaking her head;
there's my allegiance. I'll never fight under
any other colours, but those of ensign Layton.
Ah, well a day! replied Vere; I must
incontinently
solace myself with villanous rhymes.
During this merry talk, the party had advanced
onwards, guided by the broken branches, and at
length safely emerged into the open space which
surrounded the village.
CHAPTER XIII.
The sun was now hovering with his broad jolly
red face, a little way above the clear horizon to
the westward, when Mistress Arabella Fenton
sat on the bank of the broad river, lamenting in
the silence of a broken heart, the absence, and
probable fate of her husband and child. The
good Hardin essayed to console her with bright
thoughts of the future, but she would not be
comforted
.
Time and occupation are the only
remedies
for grief like hers; for though religion may
teach us resignation, it cannot teach us to forget.
Does the fresh breeze revive you? said the
good Hardin.
She took no notice, but continued looking
earnestly
towards the distant ocean.
I am a lonely woman now, without a husband
or a child, at length she said. I could wish
before I die, to visit England, and my father's
house once more; and pray for the peace of the
departed souls of my good forefathers. My
husband
and my boy! they have no graves; their
bones will lie and bleach in the wild woods; yet
they are happier than I.
Then why lament them? asked Hardin.
O do not bait me with such reasonings, cried
she, impatiently. Do you think that when we
shed our bitter tears over the dead that were dear
to us, it is for them? No, no! it is for ourselves
and our bereavements that we mourn, not for the
dead. I had rather have my husband and my
child with me here, in the midst of all the woes
that compass me round, than know that they were
rejoicing among the stars, in speechless
happiness
,
and I not with them. Such is my woman's
heart. But come hither Hardin, cried she, after
a pause, and looking earnestly. If my eyes do
not deceive me, there is a little speck of white
yonder far down the river.
Where madam? asked Hardin, eagerly.
Yonder, in that direction.
A sea-gull, or a white wave perhaps, said he.
See! another speck, and now they grow larger!
It is, it must be the ships! Watch, watch good
Hardin.
Sure, there
is
something, cried he.
Gracious
power, may it be so!
They now attentively watched the specks,
which gradually expanded larger and larger as
they approached, and at length could plainly
distinguish two vessels, ploughing their way with
a light southerly breeze.
My prayers are heard, cried Hardin. It is,
it is the ships; now we shall be happy again.
Happy! replied she, reproachfully; my
child and husband cannot share these rejoicings;
the physician comes when the patient is buried.
Shouts were now heard in the village, mingled
with exclamations of They've comethey've
come!
Are not they ashamed to rejoice, cried
Arabella
,
when I am broken hearted? I cannot
bear it; let me go to the woods where I shall hear
nothing but whoops and howlingsI'll not stay
here to be trampled on!
Again the shouts and exclamations rent the
silence of the twilight air, coming nearer and
nearer.
Impious men! exclaimed she, distractedly.
I will not stay here to be laughed at; and was
rushing wildly towards the adjoining wood, when
she was met by Fenton, who caught her in his arms,
where she remained for a while insensible.
Fenton
took off her hat, parted her brown hair from
her pale white forehead, and kissed it. At length
her colour came again, and when the boy cried
wake up mother; you don't seem glad to see
us, she revived, and passing from the
embraces
of the one, to those of the other, wept upon
their bosoms. And you too, poor Anne, said
she; I knew that you would bring him home
again, or never come home yourself. I thought
the shouts I heard were for the ships we saw just
now.
What ships? cried Vere.
Two, answered Hardin, bearing
hitherward
.
We saw them a minute ago. And see!
there they are again, coming round the point.
But that the sight is too good to believe,
cried Vere, I should think I saw two ships.
It must be the flying Dutchman and his consort.
Will any of you good people convince me I'm
not dreaming? 'Tis plain as the sun, added he,
after looking again. They're ships, true heart
of oak ships. Huzza! huzza! do'st weep for joy,
Percie; for I suppose it would go against your
conscience to commit the sin of laughing?
I rejoice, replied the other, for the sake of
these suffering people; but for myself, these ships
can bring nothing that I care for. The land
whence they come, the ocean they have ploughed,
bears nothing that I ever wish to see.
Every one to his notion, cried Vere, gaily.
Thank fortune, I was born in the day time; the
sun is my tutelary, and I scorn the snivelling,
weeping stars. If there should chance to be such
a person as one Sir Loin, an old acquaintance I've
not seen for some time, and the only knight our
scurvy King James ever made, that was worth the
spursif I don't receive him with open arms, call
me a crop-ear. Hey, Master Justice, addressing
Justice Knapp, who had just made his appearance,
with Master Lavender, in hot discussion, as usual.
Master Lavender, be dumb, quoth the
Justice
.
For all thy threats, I see thou art
enamoured
of my company.
Lookee, Justice, replied the other, though
I despise thy cowardice, and have no respect for
thy discretion, yet, inasmuch as valour shines by
contrast, I do give mine a gloss by rubbing it
against the dirt of thy demerits.
A fig for thy scurvy conclusions! 'Sfoot!
art just like a button of cheese paring on a satin
doublet, deriving all thy consequence with the
commonalty from the company thou keepest. But
is it gospel, Master Vere, two ships.
As true as if it were gospel, Justice.
Then will I signalize my gratitude by a
donation
to the poor, cried he, rummaging his pocket
and bringing forth a periwinkle. Mr.
Periwinkle
,
I bestow thee in charity on Master Lavender
here, that when he hath eaten thee out of house
and home, he may ensconce himself in thine
armour
,
and shelter his inordinate ferocity in time
of danger.
Keep it thyself, thou empty twiggin-bottle,
with a huge rotundity, and not a drop of spirit. I
see clearly I shall be obliged to offer thee up to
the infernal gods.
Here, now, quoth the Justice, continuing to
empty his pockets. Here is a black leathern
strap, which I did reserve for the last extremity
To hang thyself, cried the other, I hope.
He did steal this of a poor cobbler. He has the
itch of a baboon for thieving, and would rob any
man of his good name, though he hath not the
grace to convert it to his own use afterwards.
To hang myself? said KnappNo, marry
to beat thee into some remote probability of
valour, so that in good time, with the aid of cold
water, thou mayest be brought to look thy tailor
in the face, even though armed with a long bill.
Thou clucking old hen husseybut I'll beat
thee into dust for this.
Gad-a-mercy! then shall I flee before the
wind as fast as thou art wont to flee before the
enemy.
Why, Justice, cried Vere, you are victualled
for a six months' cruisea voyage round the world
with Sir Francis.
Foresight, Master Vere. I learnt it of the
squirrel, who fills his maw with nuts for a time of
scarcity.
Learnt it of a squirrel, forsooth! cried
Lavender
.
Why he inherited the love of other
men's goods from his ancestors. Sixteen
generations
of them died of the quinsy. The disease
ran in the family.
But see! exclaimed Vere, as the ships once
more emerged from behind the projections of the
rivernow they round tonow they furl their
sailsnow they hoist out the boatand now
huzza! I see a
rara avis
, a woman let down the
sides! Take notice, my masters, I bespeak her
in lawful wedlock, be she old, ugly, witch, maid,
widow, or widow bewitched. Avaunt, Master
LavenderI do fear thy embroidered satin
doublet
.
Above all, quoth Knapp, beware of his
inordinate
and sinful valour. Why he hath the
courage of ten hen patridges. But, marry, here
they come sure enough, and a woman with them;
a wonder in
this world
, whether she can keep a
secret
or not.
A boat was now seen to put off from the ships,
and make for the shore. Its passengers were
received
with shaking of hands, and shouts of
welcome
greetings. There were no strangers here.
They had met in a new world, and all felt like
brothers. Among those who came ashore in the
boat, was a veiled lady, who was assisted to land
by an old white haired man, who seemed somewhat
between a servant and a friend. On landing, she
looked around with great apparent earnestness, as
if seeking some one she knew in the crowd, but
who was not there, as it would seem, for she
pressed her hand to her bosom, and turning away
her head, leaned as if for support, on the old man.
By degrees, the crowd dispersed towards the town,
leaving the lady and her attendant alone, each one
being apparently too much taken up with others,
to observe them. I cannot excuse this want of
gallantry, especially where ladies were so scarce,
but so it was.
During the foregoing scene, Percie, who
sickened
at every thing that reminded him of England,
remained aloof, quietly, yet sorrowfully,
contemplating
the warm welcomes given and received.
His heart swelled with a sense of loneliness, and
desolationthe more sad and heavy, from his
inability
to share in the warm feelings that animated
all around him. At length his attentio was
attracted
31
by the stranger lady, who seemed to be
weeping sorely, for ever and anon, she put her
handkerchief under her veil, as if to wipe away
her tears. The sight of a woman and a stranger
weeping, and seeming to know no one, excited his
sympathy; he approached her and offered his
services
.
The lady seemed greatly agitated, but
made no answer, while the old man, uttering an
exclamation of joyful surprise, retired to a little
distance, and remained silent also.
Is there any one you wish to see? continued
Percieany one that you hoped to meet,
and are disappointed? Name him, and I will
guide you to him, if he is here.
The lady remained silent, while her agitation
shook her whole frame. What can this mean,
thought Percie. Perhaps she has come here to
meet some one, who is dead. Tell me, madam,
who is it you seek? Mine is not an idle
curiosity
,
believe me.
One Robert Percie, of the North, erewhile,
answered she, at length, in a hurried and trembling
voice, that, to say the truth, was not quite so soft
as became a fair lady.
Robert Percie! echoed he. But you are, I
fear, sporting with my busy prying. Indeed,
madam
,
though rude, I meant it kindly. I am
Robert
Percie.
Indeed, sir, replied the lady, I am not in a
jesting mood. I am in search of him I said
I come from one, who bade me tell you that once
you swore you loved herone whom you left alone
to struggle with a guardian's power, a lover's
stratagemsone whom you suspected most
wrongfully
deserted
without causeand left almost
broken hearted. She sends this ring in token of
my message.
Percie took the ringit was one he had
exchanged
with Rose Beverley, on the day they were
affianced. It wakened a thousand bitter pangs.
Bewarebeware, madam, whoever you are
unless you wish to make me mad again, and drive
me to some other world, more distant and wild
than this. Suspect her wrongfully! O convince me
of that! But, pshaw! Is'nt she now, at this very
moment, revelling in the spoils of a poor younger
brother's happiness, and laughing over the story
of his wrongs, in the incestuous claspings of an
elder one? Is she not married? That's enough
for me.
She is not married! answered the lady, firmly.
What! cried PercieWhat!has the
spoiler revelled in her charms, and then left her,
sated with them, ere the wedding day? Not
married
?
But now I remember. Our father's
funeral
,
as I have just now learned, has scarce gone by,
and the forms of decency must be observed, even
where corruption harbours all her scorpions.
She's waiting, I suppose, till the mourning is put
off, and in the interval, whiles away the tedious
year of sorrow, with proud anticipations.
Alas! not she, answered the veiled lady.
She is a wanderer from her home, seeking one,
whose heart is turned to stone, who stands as her
accuser and her judge, condemns her unheard,
and tortures before he murders her. One who was
at first blind to her real worth, and is now deaf to
her vindication.
On thy soul, is this true? cried Percie,
trembling
with uncontrollable hopes and fears. O
trifle not, lady, with me. I have been mad
once, and may be so again. Yet this ring! I
gave it her one night, when the soul's harmony,
sweet silence reigned; and then she swore, by all
those everlasting sentinels of heaven, she would
be as true as they. I cannot think she
could
have
broke such vows, and wilfully.
She did not break them, replied the lady.
Answer
me, Robert Percieas there is truth in man,
or justice in heaven for liarsdid you leave her
because you doubted her affection, or had outlived
your own?
Look at me, lady, rejoined Percie Do
I seem like a man whose heart is whole, or happy?
What think you was it that banished me from
England? What chased me from my home, to
seek the desert of the world, for such it is to those
whose hearts are widowed like mine. Look at
this blighted trunk, and then tell me if I forsook,
or was forsaken. Have you no letter? asked he,
eagerly.
None, replied the lady; but she sent her
picture, with a command that if I found you true,
to beg you would wear it for her sake.
O give it me at once! you cannot doubt.
You will hardly know it now, said she; the
colours of the master have so faded.
Saying this, she unveiled her face, and
disclosed
to the astonished and enraptured Percie, the
pale, faded, yet lovely face of his early love.
Deeming it highly indecorous in a writer, to
disclose in words, those actions which delicacy
shrinks from exhibiting before the world; and
holding it to be taking a great liberty with even
one's own heroine to show her off in the embraces
of any body, but her husband; I shall draw a
veil over the transports which followed this
discovery
.
Suffice it to say, that all that love,
tempered
with modest maidenhood, could offer
without
blame, was received and returned without
presumption or indelicacy.
A thousand and a thousand times welcome!
my beloved Rose, at length Percie exclaimed.
But tell me all the past, and how you found your
way hither alone.
I did not come alone, I had a beau; but I hope
you'll not be jealous, said Rose, with one of her
wonted smiles.
Jealous! O no, never again. But I am a little
curious; who was it Rose.
Old Kenrick.
Old Kenrick! why Gilbert will grow young
again when he hears this. He shall be welcome
to my palace.
True, where is your palace? The evening is
setting in, andbut now I think of ittilltill
Here she stopped, and the long absent colours
returned
to her cheek, spreading it with vermillion.
Till what, inquired Percie.
Till I can build a palace for myself. In the
meantime I must seek some female protector, if
there be any one that will receive a run away
damsel.
Well, answered Percie, since my humble
dwelling is beneath you, I am sure the kind
Mistress
Arabella Fenton will receive you as a sister,
till we can build you a palace.
Come, then, I'll trust myself with you once
more, answered Rose, gaily. You'll not run
away from me again, will you? Then looking
in his face tenderly, she continuedYou look
pale and thin; and if the truth must be told, a
little rusty and old fashioned; and yet I should
have known you any where. The instinct of a
woman's love puts all your boasted reason to
shame. Did not you suspect me a little?
Once or twice, said Percie, an idea came
across me, that I had heard that voice before. Yet
in truth you croaked so naturally, that I was
effectually
deceived. But come, the dews are falling;
lean on my arm; this new born happiness has
taken away all my manhood.
Mistress Fenton received her fair visiter with a
kindness, a richness of welcome, which set an
example
that has ever since been followed by the
descendants of the early adventurers in Virginia,
insomuch that travellers there, often commit an
anti-quixotic blunder, in mistaking castles for
inns, instead of inns for castles.
The arrival of the ships brought such an
accession
of strength and food to the poor colonists,
that from this time they flourished free from all
apprehension of famine or the Indians. A few
weeks saw the union of Percie and Rose, of
Layton
and Anne Burras, whose repective, and
respectable
descendants still flourish in the
possession
of a liberal competency. Both Percie and
Fenton became, in process of time, members of
the council; and Mistress Arabella lived to see
her sons and daughters grow up, healthful,
virtuous
,
and happy. The gallant Vere, only remained
a bachelor, until he could save a hogshead of
tobacco, with which he endowed a little damsel
from Eastcheape, who came out to seek her fortune
in one of the subsequent arrivals. Justice Knapp,
tired at length of being an idle magistrate,
became
an industrious publican, whereby he fulfilled
his destiny beyond doubt. Master Hyacinth
Lavender
,
not long after the period in which our story
comes to an end, departed for England, to take
possession of a competent estate, which came to
him by the death an elder brother.
Would I were the keeper of an ordinary, near
the theatres, said Knapp, as he bade him
farewell
;
I should infallibly receive a conveyance
of thy estate in tavern bills.
I would thou wert, quoth the other; for
then could I cudgel thee daily in part payment of
my dinner. Adieu, publican.
Farewell, sinner! and thus they parted
forever
.
THE END.